This biographical article related to French artistic gymnastics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
InsideAR was the largest Augmented Reality event in Europe. It was organized and supported by metaio GmbH every year. The first event was held in 2010, had since expanded globally and was run at multiple locations around the world.  However, after Apple purchased metaio in May 2015, metaio cancelled the InsideAR conference 2015 without any statements about the conference's future. 
The Fearing Mind is an American horror television series that aired on the Fox Family Channel from October 21 until December 2, 2000. 
Bill Fearing, a famous writer of suspense thrillers, gets his ideas from things that happen in his family. When he gets an idea, the viewers enter his mind and see the gruesome events unfold. 
It had a bronze barrel and lacked a modern recoil system, using only an ineffective spring-mounted spade brake, and was virtually obsolescent on its introduction. Nonetheless, it was the standard field howitzer for the Austrian Army at the outbreak of the war. 
Lithuanian Paralympic Committee (Lithuanian: Lietuvos parolimpinis komitetas) was founded on 1990 and recognized by the International Paralympic Committee after one year. 
A GUI may be designed for the requirements of a vertical market as application-specific graphical user interfaces. Examples include automated teller machines (ATM), point of sale (POS) touchscreens at restaurants, self-service checkouts used in a retail store, airline self-ticket and check-in, information kiosks in a public space, like a train station or a museum, and monitors or control screens in an embedded industrial application which employ a real-time operating system (RTOS). 
Cell phones and handheld game systems also employ application specific touchscreen GUIs. Newer automobiles use GUIs in their navigation systems and multimedia centers, or navigation multimedia center combinations. 
A GUI uses a combination of technologies and devices to provide a platform that users can interact with, for the tasks of gathering and producing information. 
A series of elements conforming a visual language have evolved to represent information stored in computers. This makes it easier for people with few computer skills to work with and use computer software. The most common combination of such elements in GUIs is the windows, icons, menus, pointer (WIMP) paradigm, especially in personal computers. 
In personal computers, all these elements are modeled through a desktop metaphor to produce a simulation called a desktop environment in which the display represents a desktop, on which documents and folders of documents can be placed. Window managers and other software combine to simulate the desktop environment with varying degrees of realism. 
Entries may appear in a list to make space for text and details, or in a grid for compactness and larger icons with little space underneath for text. Variations inbetween exist, such as a list with multiple columns of items and a grid of items with rows of text extending sideways from the icon. 
Multi-row and multi-column layouts commonly found on the web are "shelf" and "waterfall". The former is found on image search engines, where images appear with a fixed height but variable length, and is typically implemented with the CSS property and parameter display: inline-block;. A waterfall layout found on Imgur and Tweetdeck with fixed width but variable height per item is usually implemented by specifying column-width:. 
Smaller app mobile devices such as personal digital assistants (PDAs) and smartphones typically use the WIMP elements with different unifying metaphors, due to constraints in space and available input devices. Applications for which WIMP is not well suited may use newer interaction techniques, collectively termed post-WIMP user interfaces. 
As of 2011, some touchscreen-based operating systems such as Apple's iOS (iPhone) and Android use the class of GUIs named post-WIMP. These support styles of interaction using more than one finger in contact with a display, which allows actions such as pinching and rotating, which are unsupported by one pointer and mouse. 
Human interface devices, for the efficient interaction with a GUI include a computer keyboard, especially used together with keyboard shortcuts, pointing devices for the cursor (or rather pointer) control: mouse, pointing stick, touchpad, trackball, joystick, virtual keyboards, and head-up displays (translucent information devices at the eye level). 
There are also actions performed by programs that affect the GUI. For example, there are components like inotify or D-Bus to facilitate communication between computer programs. 
GUIs were a hot topic in the early 1980s. The Apple Lisa was released in 1983, and various windowing systems existed for DOS operating systems (including PC GEM and PC/GEOS). Individual applications for many platforms presented their own GUI variants. Despite the GUIs advantages, many reviewers questioned the value of the entire concept, citing hardware limits, and problems in finding compatible software. 
In 1984, Apple released a television commercial which introduced the Apple Macintosh during the telecast of Super Bowl XVIII by CBS, with allusions to George Orwell's noted novel Nineteen Eighty-Four. The goal of the commercial was to make people think about computers, identifying the user-friendly interface as a personal computer which departed from prior business-oriented systems, and becoming a signature representation of Apple products. 
Windows 95, accompanied by an extensive marketing campaign, was a major success in the marketplace at launch and shortly became the most popular desktop operating system. 
In 2007, with the iPhone and later in 2010 with the introduction of the iPad,  Apple popularized the post-WIMP style of interaction for multi-touch screens, and those devices were considered to be milestones in the development of mobile devices. 
The GUIs familiar to most people as of the mid-late 2010s are Microsoft Windows, macOS, and the X Window System interfaces for desktop and laptop computers, and Android, Apple's iOS, Symbian, BlackBerry OS, Windows Phone/Windows 10 Mobile, Tizen, WebOS, and Firefox OS for handheld (smartphone) devices.[citation needed] 
GUIs can be made quite hard when dialogs are buried deep in a system or moved about to different places during redesigns. Also, icons and dialog boxes are usually harder for users to script. 
WIMPs extensively use modes, as the meaning of all keys and clicks on specific positions on the screen are redefined all the time. Command-line interfaces use modes only in limited forms, such as for current directory and environment variables. 
Most modern operating systems provide both a GUI and some level of a CLI, although the GUIs usually receive more attention. The GUI is usually WIMP-based, although occasionally other metaphors surface, such as those used in Microsoft Bob, 3dwm, or File System Visualizer. 
Several attempts have been made to create a multi-user three-dimensional environment or 3D GUI, including Sun's Project Looking Glass, Metisse, which was similar to Project Looking Glass, BumpTop, where users can manipulate documents and windows with realistic movement and physics as if they were physical documents, and the Croquet Project, which moved to the Open Cobalt and Open Croquet efforts. 
The zooming user interface (ZUI) is a related technology that promises to deliver the representation benefits of 3D environments without their usability drawbacks of orientation problems and hidden objects. It is a logical advance on the GUI, blending some three-dimensional movement with two-dimensional or 2.5D vector objects. In 2006, Hillcrest Labs introduced the first zooming user interface for television. 
Some environments use the methods of 3D graphics to project virtual three-dimensional user interface objects onto the screen. These are often shown in use in science fiction films (see below for examples). As the processing power of computer graphics hardware increases, this becomes less of an obstacle to a smooth user experience. 
Three-dimensional graphics are currently mostly used in computer games, art, and computer-aided design (CAD). A three-dimensional computing environment can also be useful in other uses, like molecular graphics, aircraft design and Phase Equilibrium Calculations/Design of unit operations and chemical processes. 
Interfaces for the X Window System have also implemented advanced three-dimensional user interfaces through compositing window managers such as Beryl, Compiz and KWin using the AIGLX or XGL architectures, allowing the use of OpenGL to animate user interactions with the desktop. 
Giuliani received her first call-up for the senior team as Italy faced Austria in a friendly held on 7 April 2013. She was left out of the squad which took part in the UEFA Women's Euro 2013. She made her debut on 5 April 2014 against Spain in a 2015 FIFA Women's World Cup qualification match. 
Fishing industry in North Korea provides an important supplement to the diet and for export. The catch in 2001 totaled 200,000 tons of wild-caught seafood and 63,700 tons produced using aquaculture. The major fishing grounds are in the coastal areas of the Sea of Japan to the east and the Yellow Sea to the west. The main fishery ports are Sinpo, Kimchaek, and the nearby deep-sea fishery bases of Yanghwa and Hongwfin. The principal catch from the Sea of Japan is pollock. 
North Korea's coastline of about 2,495 kilometers, mixture of warm and cold ocean currents, and many rivers, lakes, and streams make its potential for fishery development better than for most other countries. 
The major fishing grounds are in the coastal areas of the Sea of Japan to the east and the Yellow Sea to the west. The principal catch from the Sea of Japan is pollock. Sardine and squid catches are also significant. From the west coast, yellow corvina and hairtail are the most common varieties of fish. Deep-sea catches include herring, mackerel, pike, and yellowtail. Shellfish and mollusks are caught too. 
A major expansion of technical schools was undertaken since the 1950s, with specialized courses including fishing. Not until the early 1960s, however, did the domestic fishing industry begin to expand rapidly, receiving increased investment in vessels, equipment, and port facilities. Deep-sea fishing began in earnest in the 1970s. 
Total marine products increased from 465,000 tons in 1960 to 1.14 million tons in 1970, registering an annual growth rate of 9.4 percent compared with the planned rate of 14.5 percent. The Six-Year Plan target of 1 .6 million tons was met in 1976. 
The catch in 2001 totaled 200,000 tons of wild-caught freshwater and saltwater fish, shellfish, and mollusks and about 63,700 tons produced using aquaculture. The exact numbers of present catches are unknown. Unlike most countries, North Korea does not report its annual catch to the Food and Agriculture Organization (FAO), of which it is a member. 
The exact numbers of the fishing fleet, thought to be in poor condition, are not known. In 1998, North Korea had eight large fishing vessels (3,750 displacement tonnage,  2,759 gross tons, 83 m length, 2,250 horsepower) and 1,545 small vessels (485 displacement tonnage,  267 gross tons, 39 m length, 400 horsepower). Numbers of smaller vessels were not reported. 
Fish is an important export commodity to North Korea. Fish and seafood are particularly exported to China. The United Nations Security Council sanctions from 2017 banned North Korean exports of seafood. Prior to the ban, North Korean exports of seafood were estimated at US$300 million annually. 
According to a 1988 agreement with the United Nations Development Programme, North Korea was to receive assistance in construction of a fish farm. 
The first joint venture North Korea established with China, in 1989, was a marine fishery products firm located in Chongjin that had an initial capitalization of US$1 million. 
North Korea conducts fishing in its own EEZ, the extent of which is unknown because North Korea has not passed a law on it, mainly for the industrial sector. Some fishing for the artisanal sector takes place, too. Subsistence fishing has declined considerably over the years. 
A 2000 agreement between non-governmental fishing organizations of North and South Korea allowed South Koreans to fish inside the North Korean EEZ in the Sea of Japan until 2005. About 400 South Korean fishing vessels conducted fishing in the area. 
North Korea sells fishing quotas to its EEZ to foreigners through agents China. North Korean fishermen who are deprived of quotas to the EEZ then resort to poaching in the waters of China and Russia. 
Fish is important to the diet of North Koreans. Pollock is considered a favorite fish of most Koreans. Food stores in self-sufficient urban neighborhoods typically sell fish. The only exception to controlled markets is the peasant market, where surplus fish is sold at free-market prices based on supply and demand. 
In the public distribution system of North Korea, ocean fishermen and others doing heavy work are allotted more grain than government and party officials engaged in less strenuous physical activities. 
The Coastal Security Bureau is responsible for policing and protecting the nation's fishing areas. At the county level, the county Cooperative Farm Management Committees include fishery agents if there are fisheries in the county. 
A struggle over the control of fisheries between the military and Jang Song-thaek was the final straw leading to the latter's downfall and purge in 2013. 
On 4 September 1947, he was assigned to capture the escaped murderer, Emile Buisson. Borniche kept critical investigative files in his office, forcing the other investigators to bargain with him for their contents; other investigators did the same. He also competed with the other agencies for informants, who tried to play the investigators against each other for more rewards. He was sometimes shadowed by other investigators and would have to lose his "tail" to meet with an informant. 
He retired in 1956 and formed his own detective agency in Paris. His first set of memoirs, Flic Story, became the basis of a 1975 film featuring Alain Delon as Borniche, portraying Borniche's real-life pursuit of Emile Buisson. 
Sabir was raised in Rawalakot, Azad Kashmir, Pakistan, where he obtained an economics degree. He moved to Calgary in 2004, and obtained degrees in social work and law at the University of Calgary. In 2012, he began working at Maurice Law Barristers and Solicitors, where he specialized in Aboriginal law. In the past, he has also worked for a Calgary homeless shelter and volunteered for Calgary Legal Guidance and Red Cross Canada. 
Cymindis unicolor is a species of ground beetle in the subfamily Harpalinae. It was described by William Kirby in 1837. 
Two ships of the United States Navy have been named Bobolink, after the American bird, the bobolink. 
Under the Portuguese Presidency of the Council of the European Union in the first half of 2021, the EuroNanoForum 2021 conference will address Nanotechnology and Advanced Materials as the key elements to guarantee the functioning, long term durability, safety, and environmental compatibility of several devices, machinery, and services. 
The European Green Deal will also play a major role in this online event since the advanced materials will be fundamental for the transition to new and greener technologies and disruptive innovation that will spread successful new solutions across Europe and the world. 
The EuroNanoForum 2021  will bring together experts across different sectors to identify policy options and priorities, to share insight on technical, industrial, and social challenges, to define the role of nano-enabled industries as well as their views and ideas about the part that science will take in the greener future. 
This event is a collective effort of several actors encompassing researchers, innovators, industries, regions, public authorities, investors, and civil society, in the co-creation of innovative solutions and is organized by INL - International Iberian Nanotechnology Laboratory in collaboration with FCT - Portuguese Foundation for Science and Technology, ANI - National Association for Innovation, and NIA - Nanotechnology Industries Association. 
The following coaching team was announced by the Argentine Rugby Union for the 2020 Super Rugby season: 
Note: Flags indicate national union as has been defined under WR eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-WR nationality. 
Mecyclothorax monteithi is a species of ground beetle in the subfamily Psydrinae. It was described by Barry P. Moore in 1985. 
Iain Smith (born 1 May 1960) is a Scottish Liberal Democrat politician. He was the Member of the Scottish Parliament (MSP) for the North East Fife constituency from 1999 until his defeat at 2011 election by the SNP's Rod Campbell. 
Smith was educated at Bell Baxter High School in Cupar, Fife before reading Politics and Economics at Newcastle University. 
Smith was elected to the first Scottish Parliament in May 1999 to represent his home constituency of North East Fife and was appointed as Deputy Minister for Parliamentary Business in the government of First Minister Donald Dewar. A post he held until Dewar's death the following year. 
After the election Smith was appointed Scottish Liberal Democrat Spokesperson for Europe, External Affairs and Culture and was elected by his colleagues to Chair of the Scottish Liberal Democrat Parliamentary Party. In September 2008 he became Convener of the Scottish Parliament's influential Economy, Energy and Tourism Committee. 
For the past eight years, Smith has lived with his partner in Ladybank. He has a broad interest in sports; particularly cricket and football. He likes to travel widely and has a keen interest in culture. 
The development is an age-restricted adult community and is located off of Route 37 just west of the Garden State Parkway. 
Holiday City consists of five separate communities, each with its own homeowners association and amenities: 
The adult communities of Silver Ridge Park consist of four separate areas, each with its own homeowners association and amenities. These are: 
Sweeny majored in textiles at the National College of Art & Design in Dublin. Upon graduation he worked as an art teacher. 
Sweeny has shown internationally including in Dublin Castle, Ireland; The State Museum of Architecture, Moscow, Russia; and The Natural History Museum, London. Academy Award nominee Brenda Blethyn, President Mary McAleese of Ireland, Harry Potter actress Evanna Lynch, and French model Satya Oblette are some of his well-known clients. 
In show production he has produced and directed shows in The Irish Museum of Modern Art,  The Royal Dublin Society and Trinity College Dublin. In 2011 he art directed the British singer Lisa Stansfield at Studio Harcourt, Paris. 
The National Trust for Scotland has owned the island since 2000. With only two sheep left on the island in July 2007 and few, if any, other permanent mammalian residents, Pabbay is consequently home in summer to many ground-nesting birds due to the absence of predators. 
The island was the site of a Celtic hermitage, and a Pictish carved stone dates from that period. Remains of an Iron Age settlement can also been seen on Pabbay. 
The name of Pabbay is used for one of the three houses of Castlebay Secondary School. The other two are Mingulay and Sandray. 
Rosinish  (or Rubha Phabach) is a small peninsular headland situated on the East coast of the island. It lies in a South-Easterly direction and is only attached to the mainland of the island by a small natural arch. 
Composed of Lewisian gneiss, Pabbay is "one of the finest climbing venues in the UK". This includes the climbing route The Great Arch, which is graded E8 6c. 
The Guardian is a public artwork by artist Ante Buljan, located at the front of the Redwood City Police Station, in Redwood City, California, United States. 
The artist, Ante Buljan, was born in Croatia and moved to California at the age of nine. He is a graduate of UCLA (psychology), and also studied at John F. Kennedy University in Orinda, California. For several years, he maintained a working studio in the 1870 Art Center in Belmont, California. 
The Workers' International League (WIL) was a Trotskyist group that existed in Britain from 1937 to 1944. 
The WIL was formed in 1937 by members of the Militant Group, who had split due to false allegations from the leadership of that group that Ralph Lee (born Raphael Levy), then a newly arrived South African member, had misled a strike and used the strike funds to move to England. 
The Fourth International was formed in 1938, and the WIL refused to merge into the newly formed official British affiliate, the Revolutionary Socialist League itself a regroupment of the Militant Group and others. They requested either affiliate or sympathiser status to the International but were rejected. 
Unlike the Revolutionary Socialist League, the WIL readily adopted the Proletarian Military Policy developed by Trotsky in his last writings and expanded upon and advocated by James P Cannon and the Socialist Workers Party. They campaigned for the creation of workers' militias instead of the Home Guard, deep air raid shelters for workers, and after 1941 against the pro-war, anti-strike position of the CPGB. 
Due to its adoption of the Proletarian Military Policy, the WIL argued that its members should go through the experience of the war with other members of their class by joining the army when called-up. But if this was applied to the whole membership it meant they could be dispersed and provide no real leadership and therefore the organisation took measures to preserve the leading cadres outside the forces. 
With the outbreak of World War II, the WIL expected to be banned and so temporarily moved a few members (Tommy Reilly, Jock Haston, Gerry Healy, John Williams and George Noseda) to Dublin. It soon became obvious that the group would not be persecuted, and they were allocated paper for their publications. 
By 1944, the Fourth International had realised that the WIL were far more effective and closer to the FI's policies than the RSL which had disintegrated into a set of warring factions, and so coordinated a unity conference.  This produced the Revolutionary Communist Party, which adopted all the WIL's positions. 
He is a public speaker and a vocal proponent of learning from professional mentors. A non-fiction book on the subject is due out in 2012. It is rumored that it will be published by Hay House. 
Kraft attended The University of Santa Monica (USM) in Santa Monica, Ca. to study Transpersonal Psychology and is a career counselor and mentor to adults. 
In 2000, Kraft worked as a camera production assistant on the film Sally, starring Rachael Leigh Cook and Michael Weston. 
In November 2010, Kraft appeared in a segment on ABC News 20/20 Show that investigated the malicious grading practices of the Better Business Bureau. 
Kraft appeared on the national radio show, The Alex Jones Radio Program for Genesis Communications twice. 
In November 2011, Kraft appeared in Dr. Drew's Lifechangers wherein he granted a full scholarship to a troubled young documentary filmmaker from Detroit, Michigan. 
Until the end of the 2007/08 season IV liga lay at fourth tier of league system but this was changed with the formation of the Ekstraklasa as the highest level of football league in Poland. 
In 2019/20 season, there are 20 parallel groups of IV liga. There are two groups in 4 voivodeships but only one club can be promoted after winning the play-offs between the winners of these two groups. 
Before 1648 the area was part of Duchy of Pomerania, 1648-1945 Prussia and Germany. For the history of the region, see History of Pomerania. 
The DSM has specified that the criteria for bipolar disorder can be applied to children since 1980. However, the exact criteria for diagnosing pediatric bipolar disorder remains controversial and heavily debated. There are big differences in how commonly it is diagnosed across clinics and in different countries. There has been a rapid increase in research on the topic, but training and clinical practice lag behind. 
In both the American Psychiatric Association's DSM-5 and the World Health Organization's ICD-10, the same criteria used to diagnose bipolar disorder in adults are used to make the diagnosis in children with some adjustments to account for differences in age and developmental stage. For example, the DSM-5 specifies that in children, depressive episodes can manifest as persistently irritable moods. 
Diagnostic criteria may not correctly separate children with bipolar disorder from other problems such as ADHD, and emphasize fast mood cycles. 
Chronic medication is often needed, with relapses of individuals reaching rates over 90% in those not following medication indications and almost to 40% in those complying with medication regimens in some studies. Compared to adults, a juvenile onset has in general a similar or worse course, although age of onset predicts the duration of the episodes more than the prognosis. A risk factor for a worse outcome is the existence of additional (comorbid) pathologies. 
Descriptions of children with symptoms similar to contemporary concepts of mania date back to the 18th century. In 1898, a detailed psychiatric case history was published about a 13-year-old that met Jean-Pierre Falret and Jules Baillarger's criteria for folie circulaire, which is congruent to the modern conception of bipolar I disorder. 
Bipolar disorder in children and adolescents: treatment and diagnosis: new treatment guidelines available. (2005). The Brown University Psychopharmacology Update, 16(4), 1+. https://link.gale.com/apps/doc/A130389603/AONE?u=mcc_main&sid=AONE&xid=5c0b7c9e 
Mahoney, D. (2004). More studies on bipolar disorder sorely needed. Clinical Psychiatry News, 32(3), 50. https://link.gale.com/apps/doc/A115228271/AONE?u=mcc_main&sid=AONE&xid=44d846bd 
Wendling, P. (2009). Stimulant use in ADHD, bipolar discouraged: expert in mood disorders cites evidence showing that amphetamines might worsen both illnesses. Clinical Psychiatry News, 37(8), 16. https://link.gale.com/apps/doc/A207123442/AONE?u=mcc_main&sid=AONE&xid=c58b5005 
Conus acutangulus, common name the sharp-angled cone, is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Conidae, the cone snails and their allies. 
Like all species within the genus Conus, these snails are predatory and venomous. They are capable of "stinging" humans, therefore live ones should be handled carefully or not at all. 
This species occurs in the Red Sea and in the tropical Indo-West Pacific; off Queensland, Australia. 
High Heat Major League Baseball 2002, also known as High Heat Baseball 2002, is a video game released in 2001, and is the fourth game in the High Heat Major League Baseball video game series. Then-Montreal Expos right fielder Vladimir Guerrero is featured on the cover. The game was released in March 2001 for Microsoft Windows, PlayStation, and PlayStation 2, followed by a Game Boy Advance port in September 2001. A Game Boy Color version was also in development but was cancelled. 
Computer Games Magazine and PC Gamer US both named it the best sports game of 2001, with the latter calling it "the best simulation of any sport." 
Ramon C. Gonzalez Jr. (November 6, 1947) is a Republican member of the Kansas House of Representatives. Gonzalez is from Perry, Kansas where he serves as police chief. Elected in a special election by the Republican precinct delegates to replace Lee Tafanelli who had resigned from the State House of Representatives to become the adjutant general of Kansas. 
Gonzalaez spent most of his career as an employee of Southwestern Bell from which he has retired. He also currently works as  a special investigator with the Jefferson County, Kansas Sheriff's Office. 
2000 Amateur championship of Ukraine was the ninth amateur championship of Ukraine and the 37th since the establishment of championship among fitness clubs (KFK) in 1964. 
This article about a Ukrainian association football competition is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about an Australian Labor Party member of the Senate is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Neocrepidodera impressa is a species of flea beetle from Chrysomelidae family that can be found everywhere in Europe except for Andorra, Austria, Baltic states, Czech Republic, Hungary, Liechtenstein, Moldova, Monaco, North Macedonia, Poland, Romania, San Marino, Vatican City, and eastern Europe. 
The model of "Networking for Advocates" was investigated in some research conducted by Martin Davies and Roger Croft of the University of Bath. The purpose of the research was to further understand the importance of developing trust in business relationships. The research identified certain networking transactions as the currency of developing trusted business relationships. This led to the development of the NRG Networking System based on this Advocacy Model. 
The organisation is structured around local groups, and primarily delivers its benefits via a monthly lunch meeting, preceded by a business development seminar. 
Avel Louise Gordly (born February 13, 1947) is an activist, community organizer, and former politician in the U.S. state of Oregon, who in 1996 became the first African-American woman to be elected to the Oregon State Senate. She served in the Senate from 1997 to 2009. Previously, she served for five years in the Oregon House of Representatives. 
In 2008, while serving as senator, OHSU opened the Avel Gordly Center for Healing, which provides mental health and psychiatric services. 
The Fight Club is a Canadian mixed martial arts (MMA) promotion based in Edmonton, Alberta. TFC currently fights at the Shaw Conference Centre. 
Every round in TFC competition Zaeis five minutes in duration. Title matches have five such rounds, and non-title matches have three. There is a one-minute rest period between rounds. 
Note: In the event of a draw, it is not necessary that the fighters' total points be equal. However, in a unanimous or split draw, each fighter does score an equal number of win judgments from the three judges (0 or 1, respectively). 
A fight can also end in a technical decision, disqualification, forfeit, technical draw, or no contest. The latter two outcomes have no winners. 
The ten-point must system is in effect for all fights; three judges score each round and the winner of each receives ten points, the loser nine points or fewer. If the round is even, both fighters receive ten points. 
When a foul is charged, the referee in their discretion may deduct one or more points as a penalty. If a foul incapacitates a fighter, then the match may end in a disqualification if the foul was intentional, or a no contest if unintentional. If a foul causes a fighter to be unable to continue later in the bout, it ends with a technical decision win to the injured fighter if the injured fighter is ahead on points, otherwise it is a technical draw. 
Founded on August 25, 2004,  Chongqing Times discontinued publication on January 1, 2019, and its electronic version is not accessible. 
Born in Little Rock, Arkansas, Newbern is the son of Betty, a Spanish teacher and David Newbern, a radiologist. 
He began his acting career at the Arkansas Arts Center in Little Rock, in the role of the younger brother in Life with Father, based on Clarence S. Day Jr.'s autobiographical novels. This first acting role spurred him on to other acting roles and eventually on to movie roles. Newbern's first lead role was in 1987's Double Switch, a retelling of The Prince and the Pauper that aired as a part of the Wonderful World of Disney television series.  
From 1986 to 1992, Newbern had a recurring role as Payne McElroy, the son of designer Julia Sugarbaker (played by Dixie Carter), on the series Designing Women. He has since guest-starred on television in such series as Providence, Chicago Hope, Friends, Bull, CSI, Medium, Ghost Whisperer, Touched by an Angel, Criminal Minds, and Private Practice. He had a recurring role for several seasons as a former CIA operative in Scandal. 
He starred as Neal Morris, father of Melissa Morris (Emily Osment), in the 2009 Disney Channel movie Dadnapped, and portrayed Apollo 14 astronaut Stu Roosa in the HBO mini-series From The Earth To The Moon. Film credits include Adventures in Babysitting (1987) with Elisabeth Shue; Double Switch (1987); Switching Channels (1988) with Kathleen Turner, Burt Reynolds and Christopher Reeve; and Father of the Bride (1991) and its sequel Father of the Bride Part II. In 2009 he appeared in Locker 13. 
Newbern also lend his voice in the cartoon series The Pirates of Dark Water, and he has also done voiceovers on a number of video games and game-related productions. He has also voiced in the infamous Theodore Rex as the character of the same name. In 2003, Newbern provided the voice of Mevyn Nooj in Final Fantasy X-2. 
Newbern met actress Marietta DePrima in the mid 1980s. They graduated together at  Northwestern University, where she was a member of Kappa Alpha Theta. The couple married in 1990. Together they have three children. 
The station consists of a single bay platform serving four tracks, connected to the station building by a level crossing. 
Glutamine amidotransferase-like class 1 domain-containing protein 3A, mitochondrial is a protein that in humans is encoded by the GATD3A gene. 
Tom Baack (born 13 March 1999) is a German professional footballer who plays as a centre-back for SC Verl, on loan from Jahn Regensburg. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a defender born in the 1990s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The community is notable as the location of the Knob Creek Church of Christ, established in June 1834, the first Restoration Movement congregation to adopt the name Church of Christ. 
A post office was established on the Tennessee side in 1833. The community probably derives its name from Duke A. Beadles, first postmaster. 
Dukedom is connected with General Nathan Bedford Forrest, who served for the Confederacy in the Civil War. A Kentucky highway historical marker in the community reads: 
This Graves County, Kentucky state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Laxmi Narayan 1 (Tushar Kapoor) lives a poor man's lifestyle in Mumbai with his widowed mother Kanta, who wants him to be a successful gangster and would like him to kill a few people, make enough money, then marry Chota Khujli's daughter, Meena Khujli. To fulfill his mother's wish, Laxminarayan 1 accepts a contract to kill D'Mello Yadav (Mukesh Tiwari), a Pondi-based gangster, who has stolen a diamond. 
Laxmi Narayan 2 (Sunil Shetty), the detailed and obedient Secretary of D.M. Pipat, wants him to buy a vintage car from a Pondi-based used car dealer, Laila (Sameera Reddy). 
Laxmi Narayan 3 (Paresh Rawal) sells undergarments and runs a business, 'Bulbul Lingerie,' with his son, Sonu; he travels to Pondi to meet with his new supplier, Jiya (Esha Deol). 
The trio all arrive and book rooms next to each other in Blue Diamond Hotel. Their respective lives are hilariously turned upside down when their names cause all three to end up in the wrong places. They are also on the run from Inspector Mayawati Chautala (Neetu Chandra), who also has a crush on Laxmi Narayan 2. 
Born on 28 September 1883 in Brunswick a suburb of Melbourne in Victoria, Australia, Barnett was the son of working class parents. He attended the Albert Street Primary School until 1898 when he  joined the Education Department, initially as monitor, and eventually as student-teacher. He resigned in 1902, to become a clerk in the civil service. By 1920 he had qualified as a public accountant and established his own practice. 
For the remainder of his life, Oswald Barnett retained a strong interest in social reform. He remained an important figure in the Methodist Church, as a lay preacher and author of religious tracts. He also wrote several volumes of poetry and a book of revised nursery rhymes. In 1959 Barnett married Florence Fowles, his first wife having died in 1956. He formally retired from his accountancy firm in 1962, and died at Box Hill on 3 May 1972. 
Milutin Krunich was a patriotic Serbian lieutenant and author whose stories were used to create a Serbophil sentiment in America leading up to the American entry into World War I. 
A patriotic Serbian book Serbia Crucified: The Beginning in 1918 was written with the help of Leah Marie Bruce from Berkeley California. It was reviewed in The Survey in 1918. It was reviewed again in 1919. 
Tempter is the debut album by the Dutch death metal band Nembrionic Hammerdeath. It was released in 1993 as a split CD with Consolation's debut album Beautyfilth by Displeased Records. Later, it was re-issued by itself. 
Trancers  started out as an homage to pulp detective novels, with noted similarities to other cult sci-fi movies, such as Blade Runner and The Terminator (the latter of which was released the same year). In the series, time travel is initially made possible using a drug that sends the person into the consciousness of a relation, but expanded to include the pre-set co-ordinates of a time machine, with the fourth and fifth films introducing other means of time travel between other dimensions. 
Deth appears in all the films, while Trancers 6 only has archive footage of Thomerson and a double body played by Christopher Farrell is used for some scenes. Zette Sullivan plays his daughter, Josephine, whom Jack is inside. 
Jack Deth is a cop who, originally was from the 23rd century, c. 2247 in Angel City (the renamed Los Angeles, following an earthquake). Jack was married to a woman called Alice B. Stillwell, who was also his partner, until she was killed by zombie like enemies called "Trancers" after an operation went wrong. 
Jack was extracted from his mission by his supervisor McNulty when Ashe become frantic over the deaths of the other council members, but Ashe allowed Jack to continue when he explained how he was close to finding Ashby, her ancestor. Immediately after Jack returns to his ancestor's body, he spots Whistler on TV being interviewed and learns that Ashby is on Skid Row. 
Jack and Lena steal a couple of motor cycles from a punk who had bothered them earlier in a nightclub and they go to Skid Row where they track down Ashby and help him to escape from Whistler and his goons. Lena is shot by one of the tranced cops, enduring a minor injury, but manages to reunite with Jack and Ashby at their hideout. Jack is worried about losing Lena, as he explains how he lost his wife back home in Angel City. 
In Trancers III, in 1992, Jack and Lena were on the verge of divorcing, due to their failing marriage. Although Jack promised to amend their relationship, he was forcefully returned to the future by the android Shark before he could fulfill this. 
Jack is injured trying to escape from these new bloodsuckers, and passes out in the woods. He is found by a kindly peasant, who nurses him back to health and then sends out a carrier pigeon, alerting Caliban of his whereabouts and therefore betraying Jack. The man is killed, however, when the Trancers show up with Caliban, despite being loyal to Caliban, and Jack is captured after his time freezer watch fails to do its job, resulting in the Trancers humoring his predicament. 
Unfortunately, one of Caliban's men uses an art work of Caliban to somehow bring him back during Trancers 5: Sudden Deth, in which Thomerson makes his final appearance in the canon. 
After dealing with a renegade Trancer at her place of employment, Josephine visits her friend Dr. Paul Malvern for help. They fend off an attack by Trancers, but end up being captured and forced to work for Miss Wilder, with Josephine narrowly managing to avoid being tranced with the meteor ray herself. Josephine just pretends to be a Trancer, so that this buys her more time. 
Josephine returns to Castle's office, to see Castle is quickly destroying evidence using a paper shredder. Just before he is revealed for what he really is, Mr. Castle warns Josephine that killing him would be pointless, as there are many more just like him in the universe controlling thousands. Yet Josephine shoots him anyway, exposing his true alien form. 
With the Trancers having been wiped out again, Jack decided to remain in the guise of his daughter, in case the Trancers should come looking for her now that she's wanted by them. But as seen in the end sequence, the Trancer kid with an eye missing survived, possibly indicating that a new threat could be looming. 
Thomerson (as Jack Deth) appeared in the 2006 movie, Evil Bong, briefly talking to someone in a dream-like state. Other Full Moon-related characters also appear in this film, including Ivan Burroughs from Decadent Evil and the cackling Jack Attack from the Demonic Toys movies, although Evil Bong isn't canonical. 
His other supervisor "Lyra" (Stacie Randall) later supplies him with a new gun that can be powered naturally with sand, small rocks, et cetera. He also receives a new wrist watch that can still slow down time, but with unlimited use. However, this trick backfires on him in Orpheus because Orpheus uses magic, as well as Jack going through dimensional portals. 
The most important item he receives from Lyra is an ordinary looking switchblade, that is designed so it can cut through just about anything. This saves his life on more than one occasion. Jack Deth is a fan of vintage cars, and is also a smoker, as Jack (as Josephine) receives a case which includes a pack of cigarettes. 
Trancers 6 tries to be like the original Trancers, by only including the original movie's time freezer watch. Although, including this is probably a plot hole, as Trancers 6 ignores parts 4 and 5 completely and, therefore, it does not make sense to be using the old one. 
Wyms, who earned a Super Bowl ring with the Buccaneers in Super Bowl XXXVII, has also played for the Seattle Seahawks, Minnesota Vikings and Florida Tuskers. 
Wyms went to Mississippi State and played as a Bulldog. He racked up 120 career tackles, with 69 solo tackles. He also collected 10 quarterback sacks in just 40 career games for the Mississippi State Bulldogs. Wyms started on the defensive line eight times as a senior. Wyms was the Bulldogs' top reserve player. In his first career start, against Oklahoma State, Wyms racked up six tackles. He majored in technology and education. 
Wyms was drafted by the Tampa Bay Buccaneers with the 183rd pick of the 2001 NFL Draft, in the sixth round. In his first season, he played in four games (at the Detroit Lions, vs. the New Orleans Saints, vs. the Baltimore Ravens, and vs. the Philadelphia Eagles. However, he did not start until the Philadelphia Eagles playoff game in which the Buccaneers lost. 
He signed with the Seattle Seahawks before the 2007 season. He appeared in 13 games (no starts) for the team and recorded 11 tackles. He became a free agent after the season. 
On March 17, 2008, Wyms signed a one-year contract with the Minnesota Vikings worth $1.5 million and including a $500,000 signing bonus. 
Wyms contributes to the community through the "Strong Minds, Strong Bodies" program. Ellis Wyms is also the founder of The Wyms Foundation. The program provides monthly reading activities and career advice to underprivileged children in the city of Tampa. He also participates in many community activities. In high school, he recorded 124 tackles and 7 sacks. Wyms is married to real estate consultant DeeDee Wyms. 
South Dakota Highway 40A was a short spur route in the east part of Badlands National Park.  This route was originally part of South Dakota Highway 40.  At that time, SD 40 exited the park to the northeast, and continued east with U.S. Highway 16.  Around 1970, SD 40 was rerouted south from the park to a new alignment south of the White River.  When this was done, SD 40A was created to link with Alternate U.S. Highway 16. 
Christopher "Christoph" Sanders (born April 21, 1988) is an American actor who is best known for his role as Ned Banks in the television series Ghost Whisperer and Kyle Anderson in the sitcom Last Man Standing on ABC (2011-2017) and FOX (2018-2021). 
He has recently appeared in the music video of "Old Town Road" with Lil Nas X and Billy Ray Cyrus. He was cast as Kyle Anderson in the Last Man Standing tv show starring Tim Allen. His character was initially the boyfriend of the eldest daughter of Tim Allen's character, but after Season 1 the producers aged the eldest daughter to play a more motherly role. Sanders' character eventually became the boyfriend, and later husband, to the middle daughter. 
An avid outdoorsman, Sanders enjoys such activities as hiking, camping, and surfing. He also describes himself as "a pretty great cook." 
Raphitoma boutillieri is an extinct species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusc in the family Raphitomidae. 
The combined transmission spectrum of TRAPPIST-1 b and c rules out a cloud-free hydrogen-dominated atmosphere for each planet, so they are unlikely to harbor an extended gas envelope. Other atmospheres, from a cloud-free water-vapor atmosphere to a Venus-like atmosphere, remain consistent with the featureless spectrum. 
In 2018, the composition of TRAPPIST-1c was determined, and has been found to be rock-based with a very thick, Venus-like atmosphere. The atmosphere of TRAPPIST-1c is likely thinner than that of TRAPPIST-1b. 
This Saskatchewan road, road transport or highway-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Balangoda is situated in the hilly central region of central Sri Lanka on Sabaragamuwa Mountain Range. The main livelihoods of this region are farming (vegetables, fruits, and spices), rice cultivation for mainly local consumption, tea cultivation for international markets as a commercial crop and gem mining. 
This Sabaragamuwa Province, Sri Lanka location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"The Waxies' Dargle" is a traditional Irish folk song about two Dublin "aul' wans" (ladies) discussing how to find money to go on an excursion. It is named after an annual outing to Ringsend, near Dublin city, by Dublin cobblers (waxies). It originated as a 19th-century children's song and is now a popular pub song in Ireland. 
In the 19th century, during the Summer, the gentry of Dublin would travel out to Bray and Enniskerry with their entourages and have picnics on the banks of the River Dargle. The Dargle was a popular holiday resort, and the name in Dublin slang became synonymous with "holiday resort". 
Their destination was a favourite resort for Dubliners, a grass-covered triangle near the sea-front at Irishtown. On Summer evenings fiddlers, flautists and melodeon players played dance music (sets, half-sets and reels) until midnight. There was a roaring trade in porter, cockles and mussels and "treacle Billy". On Bank holidays there were boxing contests. 
There is an engraved stone, marking the location of the Waxies' Dargle "picnic" site near Gleesons Pub in Irishtown. 
Robert Gogan describes how the "Waxies' Dargle" focuses on working-class Dublin. The places referenced are in areas frequented by the poor. Monto was an area around Montgomery Street, a notorious red-light district near the centre of Dublin. Capel Street is on the north side of the city and was renowned for its pawnbroking shops, a few of which remain to this day. 
The Waxies' Dargle is also mentioned in another Dublin folk song, "Monto (Take Her Up to Monto)", written by George Desmond Hodnett. 
The Waxies' Dargle is referenced in the Aeolus episode of the novel Ulysses by James Joyce. The character Myles Crawford refers to the two old ladies on top of Nelson's pillar as being "Out for the waxies' Dargle". 
At 16 years of age, Henriques was selected for the Australian U-19 cricket team's squad for the 2004 U-19 Cricket World Cup in Bangladesh, where he took 11 wickets at 19.27 and scored 95 runs at 19.00. 
In September 2005, Henriques was named in Australia's U-19 squad to tour India for a One Day series against the Indian U-19 cricket team. Whilst Australia lost the series, in difficult conditions, Henriques was a stand out. He scored 132 runs at an average of 44.00 and claimed 8 wickets at 18.25. 
Henriques was named captain of the Australian U-19 team for the 2006 U-19 Cricket World Cup in Sri Lanka, and performed to great acclaim as he led the Australians to a semi-final berth. He was a stand out player of the tournament, scoring 150 runs at 37.50 and finished as the World Cup's leading wicket-taker, claiming 16 wickets at 10.52 in 5 matches. 
During his time in the Australian U-19 team, he played 17 matches, taking 35 wickets at 15.08 and scored 377 runs at an average of 31.41. 
Moises Henriques is the joint leading wicket taker along with Greg Thompson in the history of Under-19 Cricket World Cup with 27 scalps. 
On 2 January 2006, Henriques made his List A debut for New South Wales against Victoria. He bowled 8 overs for 46 runs in a narrow New South Wales victory. His appearance, at only 18 years of age, made him the youngest ever List A debutant for New South Wales. Six days later, Henriques made his Twenty20 debut, but did not bat or bowl in that match. 
He was signed by the Kolkata Knight Riders franchise for $300,000 to play in the Indian Premier League during the 2009 season. In 2010, he was traded to the Delhi Daredevils in exchange for Manoj Tiwary. 
In September 2012 he scored his first first-class century, 161 not out off 229 balls against Tasmania at Bankstown.[citation needed] 
Since then, he has produced some very consistent performances with both bat and ball, a highlight recently in the Matador One Day Cup where he scored 131 against Victoria which was his first List A century. He is the captain of NSW. He is injured but will return towards the end of November. 
In June 2015, while playing for Surrey in a NatWest t20 Blast game against Sussex Sharks at Arundel Castle, Henriques collided with teammate Rory Burns while attempting to take a catch.  Both players were knocked unconscious from the collision and Henriques suffered a broken jaw.  Ambulances and medical staff treated the players on-field before taking them both to hospital. The game was abandoned due to the injuries. 
In July 2019, he was selected to play for the Glasgow Giants in the inaugural edition of the Euro T20 Slam cricket tournament. However, the following month the tournament was cancelled. He was released by the Kings XI Punjab ahead of the 2020 IPL auction. In February 2021, Henriques was bought by the Punjab Kings in the IPL auction ahead of the 2021 Indian Premier League. 
In the Big Bash League, Henriques captained Sydney Sixers to consecutive title victories in 2019-20 and 2020-21 seasons. He was also a part of the winning squad in the inagural BBL final in 2011-12, where he scored 70(41) in the final. 
In 2018, Henriques revealed he was suffering from depression and stepped down as captain of New South Wales. 
A genuine all-rounder, Henriques states that he "couldn't choose" between batting and bowling as his preferred art. Despite this, some have commented that his bowling is slightly better than his batting. As a right-handed batsman, Henriques bats in the middle to lower order, and as a right-arm medium-fast bowler he generally opens the attack. His style has been compared to Australian Shane Watson, but Henriques looks to South African all-rounder Jacques Kallis as a source of inspiration. 
On 19 June, Barcelona announced the signing of Memphis Depay from Olympique Lyonnais on a free transfer. 
On 1 July, Lionel Messi's contract expired amidst negotiations to sign a new contract, effectively making Messi a free agent. 
Despite reaching an agreement with Messi and having planned to sign a contract on 5 August, the club announced that Messi wouldn't stay at the club due to financial and structural obstacles posed by La Liga regulations. He subsequently joined Paris Saint-Germain F.C. on 10 August. 
On 28 October, Barcelona announced the dismissal of Ronald Koeman as the first team coach, ending his spell at the club after 14 months. 
On 12 November, Barcelona announced an agreement in principle to sign former right-back Dani Alves on a free transfer. The Brazilian will officially return to the club in January 2022 during the Winter Transfer Window. 
Source: fcbarcelona.comOrdered by ,  and  = Number of bookings;  = Number of sending offs after a second yellow card;  = Number of sending offs by a direct red card. 
 - Player is injured   - Player has recovered from injury Last updated: 5 November 2021Source: FC Barcelona 
According to Ricardo J. Goenaga, the director of the TARS, the main goal of the scientists at the station is the development of fruit production systems that help growers to increase the market and the sales potential of the crops. 
Currently, the TARS contains one of the best and well-documented tropical plant collections in the Western Hemisphere, consisting of more than 2,000 permanently cultivated species, both tropical fruits and ornamental plants. 
Homeboy Industries began in 1988 as a job training program (called Jobs for a Future)  out of Dolores Mission Parish in Boyle Heights, Los Angeles, California, USA.  It was created by then-pastor Greg Boyle to offer an alternative to gang life for high-risk youth, who were living in a city (Los Angeles) with the highest concentration of gang activity in the country. In those early days, Boyle found sympathetic businesses that agreed to hire recovering gang members. 
In 1992, an abandoned warehouse was converted into the first business, Homeboy Bakery, to create more opportunities for employment. The Bakery started off producing tortillas and eventually received a contract for baking bread. Eventually more businesses were added, and in 2001, Homeboy Industries became an independent non-profit. "Nothing stops a bullet like a job" is the guiding principle. 
Dolores Mission Alternative School was created to offer high school drop outs a chance for a diploma. In 2010, Learning Works became the new high school. There are currently 75 students enrolled, and in 2012 enrollment is expected to reach 105. 
In addition to jobs, Homeboy Industries offers training in anger management, domestic violence, yoga, spiritual development, parenting, substance abuse, budgeting, art and other areas of self-development. In addition, they offer free mental health counseling, tattoo removal, legal services, job development and case management. 
In 2014, the Global Homeboy Network was founded to work with other organizations to provide similar programs and the social enterprise employment structure across the globe. Father Greg hopes organizations will not duplicate Homeboy Industries, but seek to creating a community and a place of welcome to those in trouble. 
The growing number of ex-gang members and prisoners had quickly outnumbered the amount of available jobs at Homeboy Industries. According to Father Boyle, Homeboy Industries laid off approximately 330 employees in 2010, including senior staff and administrators. Homeboy Industries failed to generate its $5 million needed to operate. In order to rehabilitate their finances, Homeboy Industries created "Homeboy Groceries" in January 2011, consisting of foods such as chips, salsa, and guacamole. 
Because of Homeboy's new partnerships and job opportunities that Homeboy Grocery has provided, Homeboy Industries is continuing to operate. 
Homeboy Groceries goods are currently available in the DELI section at Ralphs, Gelson's, Walmart, and Stop & Shop. 
In 2007, an independent documentary titled Father G. and the Homeboys was released about the organization and what it did for ex-gang members. 
Homeboy Industries made its first foray into the mainstream market with its salsa being sold at Ralphs Supermarket. 
In 2007, Boyle appeared in an episode of MTV's True Life, which followed an employee of Homeboy Industries named Dennis. 
Members of Homeboy Industries were also shown in the music video for Daughtry's "What About Now" in July 2008. 
For his work with Homeboy Industries, Boyle received the 2008 James Irvine Foundation Leadership Award". 
Boyle was named the 2016 Humanitarian of the Year by the James Beard Foundation, a national culinary-arts organization. 
The 2017 Laetare Medal, a prestigious annual award given by the University of Notre Dame to an American Catholic, was awarded to Boyle. 
Homeboy's 2019 "Lo Maximo" award ceremony was hosted by actresses Jane Fonda and Lily Tomlin and celebrated notable allies of Homeboy Industries, including former California Governor Jerry Brown, who was presented with the 2019 "Kinship Award". 
Leriche, a largely self-taught filmmaker, made a number of short films and worked as an educator with film and video training programs for homeless youth and First Nations, before writing and directing Before the Streets. Her most noted short film, The Schoolyard (Les Grands), was named to the Toronto International Film Festival's annual Canada's Top Ten list for short films in 2007. 
Before the Streets won the Borsos Competition award for best picture, and Leriche won the award for best director, at the 2016 Whistler Film Festival. At the 2016 Directors Guild of Canada awards, Leriche won the DGC Discovery Award. 
Roger Huerta (born May 20, 1983) is an American mixed martial artist currently fighting in the lightweight division. He initially gained exposure by competing in the lightweight division of the Ultimate Fighting Championship, Bellator Fighting Championships and later ONE Championship. 
Ashford coached Huerta and with the help of Ramirez, aided him in applying for a collegiate wrestling scholarship. Huerta attends Augsburg University in Minneapolis, Minnesota with one year remaining in a Business Management bachelor's degree and resided in St. Paul, Minnesota. 
In Huerta's pre-UFC career, his first loss came as a result of a dislocated jaw early in the finals of the SuperBrawl 36 tournament against Ryan Schultz on June 18, 2004, his third match of the day. 
Huerta was originally slated to make his UFC debut against Hermes Franca at UFC 61, but was forced to withdraw from the fight as the result of an elbow injury. He won his first six fights in the UFC, the first at UFC 63 against Jason Dent, which was declared "Fight of the Night". 
His next fight was against UFC newcomer John Halverson at UFC 67. The fight ended by TKO after 19 seconds of round one after Huerta landed a knee to the shoulder/head area of a grounded Halverson, knocking him down and finishing him with punches. The end of the bout was controversial as knees to the head of grounded opponents are illegal under UFC rules. It was later shown in a replay that Huerta's knee was actually to the shoulder rather than to the head. 
Next he fought in a three-round war with Leonard Garcia at UFC 69. winning via unanimous decision. After the fight, in May 2007, Huerta became the first mixed martial artist to appear on the cover of Sports Illustrated Magazine, for a story on the rising popularity of mixed martial arts. 
On January 9, 2009, Huerta announced an indefinite hiatus from MMA to further pursue opportunities in acting. 
In order to complete his UFC contract, Huerta returned on September 16, 2009, but lost to Gray Maynard at UFC Fight Night 19. After a back-and-forth fight, he would end up losing a split decision in his bout against Maynard. 
Despite having previously announced on his personal Twitter account that he was in talks with Strikeforce, Huerta eventually signed with Bellator Fighting Championships. He was one of eight men to compete in the second season lightweight tournament, with the winner receiving a title shot against Eddie Alvarez. 
His first fight in the tournament took place at Bellator 13.  Huerta defeated opponent Chad Hinton via submission (kneebar) at 0:56 of the third round. 
His second fight in the tournament took place at Bellator 17. Huerta lost the semi-final to Pat Curran by a controversial unanimous decision (29-28 from all three judges). 
However, on August 12 it was announced that Huerta would be fighting Bellator Lightweight Champion Eddie Alvarez, after Curran had to pull out of the fight due to a slap tear in his right shoulder. The Lightweight belt was not on the line when the two met on October 21, 2010 at Bellator 33 in Philadelphia. He lost the fight via doctor stoppage at the end of the 2nd round. 
Huerta fought against War Machine in a welterweight bout in the main event of Ultimate Warrior Fighting 1. Huerta lost the fight via TKO after he suffered a fractured rib during the final scramble in the third round where he rolled out of War Machine's submission armbar attempts to claim side control. From there, War Machine escaped from Huerta's side mount to directly take full mount with ease. Machine then rained down punches for the referee stoppage at three minutes and nine seconds. 
Huerta signed with the Asian-based promotion ONE Championship in 2012.  He was scheduled to fight Phil Baroni in a welterweight bout at ONE FC: Destiny of Warriors on June 23 but Baroni was pulled from the fight after suffering a TKO loss in a fight 3 weeks before the event. Huerta instead fought Zorobabel Moreira at the event, and was defeated via KO (soccer kick) in the second round. 
After two years away from the sport, Huerta returned to One FC on August 29, 2014. He faced undefeated Christian Holley at ONE FC: Reign of Champions and won the fight via TKO in the first round. 
After seven-and-a-half years away from the promotion, Huerta re-signed with Bellator MMA for one fight in 2018. He faced Benson Henderson in the main event at Bellator 196 on April 6, 2018. Huerta lost the bout via submission in the second round. 
Huerta faced Patricky Freire on September 21, 2018 at Bellator 205. He lost the fight via knockout in the second round. 
Huerta faced Sidney Outlaw at Bellator 234 on November 14, 2019. He lost the fight via unanimous decision. 
Huerta faced Chris Gonzalez at Bellator 255 on April 2, 2021. He lost the bout after tapping due to strikes in the third round. 
Huerta trained for his UFC fight against Kenny Florian with Greg Jackson's Submission Fighting. For his Bellator debut, he spent time in Thailand and put together a training camp with MMA fighters such as Yves Edwards (UFC), Shad Lierley (Bellator), Jared Hess (Bellator), Dave Menne, and Jeff Clark out of the Phil Cardella / Relson Gracie Academy in Austin, Texas. 
Huerta made his acting debut as Miguel Caballero Rojo in the live action motion picture Tekken. He also starred alongside Kimbo Slice, Frank Mir, and Heath Herring in Circle of Pain, a 2010 direct-to-video film. 
In August 2010, Huerta engaged in a street fight outside of a bar at approximately 2 A.M. CST in Austin, Texas. Video footage provided by TMZ shows a man alleged to be Huerta is seen exchanging words with and defending himself against a man, Rashad Bobino, a former Texas Longhorns linebacker, who had just assaulted a woman. 
Gil was made a Commander of the Order of Isabella the Catholic in 2014. Receiving the honor in Prague, she recalled the circumstances of her long exile. 
On 27 March 2014, she was granted the Title of Ambassador of Mas de las Matas and the Medal of the Faithful Villa of Mas de las Matas. 
Bagdad is located along the historic U.S. Route 66, east of Barstow and Ludlow, and west of Amboy and Needles. 
The town was founded in 1883 when the Atchison, Topeka and Santa Fe Railway railway line between Barstow and Needles was built. At this time, Bagdad provided services to the Orange Blossom Mine several miles to the north, and to the War Eagle Mine several miles to the south. In addition, a dirt track extended south past the War Eagle Mine into the Dale Mining District in the Pinto Mountains. 
Bagdad was long a thriving town along the National Old Trails Road and the famous Route 66. It was bypassed by the opening of Interstate 40 to the north in 1973, and lost traveler's business and resident population. 
Bagdad holds the record for the longest dry streak in United States history with 767 straight days without rain, from October 3, 1912 to November 8, 1914. It is to the south of the Granite Mountains and the Mojave National Preserve, and north of the Bullion Mountains. 
A small airfield known as the Bagdad Intermediate Field was built south of the town, immediately south of Route 66. It was operational in 1932, with abandonment between 1954-1958.  A small, red concrete pad that was formerly the base of the airway beacon tower is all that remains. 
Cuerna is a genus of insect in the leafhopper family described in 1924 and accepted in 1925. There are 26 species in this genus. They can be found in North America from Canada and Alaska to Panama, but the highest diversity of species is in the southwestern United States. 
He won a gold medal in the fours at the 1958 British Empire and Commonwealth Games in Cardiff with Norman King, John Scadgell and Walter Phillips. 
This biographical article relating to United Kingdom lawn or indoor bowls is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
George Dean Johnson Jr. (born July 22, 1942) is an American politician in the state of South Carolina. Brought up in Spartanburg, he served in the South Carolina House of Representatives from 1969 to 1974, elected as Democratic, Republican and Independent, representing Spartanburg County, South Carolina. He is a lawyer. 
George D. Johnson Jr. founded multiple companies, including Extended Stay America, Advance America Cash Advance, and Johnson Waste, which was later sold to Waste Management, Incorporated. 
William Balloch Stirling Naughton (born 20 March 1962) is a Scottish former professional footballer who played in the Football League as a Left winger. 
In August 2009, two extrasolar planets, HD 147018 b and HD 147018 c, were reported to be orbiting this star. The planets were found using the radial velocity method, using the CORALIE spectrograph at La Silla Observatory, Chile. 
The village was established in 1980 as part of the "Lookouts in the Galilee" plan, with residents initially living in prefabricated homes imported from South Africa. It was originally named Mitzpe Ziv after Har Ziv, the mountain on which it was built. It was later renamed Mitzpe Hila. 
Katyusha and Grad rockets fired by Hezbollah in the 1990s landed in the village, as did more rockets during the 2006 Lebanon War against Hezbollah. Otherwise it is a popular retreat for "internal tourism": Israelis seeking bed and breakfasts or rental cabins. 
The North American F-82 Twin Mustang is the last American piston-engined fighter ordered into production by the United States Air Force. Based on the North American P-51 Mustang, the F-82 was originally designed as a long-range escort fighter for the Boeing B-29 Superfortress in World War II. The war ended well before the first production units were operational. 
The XP-82 prototypes, and production P-82Bs and P-82Es, retained both fully equipped cockpits so that pilots could fly the aircraft from either position, alternating control on long flights, while later night fighter versions kept the cockpit on the left side only, placing the radar operator in the right position. 
Although some P-82B airframes were completed before the end of World War II, most remained at the North American factory in California waiting for engines until 1946. As a result, none saw service during the war. 
It remains the longest nonstop flight ever made by a propeller-driven fighter, and the fastest such a distance has ever been covered in a piston-engine aircraft. The aircraft chosen was an earlier "B" model powered by Rolls-Royce Merlin engines (see "Surviving aircraft" below). 
Until jet interceptors could be developed and put into service, the Twin Mustangs already built were seen as an interim solution to SAC's fighter escort mission for its strategic bomber force and also as an all-weather air defense interceptor. 
On 11 June 1948, the newly formed United States Air Force replaced the P-for-pursuit category with F-for-fighter. All P-82s were then re-designated F-82. 
The F-82E was the first operational model and its initial operational assignment was to the Strategic Air Command 27th Fighter (later Fighter-Escort) Wing at Kearney Air Force Base, Nebraska in March 1948. 
Four F-82s were deployed from McChord to Alaska, where the pilots provided transition training to the 449th Fighter (All Weather) Squadron, which used Twin Mustangs in the air defense mission. They remained in Alaska for about 45 days, returning to rejoin the rest of the group at the beginning of November 1948. 
In early 1949, the 27th began carrying out long-range escort profile missions. Flights to Puerto Rico, Mexico, the Bahamas and nonstop to Washington, D.C. were carried out. For President Truman's 1949 inauguration, the 27th FEW launched 48 aircraft to fly in review, along with several other fighter units, in formation down Pennsylvania Avenue. Another flyover of the newly dedicated Idlewild Airport in New York City soon followed, with the aircraft flying non-stop from Kearney AFB. 
The appearance of the Soviet Tupolev Tu-4 in 1947 posed a new threat to postwar USAAF planners, and with the start of the Cold War in 1948, led to the establishment of Air Defense Command (ADC) in the United States Air Force. 
The radar-equipped wartime Northrop P-61 Black Widow night fighter was found to be effective in locating and attacking the incoming SAC bombers, and also had the range to attack the bombers far from their intended targets. With no suitable jet interceptors, the P-61 transitioned to the ADC interceptor mission. Available F-61s were war-weary and night fighter F-82C/D models were modified into all-weather interceptors to replace them. 
The first F-82Fs began reaching ADC squadrons in September 1948. By the end of September, ADC had 29 F-82Fs. By the middle of 1949 the F-82 was replacing Black Widows in service with Air Defense Command along the west coast at Hamilton AFB, California (317th FIS) and McChord AFB, Washington (318th FIS, 319th FIS). East coast defense was the mission of the Twin Mustangs assigned to McGuire AFB, New Jersey (2d FIS, 5th FIS). 
In addition to the forces in the Continental United States, the Caribbean Air Command 319th FIS at France Field in the Panama Canal Zone received 15 F-82Fs in December 1948 to replace Black Widows for defending the Panama Canal but remained there only briefly before being reassigned to McChord AFB in May 1949. 
1951 was the last full year of F-82 operations in Korea, as they were gradually replaced by the jet-powered F-94 Starfire. USAF claimed the Twin Mustangs destroyed 20 enemy aircraft, four in the air and 16 on the ground during the conflict. 
During the Korean war, 22 F-82s were lost, including 11 in combat missions and 11 non-combat losses. 
Modified F-82F/Gs for cold weather were designated as F-82H. Six were assigned initially to the 449th F(AW)S at Adak Island in December 1948 to replace their P-61 Black Widows in the Alaska Air Defense mission. The Twin Mustang was well-suited for the air defense mission in Alaska due to its long-range flying ability. In March 1949, the squadron was reassigned to Ladd AFB, near Fairbanks, where an additional eight (14 total) arrived. 
Beginning in spring 1950, Strategic Air Command began replacing their F-82E bomber escorts and throughout the year, several were transferred to the 449th in Alaska. In February 1951, the Air Force ordered Alaskan Air Command that all the remaining F-82s in the Air Force inventory would all be transferred to Alaska. The Twin Mustangs would be used to support Army units in air-to-ground operations, and to use the F-94 Starfires for interceptor duty. 
During 1951 and 1952, F-82Fs from the Air Defense Command 52d Fighter Group at McGuire AFB and 325th Fighter Group at McChord AFB were winterized and flown to Ladd AFB as replacements when those units transitioned to the F-94. 
F-82Gs from Far East Air Force were also sent to Alaska, as jets took over combat duties over the skies of Korea. The FEAF F-82s, however, arrived in a badly corroded condition. Also, many of these aircraft which were sent to the 449th had high time on their airframes from long bomber escort and air defense flights, as well as the stress from combat duty in Korea causing many of them to be difficult to maintain. After four months at the 39th Air Depot Wing at Elmendorf, most were scrapped. 
Some of the planes in storage at Robins and McChord were turned over to museums as static displays. Also after the end of their USAF service, the National Advisory Committee for Aeronautics (NACA) acquired four F-82s for research. 
The Air Force accepted a total of 272 F-82s (including 22 prototype, test and early production aircraft). All examples were redesignated as F-82 in 1948. Specifically, the F-82 program consisted of two XF-82s, one XF-82A, 10 F-82Bs (known for a while as P-82Zs and all allocated to testing), four F-82As, 96 F-82Es, 91 F-82Fs, 45 F-82Gs and 14 F-82Hs.  All models and variants of the P-82 were produced at North American's Inglewood, California manufacturing plant. 
In 1955 the Chronicle was merged into the Empire News. The Empire News itself disappeared in 1960 when it was merged with the News of the World. 
http://www.deadtide.com/reviews/albums/page.php?id=2396  http://www.lordsofmetal.nl/en/reviews/view/id/5030 
All episodes of the first season are named after notable films of different eras. For the first half of the second season, all the episodes are named after notable songs. The second half of the second season features episodes named after novels. During the course of the series, 36 episodes of Finding Carter aired over two seasons. 
The smallest animal yet to carry Crittercam is the emperor penguin. Information and footage from Crittercam was used in the Oscar-winning documentary March of the Penguins. 
At Museum of Science (Boston), there is an exhibit on Crittercam. The exhibit will soon travel to other museums. The exhibit allows people to participate in interactive displays and models. 
We Got the Rhythm is the second studio album recorded by American funk band The People's Choice, released in 1976 on the TSOP label. 
The album peaked at No. 38 on the R&B albums chart. It also reached No. 174 on the Billboard 200. The album features the single, "Here We Go Again", which peaked at No. 52 on the Hot Soul Singles chart. "Movin' in All Directions" also charted at No. 52 on the Hot Soul Singles chart. 
Colombia competed at the Summer Deaflympics for the first time in 1969. Colombia also won its only Deaflympics medal to date that same year. Colombia has never participated in the Winter Deaflympics. 
Ryan Turnbull MP (born July 15, 1977) is a Canadian politician and social innovation consultant who was elected to represent the riding of Whitby in the House of Commons of Canada in the 2019 Canadian federal election. 
As a teenager, he took intensive leadership training which inspired him to dedicate his life to one of service to community. He went on to study philosophy and applied ethics for 8 years earning both a Bachelor's Degree (with High Honours) and a Master's Degree from Carleton University. 
He has taught, developed curriculum and overseen research at a number of post-secondary institutions, including Carleton University, Sogang University, University of London (St. Georges Medical School), Ryerson University and Durham College. He has also taught business ethics and corporate social responsibility at Ted Rogers School of Business Management for several years. 
Turnbull founded a management consulting company focused on social innovation and ethics. His company, Eco-Ethonomics Inc. has managed more than 350 projects focused on employing social innovation methods to addressing complex and systemic problems like systemic poverty, racism, and gender equality. 
This article about an Ontario Member of Parliament is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Short Trips: A Christmas Treasury is a Big Finish original anthology edited by Paul Cornell and based on the long-running British science fiction television series Doctor Who. The collection is the first Christmas book in the Short Trips range. 
Philotheca queenslandica is a species of flowering plant in the family Rutaceae and is endemic to south-eastern Queensland. It is a wiry shrub with elliptic to egg-shaped leaves with the narrower end toward the base and densely crowded near the ends of the glandular-warty branchlets, and cream-coloured flowers tinged with pink and arranged singly in leaf axils. 
This philotheca was first formally described in 1942 by Cyril Tenison White who gave it the name Eriostemon queenslandicus and published the description in the Proceedings of the Royal Society of Queensland. In 2005 Paul Irwin Forster changed the name to Philotheca queenslandica in the journal Austrobaileya. 
Philotheca queenslandica grows in wallum heathland in moist or seasonally flooded, boggy or sandy soil. It is found in south-eastern Queensland between Boonooroo and Bribie Island. 
Philotheca queenslandica is classified as of "least concern" under the Queensland Government Nature Conservation Act 1992. 
Stephanie Frazier Stacy (born April 23, 1962) is an American judge who is an associate justice of the Nebraska Supreme Court. She previously served as a judge on the Third District Court from 2011 to 2015. Stacy was appointed to the state's supreme court by the Governor of Nebraska Pete Ricketts in August 2015. 
In October 2011, Stacy was appointed as a judge by the Governor of Nebraska Dave Heineman, serving on the state's Third District Court, which is responsible for Lancaster County, Nebraska. She was retained to the 3rd District with 77.8% of votes for a new judicial term on November 4. 2014. 
Governor Pete Ricketts appointed Stacy to the Nebraska Supreme Court in 2015, to replace retiring justice Kenneth Stephan in representing the 1st Judicial District. Stacy's appointment was announced on August 14, and she was sworn in on September 28, 2015. Justice Stacy's current term on the court ends in January 2019, and she is eligible to run for re-election in November 2018, for a new six-year term.[needs update] 
The 1986 Ms. Olympia contest was an IFBB professional bodybuilding competition was held on November 19, 1986, at the Felt Forum in Madison Square Garden in New York City, New York. It was the 7th Ms. Olympia competition held. 
Xavier Vilalta (born May 8, 1980) is a Spanish architect and professor. He studied architecture in Barcelona, London, and the Illinois Institute of Technology in Chicago. 
Vilalta combines practice with teaching and lecturing in cultural institutions and venues. He has taught as a professor at Barcelona Tech ETSAB and the University of Lleida. 
In 2004 he founded the design firm Vilalta Studio in Barcelona, Spain. With his team, Vilalta developed his early work in Spain followed by international projects in emerging countries in Africa and the Middle East. 
His projects have been recognized by international awards such as the Young Architect of the year at the Leaf Awards 2008, and two consecutive awards, 2009 and 2010, the SAIE Selection of the energy exhibition of Bologna in Italy for the sustainability of his projects. In 2011, he became a Fellow of TED (Technology, Entertainment, Design). 
Xavier Vilalta's work focuses on nature and people as well as how to reconnect the two thinking about our contemporary urban life as part of the environment where Architecture grows from the local natural conditions and traditions. 
He is interested in vernacular architecture related to sustainability. He defines sustainability as the relationship between Architecture and the program it contains and its social values, the way it is designed and built and how it will perform in the future. 
Steam trams began operation in the system in 1884, under the name Steam Tramway Brno. In the 1900s, the conversion from steam to electrical power began, but steam locomotives were still used, until 1914, to transport goods. 
Within the first year of operation several new lines were constructed, and soon a total of five lines were offered as part of the system. In 1914, Company Brno began to experience financial difficulties and was taken over by the Austrian electricity delivery group Aktiengesellschaft from Vienna. During World War I further expansion was considered, resulting in the extension of one line to a hospital. 
Pandora is a female Mexican singing trio. The trio was formed in 1981 under the name Trebol by sisters Isabel Lascurain and Mayte Lascurain and their cousin Fernanda Meade. The trio was renamed "Pandora" upon signing with EMI Records in 1984. 
From 1981 to 1984 the trio established itself doing backup vocals for artists such as Emmanuel and Pedro Vargas (who is the sisters' godfather), and backup vocals for the group Timbiriche. On November 29, 1984, the trio signed a record deal with EMI and became Mexico's first all-female musical trio in thirty years. The artistic director of EMI Capitol Mexico, Luis Moyano, renamed the group "Pandora" after the first woman created on Earth in Greek mythology. 
In May 1989, Meade left the group to pursue a solo career and was replaced by Liliana Aboroa. Meade returned to the group in 1997 and has continued with them since. 
To celebrate the 25th anniversary of their debut, the three original members of Pandora reunited in 2010 to release a new album, Pandora - De Plata, which consisted of covers, duets, and re-recordings of their old hits. 
Hasan Halili was the minister of agriculture in the 1992 government of Sali Berisha in Albania. He is a member of the Democratic Party. 
One vessel built during this period by Hall, Russell & Company has become well known in popular culture, a fisheries research vessel built as Sir William Hardy (Yard number 846) was bought by Greenpeace, becoming the first Rainbow Warrior in 1977. The Rainbow Warrior would later be sunk by French Special Forces when it was used to disrupt French nuclear weapons testing in the Pacific. 
He won the title of German Champion in men's figure skating twice, in 1900 and 1901. He was the younger brother of Karl Zenger. 
The tomb of Lu Xun was listed as the first batch of the major historical and cultural site protected at the national level, by the State Council of the People's Republic of China, on 4 March 1961. 
After some years travelling in Australia, Europe and East Asia while working in the construction industry, Paul set up a computer support company on Sydney's North Shore in January 1995. He stepped away from day-to-day operations of the business in 2007 with its interstate expansion. 
In 1998 Paul was invited onto 702 ABC Sydney (2BL) to discuss the Y2K issue and answer listener's questions.  The success of this segment lead to two monthly segments on ABC Local Radio programs, Nightlife with Tony Delroy and the Sydney 702 Weekend program with Simon Marnie. 
In addition to this, Wallbank has a weekly column on the Australian Smart Company website discussing business and technology issues. He has also written one small business technology book and adapted five Dummies guides for the Australian market. 
This Chinese biographical article relating to sport is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
On the central square a monument honouring messenger god in the religion of the Muisca; Bochica has been erected. 
He remained the Deputy Ameer of Jamaat-e-Islami until 30 March 2014 when he was elected as the Ameer of Jamaat-e-Islami Pakistan. In accordance with party rules whereby intra-party elections are held every five years, he was re-elected as Ameer (chief) of Jamaat-e-Islami in March 2019, until March 2024. He remains immensely popular in his constituency and is known for his modesty among friends and foes alike. 
He resigned from the Ministry of Finance in June 2014 right after the budget because, according to party rules, one person cannot hold two offices at the same time. At that time, he was Ameer of Jamaat-e-Islami and Senior Minister in KPK Assembly. 
In 2015, he fought and won the election for senate. He is considered to be a senior member of the Parliament of Pakistan. 
During 2018 general elections, he lost the national assembly seat NA-7 Lower Dir II to his rival candidate, Muhammad Bashir Khan of PTI, by a margin of 16,144 votes and was the runner up. 
Winkler graduated from the University of Manitoba with a Bachelor of Arts in 1912, and a BSA in 1916. He also served in the military as a member of the 11th Canadian Field Ambulance unit in World War I with some duties in France. His father, Valentine Winkler, was a member of the Legislative Assembly of Manitoba who was provincial Minister of Agriculture from 1915 to 1920. 
He was first elected to Parliament at the Lisgar riding in the 1935 general election and re-elected there in 1940, 1945 and 1949. Winkler left the House of Commons after completing his fourth and final term of federal office and did not seek re-election in the 1953 election. 
Mansfield Hosiery Mills Cricket Club is an English cricket club based in Sutton-in-Ashfield, Nottinghamshire. The club competes in the Nottinghamshire Cricket Board Premier League, which is an accredited ECB Premier League, gaining promotion to the league in 2004. 
Like most Premier League clubs, Mansfield have employed numerous overseas and English professional cricketers. During 2006, this was Francois du Plessis, the South Africa T20 captain and Test and O.D.I player, and, in 2017, Australian cricketer Dylan Barmby. Current club professional is former Leicestershire player Tom New. 
Pld - Played; W - Won; L - Lost; PF - Points for; PA - Points against; Diff - Difference; Pts - Points. 
This article about a water polo competition in Hungary is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Following Brian's death at the Battle of Clontarf in 1014, the political situation became more complex with rivalry for high kingship from several clans and dynasties. Brian's descendants failed to maintain a unified throne, and regional squabbling over territory led indirectly to the invasion of the Normans under Richard de Clare in 1169. 
The first part of the period from 800 to 1014 is well-studied; the "Viking age" has attracted the interest of historians for quite some time. The period between 1014 and 1169 has received less attention. In the words of Sean Duffy, this period 
A large body of contemporary and near-contemporary material on early medieval Ireland has survived. From the titles of works mentioned in these sources, it is clear that a great deal of additional material has now been lost. The surviving materials usually exist in the form of much later copies, and it is only from comparison of the various texts that the original documents can be reconstructed. 
In addition to the annals, a large number of genealogies survive, along with geographical and legal texts, poetry, sagas and hagiography. 
The wind is fierce tonightit tosses the sea's white maneI do not fear the coursing of a quiet seaby the fierce warriors of Lothlend
The first recorded Viking raid in Irish history occurred in AD 795 when Vikings, possibly from Norway looted the island of Lambay.[note 4] This was followed by a raid on the coast of Brega in 798, and raids on the coast of Connacht in 807. These early Viking raids were generally small in scale and quick. 
Is he Feidhlimidh in ridianid opair oenlaithieitrige Connacht cen cathocus Midhe do manrath (Feidlimid is the kingFor whom a single day's work isTo take the hostages of Connacht without battleAnd to spoil Mide.)
A new and more intensive period of Viking settlement in Ireland began in 914. Between 914 and 922 the Norse established Waterford, Cork, Dublin, Wexford and Limerick.[note 11] Significant excavations in Dublin and Waterford in the 20th century have unearthed much of the Viking heritage of those cities. A large amount of Viking burial stones, called the Rathdown Slabs, have been found in multiple locations across South Dublin. 
There were major reforms in the Irish church during the 12th century. These reforms have been generally interpreted as a reaction to previous secularisation, but could also be seen as a continuous development. The reforms had consequences for, and were influenced by, relations within the church as well as secular politics. 
The Norman invasion of Ireland was a two-stage process, which began on 1 May 1169 when a force of individual Norman knights led by Raymond Fitzgerald landed near Bannow, County Wexford. This was at the request of Dermot MacMurrough (Diarmait Mac Murchada), the ousted King of Leinster who sought their help in regaining his kingdom. 
Then on 18 October 1171, Henry II landed a much bigger force in Waterford to at least ensure his continuing control over the Norman force. In the process he took Dublin and had accepted the fealty of the Irish kings and bishops by 1172, so creating the "Lordship of Ireland", which formed part of his Angevin Empire. 
Corymorpha nutans is found throughout the British Isles and is frequent in suitable habitats in the Northern Atlantic and south to the Mediterranean Sea. 
The waterfall lies in Hakaui Valley. The top of the waterfall is basalt, from which the water spouts as a single jet from its gouged channel. Before reaching the bottom of the fall, the water vaporizes into mist which coats the walls of the canyon, giving them a glossy sheen. 
This biographical article relating to Brazilian athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Basia Kenneth Makepe (born 4 March 1991) is a Mosotho footballer who plays as a centre back for Lesotho Premier League club Lesotho Mounted Police Service FC and the Lesotho national team. 
This biographical article related to Lesotho association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It was a further seven years before WTMW signed on April 3, 1993 as a Home Shopping Network (HSN) affiliate. Barry Diller's Silver King Broadcasting, predecessor to HSN's broadcasting arm, USA Broadcasting, had taken a 45% stake in the station in 1989 in order to keep it afloat. Urban Broadcasting filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy less than two years later, on July 3, 1995. 
WTMW became an affiliate of the American Independent Network, which primarily broadcast reruns of old sitcoms and infomercials, on December 20 of the same year. Without the fixed income from its HSN affiliation, however, Urban Broadcasting filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy again in August 2000. Concurrently in December, Univision Communications bought all of USA Broadcasting's over-the-air stations including its 45% stake in WTMW. 
On April 3, 2014, Katz Broadcasting announced plans to multicast Grit and Escape on WFDC's DT3 and DT4 subchannels. The two networks began broadcasting on August 18, 2014. Escape was replaced by Katz's Bounce TV on September 30, 2017. 
WFDC shut down its analog signal, over UHF channel 14, on June 12, 2009, the official date in which full-power television stations in the United States transitioned from analog to digital broadcasts under federal mandate. The station's digital signal continued to broadcasts on its pre-transition UHF channel 15. Through the use of PSIP, digital television receivers display the station's virtual channel as its former UHF analog channel 14. 
The album's musical style is primarily urban and R&B, in contrast to the pop sounds of Milian's previous albums, a change suggested by Island Def Jam. Following criticism over her previous albums for a lack of consistency, Milian had ten of the album's tracks produced by Cool & Dre. Lyrically, the album was inspired by Milian's breakup with Nick Cannon. So Amazin' was completed within a three-month period, and Milian received writing credit for nine of the album's songs. 
So Amazin' debuted and peaked at number 11 on the Billboard 200, selling 54,000 copies in its first week and 163,000 copies in total. Internationally, the album peaked at number 55 on the Swiss Albums Chart, 67 on the UK Albums Chart, and 139 on the France Albums Chart. The album's lead single, "Say I", featured rapper Young Jeezy and had a music video, directed by Ray Kay. The single peaked at number four in the UK, and number 21 in the United States. 
Cisthene deserta is a moth of the family Erebidae. It was described by Felder in 1868. It is found in North America, where it has been recorded from Utah and California. 
This biographical article about a goalkeeper from Uruguay is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This geographical article about a location in Amasya Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Fred Scerni (born February 18, 1948) is an American politician who served in the New Jersey General Assembly from the 2nd Legislative District from 1990 to 1992. 
 Robert Balfour, 2nd Lord Balfour of Burleigh (died 18 August 1663) was a Scottish military commander. 
Balfour was son of Sir Robert Arnot of Fernie, chamberlain of Fife. He married Margaret, daughter of Michael Balfour of Burleigh and Margaret, daughter of Lundie of Lundie, and his wife succeeded her father (who was created Lord Balfour of Burleigh on 7 August 1606) as Baroness Balfour of Burleigh. Thereupon, by a letter from King James I, Arnot became Lord Balfour of Burleigh, the second holder of the title. 
His wife died before him (in 1639). They had one son, John, 3rd Lord Balfour of Burleigh, and four daughters. 
This biographical article related to the military of the United Kingdom or its predecessor states is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a French historian or genealogist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
David Hicks (born August 1, 1988) is an American professional basketball player, currently a free agent. 
David Hicks was a key member of the 2010 Long Island University, which made it to the 2011 NCAA Basketball Tournament. During his college career Hicks made 123 starts in the backcourt and finished his career with 1,157 points. 
Christian Brassington (born 6 June 1983) is an English actor. He trained at the Webber Douglas Academy of Dramatic Art. 
In 2009, Brassington portrayed a young Boris Johnson in the More4 drama documentary When Boris Met Dave having previously played a young Tony Blair for Channel 4. In November 2013 he appeared in the one-off 50th anniversary comedy homage webcast The Five(ish) Doctors Reboot. 
Gabriel Omar Amato (born 22 October 1970) is an Argentine retired footballer who played as a striker. 
Darbhanga gharana is a gharana, or tradition, of the Hindustani classical music dhrupad thought to have been started in the eighteenth century by Radhakrishna and Kartaram, musicians in the court of the Nawab of Darbhanga. The style is notable for its vocal delivery and energetic performances, as well how the songs are sung after the alap. Notable singers of the Darbhanga gharana include Ram Chatur Mallick, Vidur Mallick and Siyaram Tiwari. 
The tradition was prominent at the start of the twentieth century, but started to decline after India gained its independence. Pandit Siyaram Tiwari's music is considered by many musicians of Darbhanga gharana to have embodied its essence. In 2019 a centenary concert was held in his memory in August 2019 as part of an attempt to revitalise the tradition.  
Darbhanga gharana is based on the Gauhar Vani of dhrupad and is unique in that it has equal balance between the alap, or opening section, and the bandish instead of emphasising the alap as is typical in other dhrupad gharanas. 
Wang Kelian is a village in Perlis, Malaysia located on the Malaysia-Thailand Border. The village was popular with tourists as it was the location of a border market which straddles both sides of the border. However, it has lost it popularity following the discovery of mass graves of the victims of human trafficking in the area in 2015, for which it is now known for. It is also the location of a minor border crossing into Thailand. 
Wang Kelian is located in the northern part of the Malaysian state of Perlis, and is one of the northernmost villages in Peninsular Malaysia. Wang Kelian is located at the foot of the Nakawan Range and is surrounded by hills, with many limestone outcrops. Coming from Kaki Bukit and the rest of Perlis, Road R15 has to climb over a low pass to reach Wang Kelian. 
At the border crossing, Road R15 connects to Route 4184 which joins Route 406, the main road to Satun town. 
The popularity of the market however took a hit as the Malaysian government tightened border crossing procedures following the discovery of mass graves of the victims of human trafficking and illegal transit camps in the nearby jungles in 2015. In  April that year, the Malaysian government stopped the free flow of cross-border visitors as this was reportedly exploited by the human traffickers to bring the victims into Malaysia from Thailand. 
Wang Kelian is also the location of one of two border crossings between Malaysia and Thailand in the state of Perlis, with the other one at Padang Besar. The village across the border from Wang Kelian is Wang Prachan in Khuan Don District, Satun province, Southern Thailand where the immigration checkpoint is located. 
The commissioner of the Royal Canadian Mounted Police (French: commissaire de la Gendarmerie royale du Canada) is the professional head of the Royal Canadian Mounted Police (RCMP). The commissioner exercises control and management of the RCMP under the direction of the minister of public safety. The position is a Governor in Council appointment made on the advice of the prime minister of Canada. 
In addition to his or her role in the management of the RCMP, the commissioner serves as Principal Commander of the Order of Merit of the Police Forces. Under the Firearms Act, the RCMP commissioner also serves as the commissioner of firearms, the chief executive of the Canadian Firearms Program. 
Brenda Lucki is the 24th and current commissioner of the RCMP, taking office on April 16, 2018. She is the first woman to serve in the role on a permanent basis. 
The Canadian monarch is the honorary commissioner-in-chief and Charles, Prince of Wales, is the honorary commissioner of the RCMP. However, neither exercises a substantive role in the operation of the organization. 
There have been 24 commissioners, including two acting commissioners and one interim commissioner, since the founding of the North-West Mounted Police in 1873:  
The present day RCMP National Headquarters building in Ottawa was named in his honour on October 05th, 2011. 
Alexandra Nicoleta Anghel (born 28 June 1997) is a Romanian freestyle wrestler. In 2018, she won one of the bronze medals in the 72 kg event at the 2018 European Wrestling Championships held in Kaspiysk, Russia. 
In 2019, she lost the bronze medal match in the 72 kg event at the 2019 European Wrestling Championships held in Bucharest, Romania. In the same year, she also competed in the 72 kg event at the 2019 World Wrestling Championships where she lost her first match against Natalia Vorobieva. In the repechage she was eliminated from the competition by Masako Furuichi of Japan. 
This biographical article relating to a Romanian sport wrestler or wrestling coach is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Latvia competed at the 1992 Summer Olympics in Barcelona, Spain.  It was the first time since 1936 that the nation had competed as an independent country at the Summer Olympic Games.  Latvian athletes competed for the Soviet Union (USSR) from 1952 to 1988. 34 competitors, 25 men and 9 women, took part in 31 events in 13 sports. 
Tullimbar is a suburb situated in the Macquarie Valley in the City of Shellharbour, New South Wales, Australia. 
A Post Office was established at Tullimbar in 1872. A school was opened at Tullimbar on 31 October 1881. 
K. C. Reddy Ministry was the Council of Ministers in Mysore, a state in South India headed by K. Chengalaraya Reddy of the Indian National Congress. 
The ministry had multiple  ministers including the Chief Minister of Mysore. All ministers belonged to the Indian National Congress. 
Mysore became a Part-B state of the union because Maharaja of Mysore issued a proclamation on this regard on 25 November 1949. 
K. C. Reddy Ministry was an adhoc arrangement from 25 October 1947 (even tough India became Republic on 26 January 1950) till the first election under Adult franchise was held in 1952 and Kengal Hanumanthaiah was elected as Chief Minister of Mysore post elections there by ending the unscheduled tenure of K. C. Reddy Ministry. 
Ten Sing is a Christian youth program within YWCA and YMCA, engaging teenagers in creative performing arts. 
Ten Sing is a YMCA international Youth programme and YWCA (Young Women's Christian Association), which focuses on getting young people to express themselves by using their own culture through creative performing arts. 
The underlying objectives are leadership training, democracy training and personal and social development of body, mind and spirit. Ten Sing invites young people to a creative work process that uses different cultural expressions in a Christian context. 
The five C's "Culture, Creativity, Care, Competence and Christ" are equally important parts of the Ten Sing idea. 
Young people know best what young people think, dream of, feel and desire. Therefore, young people should be active in the management of Ten Sing and take responsibility for running programmes themselves. 
Ten Sing is for young people, with young people and run by young people. Even though the young people are responsible for the programme, it is important to have adult presence. Adults should act as mentors for the youth leaders. The adults should be a resource for help, support and advice when needed. 
Everybody has talents that can be used in Ten Sing, and everyone should get the chance to be creative and active with his or her own mind and body, thus stimulating their spirit. This happens through a great variety of performing arts, such as music, dance, drama, video and other creative expressions. The Ten Sing programme focuses on "the whole human being", with spirit, mind and body. 
To reach the goal of developing young people, Ten Sing focuses on the process of making a creative performance. The process is the tool to make everybody contribute. Therefore, the young people should develop both social and creative skills. 
This is why the process itself is the key: Letting the young people work together regularly in a safe environment, trying and failing, challenging each other, developing and growing, whilst creating a product that the young people can enjoy and be proud of. This enables them to reflect and value their achievements and skills gained through the process. 
Ten Sing is open to everyone irrespective of gender, beliefs, abilities, talents, ethnic and social background. It is not necessary to be a Christian to be a member of Ten Sing. Nevertheless, to secure the Christian context of Ten Sing it's important that at least one of the key leaders is a Christian. 
The Sendlinger Tor (translated: Sendling Gate) is a city gate at the southern extremity of the historic old town area of Munich. It served as a fortification for defence and is one of Munich's three remaining gothic town gates (the other two being the Isartor and the Karlstor). 
In 1808 the central tower was demolished. In 1860 a restoration of the two remaining Medieval flanking towers and the wall with three arches took place. In 1906, these original three arches were replaced by the one large single arch. 
In the Second World War, the gate was barely damaged. It was refurbished in the 1980s. On the Sendlinger Tor, a remnant of the old city wall can still be seen, which previously went up the Herzog-Wilhelm-Str. 
He was born in Cambria, New York. He moved to Adrian, Michigan in 1844 and worked as a teacher until starting a dry goods business in the late 1840s. In 1852 he moved to St. Joseph, Missouri, and later to Elmwood, Kansas Territory where he started banking businesses and engaged in land speculation. 
In 1860 he moved to Colorado to invest in mining. He was one of the founders of the City of Denver, Colorado, and founded the First National Bank of Denver in 1865. Chaffee entered politics and helped organize the Colorado Territory, serving in its first legislature as speaker. He was the territorial delegate to the United States Congress starting in 1870. 
In 1876, after Colorado was admitted to the Union, Chaffee was elected to the United States Senate. He served for the duration of his term, until 1879, but did not seek reelection due to poor health. 
Chaffee died March 9, 1886, at the Grants' home in Salem Center, New York. He is buried in Adrian Cemetery, in Adrian, Michigan. 
The club's roots trace back to the first game of rugby league played in the state - a game between North Brisbane and Toombul in 1909. By 1914, a club from Toowong had also entered the Brisbane junior competition, and by 1915 it had merged with North Brisbane senior club, forming the Western Suburbs District Rugby League Football Club. 
In 2010 former club great Tony Currie took over as club president in a bid to return Wests to the glory days in the statewide competition. As part of the restructure, the club planned to be based out of its spiritual home Purtell Park, which had undergone somewhat of an upgrade.  However, after three seasons, Currie notified Queensland Rugby League that the club will be going on hiatus beginning in 2013. 
Wests' first home ground was the Botanical Gardens, but played at Lang Park between 1955 and 1973. In 1974, the club moved wholly to its training premises on Mount Coot-tha, naming their new home Purtell Park after club stalwart Tom Purtell. Purtell Park had the abnormality of being on a slope, with the southern end being higher, although this is not noticeable on television. Since their merger with Hills District, they have been playing out of the Kev McKell Oval at Arana Hills. 
The shell of Triodopsis platysayoides is thin, right coiled (or dextral), and translucent, with 5 whorls. It is extremely flattened in shape. The umbilicus is open and wide. The shell is pale brown (light horn) in color; the exterior surface of the peristome is yellowish and punctate. 
The aperture of the shell is oblong-lunate. The lip is thickened and white. There is a thick tongue-shaped tooth in the parietal wall of the aperture. 
Triodopsis platysayoides is now a formally recognized species. It was first collected by Graham Netting at Coopers Rock, and later described by Stanley Brooks as Polygyra platysayoides from the area of Coopers Rock State Forest. The type specimen is stored in the collection of the Carnegie Museum of Natural History under number 62.23750. 
The flat-spired three-toothed snail is found only in West Virginia, among Upper Connoquenessing sandstone outcroppings and boulders, in a restricted area along the rim of the Cheat River gorge. The U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service considers this snail to be threatened since 1978. 
Little is known about the life of this animal, but the West Virginia captive breeding program and past survey efforts have provided some information. 
This snail is primarily active at night (nocturnal). Optimum snail activity occur during spring and early summer, especially during cool, moist weather conditions when air temperatures are between 60 and 65 degrees Fahrenheit with relative humidity greater than 85 percent. 
During the daytime, the species has primarily been found on the ceiling, wall, or floor of rock structures. During the night, the snails have been found equally on both rock surfaces, and on the leaf litter near rock features. The species has been observed foraging and resting under wet leaves (next to rock structure), and moving across the leaf litter to a rock feature. There are no known diseases of Triodopsis platysayoides. 
In dry seasons the snails retreat in among the huge, scattered and split boulders just below the summit. Triodopsis platysayoides specimens are typically observed within 1 meter of a rock feature. They can be found in cool, moist, deep fissures in shale, sandstone and limestone outcrops, and in talus. The snail occurs in various outcrops of rock from the bottom of the gorge to the ridgetops. 
Rock outcrops that are one meter or more in height appear to be potential habitat, as long as there are cracks and crevices that are at least one meter deep. The snail appears to prefer rock talus, but is also found in cliffline areas that contain deep, dark crevices. When the two habitats coincide (rock talus and cliffline), then Triodopsis platysayoides is more often found in the talus. 
The slope aspect is also a factor. North and northeast slopes in the Cheat gorge provide naturally cooler and moister habitats than south and southwest facing slopes. Thus, heavy canopy cover may be more important on south and southwest facing slopes, in order  to provide shade and humidity. 
Triodopsis platysayoides feeds on a varied diet of over 20 or so documented foods, including several aged leaves and flower blossoms, fresh catkins, fresh and aged pack rat feces, lichens, mushrooms and crickets. 
Calcium may be a limiting factor for this snail, especially for those living among sandstone habitats which are predominantly acidic. Triodopsis platysayoides has been observed feeding on aged beech leaves and catkins, which are good sources of calcium, as well on the shells of Triodopsis denotata, Mesomphix cupreus, and its own kind. 
Mature snails are hermaphroditic. A mating pair will cross-fertilize, and each individual may lay eggs. They bury the eggs in soil or leaf litter. A captive colony of Triodopsis platysayoides laid small cluster of 3 to 5 eggs in the soil under the leaf litter in the spring and summer. 
Triodopsis platysayoides is thought to be a relatively long-lived land snail. Based upon shell growth rings, these snails reach maturity at 3 years in the wild, or at 2 years in captivity. 
Before 1981, only one very restricted population of Triodopsis platysayoides was known. On one occasion, 50 individuals were observed and a population of "several hundred" was estimated (in 1972). A later estimation in 1974 was that the population represented about 300 to 500 living individuals. Field surveys at this same location found only 35 individuals however. 
Increasing numbers of the snail were noticed at Coopers Rock State Forest after the site was fenced to control human access. However such observation of snail numbers cannot be used to deduce trends, as other snails show short-term fluctuations of 10 to 15 times when there is such a low population total. 
Triodopsis platysayoides appears to be a relatively common snail species where it is found. Although many other species of snails have been documented coexisting with Triodopsis platysayoides, they generally do not exceed Triodopsis platysayoides numbers. In many cases, Triodopsis platysayoides was the most common snail, sometimes exceeding all other snail species combined. 
Genetic samples to detect differences in populations were taken on both sides of the gorge. The analysis had not been finished in 2007 and at that point it was not known whether populations are isolated or connected genetically. 
Because of its limited range, this snail is especially vulnerable to natural or human-caused incidents that could destroy most, or even all, of its populations. 
Hikers inadvertently disrupt the leaf litter cover, and crush snails. Rock climbers, too, have killed snails and destroyed their habitat unknowingly. 
Human activities such as logging, housing developments, and forest fires can all alter the environmental conditions that the flat-spired three-toothed snail needs to survive. 
Currently the West Virginia Division of Natural Resources is working with the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service to develop a "Safe Harbor Agreement" for the snail on their properties. Additionally, they are working with private landowners to encourage protection of the snail by designing special timber management guidelines. 
The state of West Virginia, the Nature Conservancy, private landowners, and the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, are all sharing the effort to prevent the flat-spired three-toothed snail from sliding into extinction. 
This article incorporates public domain text (a public domain work of the United States Government) from references. 
Philosophers born in the 15th and 16th centuries (and others important in the history of philosophy), listed alphabetically: 
Dame Oriana Clare Tickell, DBE (born 25 May 1958) is an Independent Director of the John Lewis Partnership. 
Prior to this, Clare was Chief Executive of Hanover Housing Association from January 2014 to November 2018. Founded in 1963, Hanover was one of England's leading providers of affordable housing and services for the over 55s. Hanover merged with Anchor Trust in 2019 to form Anchor Hanover Group.  
The name Babe has been used for one tropical cyclone in the Atlantic Ocean and six tropical cyclones in the northwest Pacific Ocean. 
Babe was used for one tropical cyclone in the Atlantic Ocean. Due to the relatively minimal damage caused by the storm, the name Babe was not retired; however, after male names were added to the list of Atlantic hurricane names, Babe was removed and has not been used to name a storm since. 
Born in Baltimore, Maryland, and raised in Clarendon Hills, Illinois, Harris was the daughter of Frederick Schwartz, an engineer, and had a middle-class upbringing. She graduated from Indiana University with a bachelor's degree in language arts. 
Emily and Bill Harris took over the leadership of the SLA after six other SLA members died in a Los Angeles shootout with police and the house fire it triggered. After the fire, the Harrises spent over a year eluding the authorities with Hearst, and new members Kathleen Soliah, Josephine Soliah, Steven Soliah, Mike Bortin, Jim Kilgore, and Wendy Yoshimura.[citation needed] 
Hearst herself had since become a participant in SLA crimes. Yoshimura, Patty's closest friend while underground, was a fugitive for her involvement with explosives that were stored in a garage she rented. During that year the SLA committed a string of crimes, including an April 21, 1975, robbery of Crocker National Bank in Carmichael, California.[citation needed] 
The Harrises were eventually arrested and served eight years in prison for the Hearst kidnapping. They were represented by attorney Leonard Weinglass.  Imprisoned at the California Institution for Women in Corona, California, Emily Harris spent the first half of her term in solitary confinement. Emily learned computer programming in prison.[citation needed] 
After her release from prison in 1983, Harris became a computer programmer and began a successful computer consulting company.  She worked  at MGM Studios until her second conviction. She divorced her husband. 
For over 25 years no one was charged in the Opsahl murder. The SLA wore wigs and masks during the Crocker Bank robbery, and left little evidence behind. 
However, with new forensics techniques, the FBI was eventually able to link shotgun pellets removed from Opsahl's body to shotgun shells found in an SLA hideout.  Additional evidence mounted, and in January 2002 Harris and three other SLA members were charged with the Opsahl murder. Harris's bail was set at $1,000,000, which her supporters quickly gathered.[citation needed] 
Facing a possible conviction, Harris and the others pleaded guilty to second-degree murder in November 2002. Emily Harris was sentenced to eight additional years in prison; Bill Harris was sentenced to seven years and Kathleen Soliah and Michael Bortin were each sentenced to six years for their roles.[citation needed] 
Greatest Hits was a greatest hits album by Eurodance group the Vengaboys and features songs from both their debut album "The Party Album" and also their second album "The Platinum Album". The album is now available on other streaming services such as Google Play Music and YouTube Music. 
James Matthes Talent (born October 18, 1956) is an American politician and former U.S. Senator from Missouri from 2002 to 2007. He is a Republican and resided in the St. Louis area while serving in elected office. He identifies with the conservative wing of the Republican Party, being outspoken on judicial appointments, abortion, flag burning, and defense issues. 
After serving for eight years in the U.S. House of Representatives and then working as a lobbyist, he was elected to the U.S. Senate in 2002, defeating Democrat Jean Carnahan in a special election to complete the term to which Carnahan's husband, Mel, had been elected posthumously in 2000. In the Democratic wave of November 2006, Talent lost his re-election bid to Claire McCaskill, 50% to 47%. 
Talent's interfaith family did not attend religious services, and later in life Talent became a member of the Presbyterian Church in America. He was inspired to become a Christian while listening to one of Luis Palau's radio broadcasts in his car. He pulled over and accepted Jesus Christ into his life then. He refers to it as the moment he "passed from death to life." 
Talent began his political career in 1984 when he was elected to the Missouri House of Representatives. He served four terms there, the last two as minority leader. 
In the 1992 House of Representatives election, Talent defeated Bert Walker, the cousin of then-president George H. W. Bush and won the Republican nomination for the state's 2nd Congressional District, based in St. Louis's western suburbs. He went on to defeat Democratic incumbent Joan Kelly Horn in the general election, despite being heavily outspent. 
The district had been altered after the 1990 census to preserve large Democratic majorities in the neighboring 1st District of Bill Clay and 3rd District of Dick Gephardt. Horn had appealed for a new map, even asking for a share of St. Louis, but was rebuffed by Clay and Gephardt. 
Although Talent won narrowly in 1992, he never had another close race in what became a solidly Republican district. The only challenge he faced came in the 1996 House election, when Horn sought a rematch. Even though popular Democratic Governor Talent won the rematch with 61% of the vote. 
As a freshman in Congress, Talent authored and introduced the Welfare Reform Act of 1994, which was the precursor to the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Act. Talent served as chairman of the Small Business Committee from 1997 to 2001. 
Talent did not seek re-election to Congress in 2000, instead running for governor. He was defeated, narrowly, by Democratic state Treasurer Bob Holden, 49% to 48%. 
The Seventeenth Amendment requires that appointments to the Senate last only until a special election is held. Talent, who received the Republican nomination, narrowly defeated Jean Carnahan in the November 2002 election, 50% to 49%. He was sworn in later that month to fill out the balance of Mel Carnahan's term. 
Jack Abramoff contributed $2,000 to Talent's 2002 senatorial campaign and Preston Gates & Ellis, a former Abramoff employer, had also contributed $1,000 to Talent's campaign. Talent later returned both contributions. 
Talent has been criticized for not returning the money received from Americans for a Republican Majority (ARMPAC), a PAC formed by Tom DeLay. DeLay was facing charges of money laundering and violation of campaign finance laws. A spokesman for Talent has stated that Talent has not yet made a decision about whether or not to return the ARMPAC contribution, stating "Senator Talent is not ready to presume guilt or innocence and wants to give the judicial process a chance to move forward." 
During his tenure, Talent served on the Senate Armed Services Committee, Special Committee on Aging, Agriculture, Nutrition and Forestry Committee, and Energy and Natural Resources Committee. 
Talent sought re-election in the 2006 Senate election. His Democratic opponent was state Auditor Claire McCaskill. Talent held a fundraising advantage, in part because of support from the Bush administration; on October 11, 2005, Vice President Dick Cheney held a fundraiser for Talent. Talent accepted $5,000 from the lobbyist Jack Abramoff. Talent subsequently refunded all $5,000. 
Talent received a number of endorsements for his re-election, including from the Missouri Farm Bureau, the St. Louis Police Officers' Association, the Missouri Pork Association, the National Association of Wholesaler-Distributors, the Missouri Corn Growers Association, and Veterans of Foreign Wars. 
In 2006, the Washington DC newspaper Roll Call reported that DC lobbying interests had pledged to raise $1 million for Talent's re-election. Talent stated that he does not give favors in exchange for donations, and that he "wouldn't take five dollars from someone who expects something for it."  
McCaskill and Talent debated each other on Meet the Press on October 8, 2006. McCaskill narrowly defeated Talent on November 7, 2006, with a 50% to 47% margin of victory. 
Having lost his reelection bid, Talent was considered a possible candidate for Governor of Missouri in 2008 after incumbent and fellow Republican Matt Blunt decided to not seek re-election. Talent did not enter the race, which was won by Democrat Jay Nixon. 
Talent is widely regarded by political analysts as a reliable conservative, receiving a life score of 93 out of 100 from the American Conservative Union. The National Right to Life Committee gave Talent a 100% rating. In 2005, Talent was tied for the third-highest rating among all senators and representatives as determined by the Republican Liberty Caucus, which promotes "liberty-minded, limited-government individuals to office." 
Talent is a cosponsor of the Flag Desecration Amendment, which would make it constitutional to criminalize flag burning. He argues that this does not conflict with freedom of speech by suggesting that flag burning is not speech. His office has said, "...burning the flag is not speech; it is an act with expressive overtones." 
Talent supported the Medicare prescription drug benefit called Medicare Part D, the purpose of which is to reduce the amount seniors pay for their prescription drugs. Talent called for waiving a one percent penalty for senior citizens who missed the deadline to sign up for the program. 
Talent voted against an amendment allowing Medicare to negotiate a bulk purchase discount for prescription drugs. 
Talent supported limiting awards in medical liability lawsuits. He believes that "medical liability relief will cut costs because physicians won't have to practice 'defensive medicine.'" 
Talent supported and proposed legislation to allow trade organizations to sponsor health insurance plans, which he believes would provide uninsured workers the opportunity for more affordable health care. 
Talent sponsored legislation to cap the annual percentage interest rate for payday loans to military service personnel from an average of around 39% to 36%. 
After joining the Senate in 2002, Talent supported federal legislation that would ban embryonic stem cell research or federal funding for embryonic stem cell research. This included cosponsoring a bill (S.658) sponsored by Senator Sam Brownback, which would ban all forms of human cloning including embryonic therapeutic cloning techniques that are seen as crucial to stem cell research. 
There was a ballot-initiative in Missouri in November 2006 to amend the state constitution and allow, in line with federal law, stem cell research and treatment. On May 1, 2006, Talent announced his opposition to the proposed ballot-initiative. Stem cell research and treatment is working up to be a divisive issue for many Republicans and is taking a particular prominence in Missouri. 
Talent cosponsored the Combat Meth Act with Sen. Dianne Feinstein (D-CA). The legislation, which was attached to the reauthorization of the USA Patriot Act, passed on March 2, 2006 and restricts the sale of products necessary to produce methamphetamines. President Bush signed the act into law on March 9, 2006. As a result of the act, certain cold medicines are only to be made available behind the counter and the amount of such medicines that can be purchased by one person is limited. 
Although Talent was not in Congress at the time of the 2002 vote authorizing the war in Iraq, he stated in October 2006 that he would have voted for the war knowing that Iraq had no weapons of mass destruction. Talent did not support a timetable for troop withdrawal from Iraq until American troops are able to train up an Iraqi army capable of maintaining security within the country. 
Talent has written that defense spending should remain at an elevated level, even after all American forces are withdrawn from Iraq and Afghanistan. 
Tokyo Rainbow Pride has been held annually since 2012, with attendance increasing every year. A 2015 opinion poll found that a majority of Japanese supported the legalisation of same-sex marriage. Further opinion polls conducted over the following years have found high levels of support for same-sex marriage among the Japanese public, most notably the younger generation. However, a 2020 survey of over 10,000 LGBT people in Japan found that 38 percent had been harassed or assaulted. 
As Japan progressed into the Meiji era, same-sex practices continued; however, there was a growing animosity towards these practices. The practice of nanshoku began to die out after the Russo-Japanese War. Opposition to homosexuality did not become firmly established in Japan until the 19th and 20th centuries, through the Westernization efforts of the Empire of Japan. 
Homosexuality is legal in Japan. There are no explicit religious prohibitions against homosexuality in the traditional religion of Japan, Shinto, or in the imported religions of Buddhism (see "Buddhism and sexual orientation") or Confucianism. 
Sodomy was first criminalized in Japan in 1872, in the early Meiji era, to comply with the newly introduced beliefs of Western culture and the Qing legal codes. But this provision was repealed only seven years later by the Penal Code of 1880 in accordance with the Napoleonic Penal Code. Since then, Japan has had no laws against homosexuality. Thus, sex among consenting adults, in private, regardless of sexual orientation and/or gender, is legal under Japanese law. 
In March 2009, Japan began allowing Japanese nationals to marry same-sex partners in countries where same-sex marriage is legal. The Justice Ministry instructed local authorities to issue key certificates, which state that a person is single and of legal age, to individuals seeking to enter same-sex marriages in areas that legally allow it. 
On 17 March 2021, a district court in Sapporo ruled that laws or regulations that deprive same-sex couples of the right to marry constitute unlawful discrimination and violate Article 14 of the Constitution of Japan. The court found that Article 24 does not prohibit the recognition of same-sex marriages. The ruling did not legalize same-sex marriage in Japan, but is likely to step up pressure on the National Diet to act. 
Same-sex couples are not allowed to legally adopt in Japan. Lesbian couples and single women are unable to access IVF and artificial insemination. 
In April 2017, Osaka officially recognised a same-sex couple as foster parents, making it the first such case in Japan. 
As of 2021, sexual orientation and gender identity are not protected by national civil rights laws, which means that LGBT Japanese have few legal recourses when faced with discrimination in such areas as employment, education, housing, health care and banking. According to a 2018 Dentsu Diversity Lab survey, more than 65% of questioned LGBT people said they had not come out to anyone at work or home. 
In 2013, Yodogawa-ku, Osaka, became the first Japanese government area to pass a resolution officiating support for LGBT inclusion, including mandating LGBT sensitivity training for ward staff. Naha followed suit in July 2015. 
In March 2019, legislation banning discrimination against "sexual minorities" was passed in Ibaraki Prefecture. 
Human Rights Watch, J-ALL (Japan Alliance for LGBT Legislation) and Athlete Ally urged Prime Minister Shinzo Abe to support legislation protecting LGBT people against discrimination on the basis of gender and sexual orientation. On 17 April 2020, 96 human rights and LGBT organizations sent a letter to the Prime Minister calling for the passage of a non-discrimination law. 
In addition to what are provided for from Article 12 to the preceding paragraph, employees are prohibited from any other forms of harassment at the workplace that are damaging to the work environment of other employees such as by way of speech or behaviour related to sexual orientation or gender identification.
In 1990, the group OCCUR (Japan Association for the Lesbian and Gay Movement) won a court case against a Tokyo government policy that barred gay and lesbian youth from using the "Metropolitan House for Youth". While the court ruling does not seem to have extended to other areas of government-sponsored discrimination, it is cited by the courts as a civil rights case. 
Since autumn 2003, the Urban Renaissance Agency, the government agency that operates government housing has allowed same-sex couples to rent units the same way as heterosexual couples at any one of the over 300 properties that it operates. This opened the way for more such action, as the Osaka Government in September 2005 opened the doors of its government housing to same-sex couples. 
In February 2018, the Ministry of Health, Labor and Welfare created provisions addressing discrimination in housing, stating that "consideration must be taken to not deny lodging on the basis of sexual orientation or gender identity." 
In October 2020, The Guardian reported that several Japanese love hotels were denying entry to same-sex couples for the sole reason of their sexual orientation, despite it being illegal under federal law since 2018 as per the guidelines issued by the Ministry of Health, Labor and Welfare. 
In January 2018, after a high-profile incident in 2015 in which a gay student at Hitotsubashi University died by suicide after being outed against his will, the city of Kunitachi passed an "anti-outing" ordinance to promote understanding of LGBT people. Mie Prefecture passed a similar "anti-outing" law in March 2021. 
In June 2019, after three years of consultations, a special committee of the ruling Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) announced the LGBT Understanding and Enhancement Bill, which aims to improve understanding of LGBT issues, would be introduced to the National Diet. However, LGBT rights activists criticized the bill for falling short by not mentioning same-sex marriage or anti-discrimination protections. 
In April 2021, the LDP announced it would pass the LGBT Understanding and Enhancement Bill during the current Diet session, set to end in June. The bill only requires the government to "promote understanding of LGBT people" and does not actually ban discrimination. 
On 24 February 2012, the Hyogo Lawyers' Association recommended that a transgender woman in a male prison be transferred to a female institution. According to this report, she had been placed in a male institution because of her legal sex, despite having undergone sex reassignment surgery prior to her detention, and was not treated as a woman in any way. She was subject to body checks by male staff, had her hair shaved, and was denied feminine clothing. 
Since April 2018, transgender people have been covered for sex reassignment surgery as long as they are not receiving hormone treatment. The Ministry of Health, Labor and Welfare has also allowed transgender people to use their preferred names on their health insurance cards. 
In October 2020, Human Rights Watch wrote a letter urging Japan officials to allow transgender women to enroll in public women's universities in the country. 
Gay and bisexual men are allowed to donate blood in Japan following a six-month deferral period from sex. 
The Japan Self-Defense Forces, when being asked about their policy toward people who are gay or lesbian following the U.S. debate during the Clinton presidency, answered that it was not an issue, and individuals within the forces indicated that as long as same-sex relations did not lead to fights or other trouble, there were few, if any, barriers to their inclusion in the armed services. 
Most political parties in Japan have formal positions in favor or against LGBT rights in their party's platform or manifesto. The Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) has indicated opposition to legalizing same-sex marriage, whereas the Constitutional Democratic Party (CDP), the Communist Party and the Social Democratic Party have indicated support for legalization. 
In 2001, the Council for Human Rights Promotion, under the Ministry of Justice, recommended that sexual orientation be included in the nation's civil rights code, but the Diet refused to adopt the recommendation. 
In 2003, Aya Kamikawa became the first openly transgender politician to be elected to public office in Japan, winning a seat on the Setagaya Ward Assembly. She initially ran as an independent but expressed support for the now-defunct Rainbow and Greens party and later unsuccessfully ran for the National Parliament as a member of the Democratic Party of Japan. 
In 2010, Tokyo Governor Shintaro Ishihara faced international criticism for controversial comments he made, in which he said that gays and lesbians were "deficient somehow. It may be attributed to something genetic. I feel sorry for them being a minority." 
In March 2017, Tomoya Hosoda was elected to the Iruma Assembly, in the prefecture of Saitama. Hosoda is believed to be the first openly transgender man elected to public office in the world. 
During the country's 2017 general election, Tokyo Governor Yuriko Koike's newly launched Party of Hope pledged the elimination of LGBT discrimination in its manifesto. 
In January 2019, trans woman Maria Akasaka became a member of the Kameoka City Assembly, in Kyoto Prefecture. In April 2019, another trans woman, Ayako Fuchigami, won a seat on the Hokkaido Prefectural Assembly representing Sapporo's Higashi-ku ward. She became the first openly transgender person to hold a prefectural assembly position in Japan. 
In June 2019, the CDP added introducing legislation aimed at ending discrimination against the LGBT community and legalising same-sex marriage to their party platforms ahead of the 2019 Japanese House of Councillors election. 
Labedaea rhizosphaerae is a bacterium from the genus of Labedaea which has been isolated from rhizosphere soil from the plant Peucedanum japonicum on the Mara Island on Korea. 
Dixie Lullabies is an album by the American southern rock/country rock band The Kentucky Headhunters. It was released on October 18, 2011 through Red Dirt Records. 
AllMusic gave the album three-and-a-half stars out of five and in its review by William Ruhlmann, he thought that the songs were "steeped in familiar structures" and "will fit right in with the band's earlier material". An identical rating came from Jonathan Keefe of Slant Magazine, who said that "What the album lacks in surprises it makes up for in pure, unadulterated swagger" and that the Headhunters "are still one of the finest Southern-rock outfits around." 
Primarily a playwright, he is best known today for his short novel Helena o el mar del verano (1952), an evocative memoir of summer holidays, childhood and first love. The book has been reissued many times and translated in many languages, including an English translation by Margaret Jull Costa under the title Helena, or the Sea in Summer.   
Proteolysis is the breakdown of proteins into smaller polypeptides or amino acids. Uncatalysed, the hydrolysis of peptide bonds is extremely slow, taking hundreds of years. Proteolysis is typically catalysed by cellular enzymes called proteases, but may also occur by intra-molecular digestion. 
Proteolysis can also be used an analytical tool for studying proteins in the laboratory, and it may also be used in industry, for example in food processing and stain removal. 
The initiating methionine (and, in prokaryotes, fMet) may be removed during translation of the nascent protein. For E. coli, fMet is efficiently removed if the second residue is small and uncharged, but not if the second residue is bulky and charged. In both prokaryotes and eukaryotes, the exposed N-terminal residue may determine the half-life of the protein according to the N-end rule. 
Proteins that are to be targeted to a particular organelle or for secretion have an N-terminal signal peptide that directs the protein to its final destination. This signal peptide is removed by proteolysis after their transport through a membrane. 
Some proteins and most eukaryotic polypeptide hormones are synthesized as a large precursor polypeptide known as a polyprotein that requires proteolytic cleavage into individual smaller polypeptide chains.  The polyprotein pro-opiomelanocortin (POMC) contains many polypeptide hormones. The cleavage pattern of POMC, however, may vary between different tissues, yielding different sets of polypeptide hormones from the same polyprotein. 
Proteolysis can, therefore, be a method of regulating biological processes by turning inactive proteins into active ones. A good example is the blood clotting cascade whereby an initial event triggers a cascade of sequential proteolytic activation of many specific proteases, resulting in blood coagulation. The complement system of the immune response also involves a complex sequential proteolytic activation and interaction that result in an attack on invading pathogens. 
Proteins in cells are broken into amino acids. This intracellular degradation of protein serves multiple functions: It removes damaged and abnormal protein and prevents their accumulation. It also serves to regulate cellular processes by removing enzymes and regulatory proteins that are no longer needed. The amino acids may then be reused for protein synthesis. 
The intracellular degradation of protein may be achieved in two ways - proteolysis in lysosome, or a ubiquitin-dependent process that targets unwanted proteins to proteasome. The autophagy-lysosomal pathway is normally a non-selective process, but it may become selective upon starvation whereby proteins with peptide sequence KFERQ or similar are selectively broken down. The lysosome contains a large number of proteases such as cathepsins. 
The ubiquitin-mediated process is selective. Proteins marked for degradation are covalently linked to ubiquitin. Many molecules of ubiquitin may be linked in tandem to a protein destined for degradation. The polyubiquinated protein is targeted to an ATP-dependent protease complex, the proteasome. The ubiquitin is released and reused, while the targeted protein is degraded. 
The rate of proteolysis may also depend on the physiological state of the organism, such as its hormonal state as well as nutritional status. In time of starvation, the rate of protein degradation increases. 
In bacteria, a similar strategy of employing an inactive zymogen or prezymogen is used. Subtilisin, which is produced by Bacillus subtilis, is produced as preprosubtilisin, and is released only if the signal peptide is cleaved and autocatalytic proteolytic activation has occurred. 
Proteolysis is also involved in the regulation of many cellular processes by activating or deactivating enzymes, transcription factors, and receptors, for example in the biosynthesis of cholesterol, or the mediation of thrombin signalling through protease-activated receptors. 
Some enzymes at important metabolic control points such as ornithine decarboxylase is regulated entirely by its rate of synthesis and its rate of degradation. Other rapidly degraded proteins include the protein products of proto-oncogenes, which play central roles in the regulation of cell growth. 
Cyclins are a group of proteins that activate kinases involved in cell division. The degradation of cyclins is the key step that governs the exit from mitosis and progress into the next cell cycle. Cyclins accumulate in the course the cell cycle, then abruptly disappear just before the anaphase of mitosis. The cyclins are removed via a ubiquitin-mediated proteolytic pathway. 
Caspases are an important group of proteases involved in apoptosis or programmed cell death. The precursors of caspase, procaspase, may be activated by proteolysis through its association with a protein complex that forms apoptosome, or by granzyme B, or via the death receptor pathways. 
Other diseases linked to aberrant proteolysis include muscular dystrophy, degenerative skin disorders, respiratory and gastrointestinal diseases, and malignancy. 
Certain chemicals cause proteolysis only after specific residues, and these can be used to selectively break down a protein into smaller polypeptides for laboratory analysis. For example, cyanogen bromide cleaves the peptide bond after a methionine. Similar methods may be used to specifically cleave tryptophanyl, aspartyl, cysteinyl, and asparaginyl peptide bonds. Acids such as trifluoroacetic acid and formic acid may be used for cleavage. 
Certain types of venom, such as those produced by venomous snakes, can also cause proteolysis. These venoms are, in fact, complex digestive fluids that begin their work outside of the body. Proteolytic venoms cause a wide range of toxic effects, including effects that are: 
Raskelf railway station served the village of Raskelf, North Yorkshire, England from 1841 to 1964 on the East Coast Main Line. 
The station opened on 1 August 1841 by the Great North of England Railway. It was due to be rebuilt in 1933, but it was closed to passengers on 5 May 1958 and closed completely in 1964. 
This article on a railway station in Yorkshire and the Humber is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This is a list of ancient Corsican and Sardinian tribes, listed in order of ethnic kinship or the general area in which they lived. Some closely fit the concept of a tribe. Others are confederations or even unions of tribes. 
Before the Roman conquest in the 3rd century BC, the islands of Corsica and Sardinia were inhabited by three main peoples or ethnic groups, the Corsi, the Balares, and the Ilienses, each of them divided into several tribes. With the Roman conquest, the province of Sardinia and Corsica was created, becoming the second province of the Roman Republic to be created after that of Sicily. 
If the Corsi, dwelling in Corsica and in the northernmost tip of Sardinia (Gallura), were a subset of the Ligurians and a group of tribes (they probably were an Indo-European people related to the Celts), then they would have been of a different ethnic and linguistic affiliation from the majority of the tribes of Sardinia (although Emidio De Felice found similarities between Paleo-Sardinian and Ancient Ligurian). 
The ancient Sardinian and Corsican tribes are the ancestors of most present-day native Sardinians and Corsicans, and their language or languages, like Paleo-Sardinian and Paleo-Corsican, are the substrate of the modern Sardinian and Corsican languages, now part of the Neo-Latin branch. 
Upon release, Space Station Silicon Valley was acclaimed by many reviewers, with praise particularly directed at the intuitive mechanics, innovative level design, and comical concepts. It won numerous awards, including Game of the Month and Most Innovative Game from IGN. Despite this, the game performed poorly commercially, and was unable to secure enough sales to warrant a sequel. 
The Popkum First Nation or Popkum Band is a band government of the Sto:lo people located in the Upper Fraser Valley region, at Popkum, northeast of Chilliwack, British Columbia, Canada.  They are a member government of the Sto:lo Nation tribal council. 
Maccabi Brinkford Tbilisi is the Georgian professional basketball club, that is based in Tbilisi, Georgia. The club competes in the Georgian Super Liga. 
Bekhud Badayuni's most recent biographer was Asad Ahmad of Aligarh Muslim University's Urdu Department, who drew upon the work of prior biographers, including Hasrat Mohani. 
Bekhud trained and qualified as a lawyer, and spent time practicing law in Muradabad and Shahjahanpur. Tiring of the practice of law, he eventually entered into government service, serving as a high official first in the princely state of Sirohi (in Rajasthan), then in the princely state of Jodhpur, where he spent the remainder of his days. He died in 1912 in Badayun. 
Middleford is an unincorporated community in Sussex County, Delaware, United States. Middleford is located at the intersection of Old Furnace Road and Middleford Road northeast of Seaford. 
The structure forms an irregular pentagon. There is a total of nine towers, each in a corner of the fortress. Solid and high walls enclose an area of flat land. The fortification runs east to west 70 m. The eastern portion of the fortress is roughly 50 m in width, while the western portion is 30 m in width. Its walls were constructed in such a way that soldiers armed with firearms could defend every angle of the fortress. 
On May 10, 2004, the Commission to Preserve National Monuments of Bosnia and Herzegovina designated it a National Monuments of Bosnia and Herzegovina. Three slabs bearing inscriptions found at the fortress are on display in Country House museum's lapidary in Hutovo. 
He came from a family of scholars, who had originated in Yemen and then settled in Kairouan, and was noted for its contributions to religious studies. He studied at Zitouna University, aiming for a religious career like his ancestors. He later began to teach at the Zitouna and married first Douja Belkhodja and then Habiba Ben Jaafar, both daughters of notable Tunisian religious families of Turkish origin. 
Born in Camden Town, in North London, Wood moved with his family to Leicester when he was 14, and joined Belgrave Amateur Boxing Club. 
Wood was a successful amateur boxer, winning the ABA heavyweight title in 1972. He wasn't selected for the 1972 Summer Olympics in Munich, which led to a media campaign against the decision. 
He turned professional and was trained by his father Arthur and Jim Knight in the gym at the Jolly Angler pub on Wharf Street in Leicester, and was managed by Johnny Griffin and later Carl Gunns. From his first nine pro fights Wood win eight and drew one. In January 1974 he met Les Stevens for the vacant BBBofC Southern Area heavyweight title, suffering his first professional defeat on points. Defeats to Eddie Neilson and Richard Dunn followed. 
Tim Wood died in September 2010 after suffering a heart attack at the age of 59. He was survived by his widow Maureen and four children. 
Eucalyptus microcarpa, commonly known as grey box, is a species of tree that is endemic to southeastern continental Australia. It has rough, fibrous or flaky bark on the trunk, smooth whitish bark above, lance-shaped adult leaves, flower buds in groups of between seven and eleven, white flowers and oval, cylindrical or urn-shaped fruit. 
Grey box was first formally described in 1902 by Joseph Maiden who gave it the name Eucalyptus hemiphloia var. microcarpa in the Transactions, proceedings and report, Royal Society of South Australia. (Eucalyptus hemiphloia had previously been described by Ferdinand von Mueller, but that name is now accepted as a synonym of Eucalyptus moluccana.) In 1923, Maiden raised the variety to species status as E. microcarpa. The specific epithet (microcarpa) means "small-fruited". 
Eucalyptus microcarpa occurs in Queensland, New South Wales, Victoria and South Australiais widespread and locally abundant inland from the Great Dividing Range in New South Wales. In Victoria it is found from the Wimmera east to south of Benalla and also occurs in Queensland. In South Australia, its distribution includes the Mount Lofty Ranges and Heywood Park near Adelaide. It is associated with grassy woodland and loamy soils. 
This eucalypt is a component of the grey box (E. microcarpa) grassy woodlands and derived native grasslands of south- eastern Australia that is listed as "endangered" under the Australian Government Environment Protection and Biodiversity Conservation Act 1999. 
The following table summarizes the multiple-team events (MTE) or early season tournaments in which teams from the West Coast Conference will participate. 
Throughout the year, the West Coast Conference names a player of the week and a freshman of the week as follows: 
All fixed commemorations below celebrated on December 28 by Eastern Orthodox Churches on the Old Calendar.[note 1] 
For December 15th, Orthodox Churches on the Old Calendar commemorate the Saints listed on December 2. 
Saints and martyrs of the Crimea - Basilius, Eugenius, Agathadorus, Elpidius, Eterius, Capito, and Ephraim. 
Acacia chamaeleon is a shrub belonging to the genus Acacia and the subgenus Phyllodineae. It is native to an area along the south coast in the Great Southern, Wheatbelt and the Goldfields-Esperance regions of Western Australia. 
Thompson was born in Bellefonte, Pennsylvania, grew up in Howard, Pennsylvania, and is the son of a Navy veteran. He holds a bachelor's degree in therapeutic recreation from Pennsylvania State University and dual master's degrees in therapeutic recreation and health science from Temple University. 
Thompson worked for 28 years as a Therapist/Rehab Services Manager/Licensed Nursing Home Administrator in Lycoming County and served for six years as chairman of the Centre County Republican Committee. He has spent twenty-five years as a member or president of the Howard Volunteer Fire Company 14, and also actively volunteers as a fire fighter, emergency medical technician, and rescue technician. 
When the 112th Congress convened January 5, 2011 to elect a Speaker of the United States House of Representatives, Thompson's vote was the 218th vote for John Boehner giving Boehner the majority needed to be named Speaker. 
During the 112th Congress, Thompson became chairman of the House Agriculture Subcommittee on Forestry, Conservation, and Energy. 
At the start of the 115th Congress, Thompson was named vice-chairman of the House Committee on Agriculture. In December 2020, ahead of the 117th Congress, he was named ranking member of the agriculture committee. 
In May 2018, Thompson voted for the National Defense Authorization Act (NDAA) for Fiscal Year 2019, which increased defense spending, military salaries, and the number of military personnel. 
As a member of the U.S. House Education and Workforce Committee, Thompson has supported local control rather than federal mandates on issues like evaluating teachers, has opposed private school vouchers, and has voted to expand S-CHIP (children's health insurance). In August 2014, the National Education Association's political action committee endorsed Thompson for re-election. 
In October 2017, Thompson and Joe Courtney (D-CT) introduced H.R. 4101, the School Milk Nutrition Act of 2017, a bill to promote milk consumption by schoolchildren. 
After the Stoneman Douglas High School shooting in 2018, Thompson told an audience of students that he does not agree with the idea of arming teachers and that he had voted to fund an improved national background check system. Thompson called for more "uniformed law enforcement in our schools." 
In May 2017, Thompson voted to repeal the Affordable Care Act (Obamacare) and replace it the Republican American Health Care Act. 
In April 2017, Thompson and Julia Brownley (D-CA) introduced H.R. 2123, the Veterans E-Health and Telemedicine Support (VETS) Act of 2017. In September Thompson praised the Department of Veterans Affairs for proposing a rule that was similar to his bill and that would allow VA-credentialed health care providers to practice telemedicine across state lines. 
Thompson sponsored the Servicemembers' Telemedicine and E-Health Portability Act of 2011, which was enacted as part of the National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2012. The bill expanded the  use of telemedicine for active duty military, reserve and National Guard. 
In April 2018, Thompson fought efforts to eliminate federal funding for the Essential Air Service. Three airports in his district participate in it. 
This article about a member of the United States House of Representatives from Pennsylvania is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Aeroshells are a key component of space probes that must land intact on the surface of any object with an atmosphere. They have been used on all missions returning payloads to the Earth (if one counts the Space Shuttle thermal protection system as an aeroshell). They are also used for all landing missions to Mars, Venus, Titan and (in the most extreme case) the Galileo probe to Jupiter. 
The Voyager program was later canceled, replaced by the much smaller Viking program several years later. NASA reused the Voyager name for the Voyager 1 and Voyager 2 probes to the outer planets, which had nothing to do with the Mars Voyager program. 
The Low-Density Supersonic Decelerator or LDSD is a space vehicle designed to create atmospheric drag in order to decelerate during entry through a planet's atmosphere. It is essentially a disc-shaped vehicle containing an inflatable, doughnut-shaped balloon around the outside. The use of this type of system may allow an increase in the payload. 
It is intended to be used to help a spacecraft decelerate before landing on Mars. This is done by inflating the balloon around the vehicle to increase the surface area and create atmospheric drag. After sufficient deceleration, a parachute on a long tether deploys to further slow the vehicle. 
The vehicle is being developed and tested by NASA's Jet Propulsion Laboratory. Mark Adler is the project manager. 
"For Fuel Conservation in Space, NASA Engineers Prescribe Aerocapture". NASA. 2006-08-17. Retrieved 2007-02-17. 
The race was first carded in its inaugural running in 1952. It became graded for the first time in 1973. 
The Gallorette was run on dirt between 1952-through-1972, in 1979 and 1980, 1984, 1986 and 1987 as well as 1995 and 1996. 
Doke Schmidt (born 7 April 1992) is a Dutch footballer who plays as a right back for SC Cambuur in the Eerste Divisie. He formerly played one season on loan for Go Ahead Eagles. 
The Consumers were the first American punk rock band from Phoenix, Arizona, United States, but their members quickly relocated to Los Angeles, and became involved with the then-burgeoning L.A. punk scene. 
Cutler went on to form Vox Pop, and then 45 Grave, the latter of which incorporated many Consumers songs into their set list. 
In 1982, Cutler engineered and produced the debut EP by The Dream Syndicate, and later joined the band on guitar for their final two albums, Out of the Grey (1986) and Ghost Stories (1988), before their 1989 demise. 
Borens went on to work with Cutler in 45 Grave, as well as with The Romans, Chris Cacavas and Cathedral of Tears.  He died in 2016.  
Wiley started working with other musicians from the Pasadena Mafia and LAFMS circles, and formed Human Hands, a group at the core of L.A.'s art punk and "Associated Skull Bands" scenes. Wiley died in 1986. 
Allen went on to play and record with a short-lived but locally popular Phoenix power pop band, Blue Shoes. 
David Wiley - vocals (1977-1978) Paul B. Cutler - guitar (1977-1978) Greg Jones - guitar (1977-1978) Mikey Borens - bass (1977-1978) Jim Allen - drums (1977) John "Johnny Precious" Vivier - drums (1977-1978) 
The Open Notebook was founded as a 501(c)(3) non-profit organization by freelance science journalists Siri Carpenter and Jeanne Erdmann. 
In 2011, Carpenter and Erdmann expanded the project to include a pitch database, an advice column, and articles on topics such as structuring narrative feature articles, finding and sharpening story ideas, taking good notes as a reporter, and pitching story ideas to editors. 
Gary Price of Library Journal said The Open Notebook "provides unique tools and resources to help science journalists at all experience levels hone their craft". Spencer Davis of The Freelancer by Contently said TON's site "was built for science journalists in particular, but many of the site's resources are just as applicable to all freelance writers". 
"...The Open Notebook [is] a primary resource for science journalists. It offers a primer on how to report and write about science, including how to read a scientific paper and how to explain complex concepts and processes clearly." 
The Open Notebook publishes articles focused on elements of science writing and editing craft. Topics include reporting on risk, reading scientific papers, covering preprint manuscripts, writing about disability, making freedom-of-information requests, being a science writer and managing a mental illness, finding and pitching stories to editors, negotiating freelance rates, and interviewing sources about trauma. 
In 2017, The Open Notebook became a partner with, and fiscal sponsor of, Science Storytellers, an organization that helps children interview scientists using tools of science journalism. This organization, founded by science writer Jennifer Cutraro, operates booths at science fairs and festivals, including at the American Association for the Advancement of Science's annual Family Science Days and at the American Chemical Society's ACS Kids Zone event. 
In 2019, The Open Notebook hosted the first annual science-themed Peeps diorama contest. The project was the idea of Helen Fields, Kate Ramsayer and Joanna Fields, who had participated in past Peeps diorama contests hosted by The Washington Post and other publications. From 50 entries, winners included dioramas depicting, in Peeps, NASA's Hidden Figures, a virology laboratory, the National Museum of Natural History, and other scientific themes. 
Contributors to The Open Notebook have included writers such as Nadia Drake, Ed Yong, Carl Zimmer, Laura Helmuth, Kendra Pierre-Louis, Sharon Begley, Tasneem Raja, Michelle Nijhuis, Anil Ananthaswamy , Melinda Wenner Moyer, Shraddha Chakradhar, Tom Yulsman, Olga Kreimer, Roxanne Khamsi, Brooke Borel, Mara Hvistendahl, George Musser, Azeen Ghorayshi, Sandeep Ravindran, and Charles Seife. 
The team first competed in the Sarasota Rookie League in 1964 and the Florida Rookie League in 1965, predecessors of the Gulf Coast League (GCL), which began play in 1966. The team competed until 1976, then was absent from the league for 30 years. 
In 2007, the team returned to the GCL, and has operated continuously since then. The team claimed its first league championship in 2016. Prior to the 2021 season, the Gulf Coast League was renamed as the Florida Complex League. 
Rapoon is a musical project of Robin Storey, a former member of Zoviet France, who has released material on notable independent labels such as Staalplaat, Soleilmoon, Manifold, Beta-Lactam Ring, and Lens Records. 
This article on a United Kingdom electronic music band is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Pontifical University of Salamanca (in Spanish: Universidad Pontificia de Salamanca) is a private Roman Catholic university based in Salamanca, Spain. 
This Pontifical University has its origins in the unique University of Salamanca, founded in 1218 and one of the oldest institutions of all Europe and the whole world. Resulting from the resolution of the Spanish kingdom of dissolving the faculties of Theology and Canon Law at the University of Salamanca in 1854, Pope Pius XII decided to establish a new pontifical university and restore those faculties in a new institution. Additional faculties and schools were added over the years. 
This Spanish university, college or other higher education institution article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Edward Broughton was born in Dorking in 1803, and had run away from home when he was eleven. He earned his living by petty thieving and later became a highway robber using violence. 
The two survivors concocted the story that after running for six days they left Hutchison and Coventry behind after the men couldn't swim across a river. They later came across some hostile Indigenous occupants and Fagan got speared. 
They were subsequently found guilty of being illegally at large, and were ordered for execution, the judge before whom they were tried, in passing sentence, exhorting them to repentance if their, consciences were burdened with murder, which there was much reason to fear was the case, with reference to their unfortunate companions. 
Alex Woo  (died March 30, 2021) was an American retailer and fine jewelry designer located in New York, New York. She was known for her sculptural charms that blend premium craftsmanship. 
Woo's father, Alexander Woo, was a bench jeweler and began teaching her the basics of jewelry making when she was five years old. He taught her the appreciation of gems, precious metals and fine craftsmanship. He continued to serve as her mentor as she went on to study  at Cornell University, The American University of Paris and the Parsons School of Design. 
In 2009, she co-designed with Christina Applegate a pendant that raises money for Applegate's Right Action for Women foundation. Woo has also been affected by the disease, her mother died from breast cancer. 
Tripodion is a genus of flowering plants in the legume family, Fabaceae. It belongs to the subfamily Faboideae. 
Lionel Guterres (born 7 September 1931) is a Hong Kong field hockey player. He competed in the men's tournament at the 1964 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to a Hong Kong field hockey figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He is a left-arm, medium pace bowler and a right-handed batsman. In first class cricket, he plays for Kerala and in the Indian Premier League. He used to play for Kochi Tuskers Kerala and was picked up by Sunrisers Hyderabad . He is the first Kerala player to earn the award Man of the match title in IPL debut. 
Prasanth came to the training camp of Kochi Tuskers Kerala as a net practice bowler for their batsmen. But he impressed the chief coach Geoff Lawson and got selected to the same team for IPL Season 4. 
In May 2011, he made his IPL debut for Kochi Tuskers Kerala against Delhi Daredevils and picked up the wicket of Virender Sehwag in his first over. He bagged one more wicket and secured Man of the Match by leading Kochi Tuskers Kerala to a comfortable win. 
Prasanth was a good hammer-thrower at school and participated in Kerala's high-profile school athletics meet. He started his cricket career by playing for CMS College Kottayam in college. He shifted to St. Albert's College, Kochi for better training. He was trained at BPCL Kochi Refineries Cricket Academy by former Ranji coach P. Balachandran. Prasanth made rapid progress, which led him to Kerala cricket team for Ranji Trophy.  
He was picked by Indian Overseas Bank, Chennai to play for them at TNCA cricket league. He was picked for the South Zone cricket team for Duleep and Deodhar Trophy competitions.  
He contracted with Kochi Tuskers Kerala for 20 lakh rupees. He was signed by RCB due to the injury of their pace bowler Sreenath Aravind. His over to Chris Gayle in IPL 2011 stood as the most expensive in the history of T20 cricket. Chris Gayle scored 37 from 6 balls (4 sixes 3 fours + 1 no ball) in Royal Challenger Bangalore versus Kochi Tuskers Kerala match. He was picked up by Sunrisers Hyderabad in the IPL 2014 auction for 30 lakhs.  
He is married to actress Shivani Bhai. The family lives in Chennai. The couple have one son named Ishan Puthra P.Parameswaran 
Bromus ciliatus is a species of brome grass known by the common name fringed brome. It is native to most of North America, including most of Canada, most of the United States except for some portions of the South, and northern Mexico. It is a plant of many habitats, including temperate coniferous forest. The specific epithet ciliatus is Latin for "ciliate", referring to the delicate hairs of the leaf blades. 
Bromus ciliatus is common in subalpine areas. It is a very palatable forage grass that is heavily grazed and shade tolerant. The grass occurs in many moist conditions, in wet woodlands, moist meadows or thickets, stream banks, pond and lake margins, bogs, and marshes. 
It was founded by Arthur B. Sleigh in 1855 as The Daily Telegraph & Courier. Considered a newspaper of record over The Times in the UK when the Conservatives are in power, The Telegraph generally has a reputation for high-quality journalism, and has been described as being "one of the world's great titles". 
The Daily Telegraph and Courier was founded by Colonel Arthur B. Sleigh in June 1855 to air a personal grievance against the future commander-in-chief of the British Army, Prince George, Duke of Cambridge. Joseph Moses Levy, the owner of The Sunday Times, agreed to print the newspaper, and the first edition was published on 29 June 1855. The paper cost 2d and was four pages long. Nevertheless, the first edition stressed the quality and independence of its articles and journalists: 
In 1908, Kaiser Wilhelm II of Germany gave a controversial interview to The Daily Telegraph that severely damaged Anglo-German relations and added to international tensions in the build-up to World War I. In 1928, the son of Baron Burnham, Harry Lawson Webster Levy-Lawson, 2nd Baron Burnham, sold the paper to William Berry, 1st Viscount Camrose, in partnership with his brother Gomer Berry, 1st Viscount Kemsley and Edward Iliffe, 1st Baron Iliffe. 
Both the Camrose (Berry) and Burnham (Levy-Lawson) families remained involved in management until Conrad Black took control in 1986. On the death of his father in 1954, Seymour Berry, 2nd Viscount Camrose assumed the chairmanship of the Daily Telegraph with his brother Michael Berry, Baron Hartwell as his editor-in-chief. During this period, the company saw the launch of sister paper The Sunday Telegraph in 1960. 
Canadian businessman Conrad Black, through companies controlled by him, bought the Telegraph Group in 1986. Black, through his holding company Ravelston Corporation, owned 78% of Hollinger Inc. which in turn owned 30% of Hollinger International.  Hollinger International in turn owned the Telegraph Group and other publications such as the Chicago Sun-Times, the Jerusalem Post and The Spectator. 
In June 2014, The Telegraph was criticised by Private Eye for its policy of replacing experienced journalists and news managers with less-experienced staff and search engine optimisers. 
On 26 October 2019, the Financial Times reported that the Barclay Brothers were about to put the Telegraph Media Group up for sale. The Financial Times also reported that the Daily Mail and General Trust (owner of the Daily Mail, The Mail on Sunday, Metro and Ireland on Sunday) would be interested in buying. 
During the 2014 Scottish independence referendum, the paper supported the Better Together 'No' Campaign. Alex Salmond, the former leader of the SNP, called The Telegraph "extreme" on Question Time in September 2015. 
During the 2019 Conservative leadership election, The Daily Telegraph endorsed their former columnist Boris Johnson. In 2019, former columnist Graham Norton, who had left the paper in late 2018, said "about a year before I left, it took a turn" and criticised it for "toxic" political stances, namely for a piece defending US Supreme Court then-nominee Brett Kavanaugh and for being "a mouthpiece for Boris Johnson" whose columns were allegedly published with "no fact-checking at all". 
In 2012, prior to the legalisation of same-sex marriage in the United Kingdom, Telegraph View published an editorial stating that it was a "pointless distraction" as "many [gay couples] already avail themselves of the civil partnerships introduced by Labour". The Telegraph wrote in another editorial that same year that it feared that changing "the law on gay marriage risks inflaming anti-homosexual bigotry". 
Also in 2015, The Telegraph published its "Out at Work" list, naming "the top 50 list of LGBT executives". 
Also in 2016, Telegraph Executive Director Lord Black was awarded Peer of the Year at the 2016 PinkNews Awards for his campaigning on LGBT rights. 
The Telegraph has published articles which have been criticised by PinkNews as transphobic. In 2017, the newspaper published an article by Allison Pearson titled: "Will our spineless politicians' love affair with LGBT ever end?", arguing that NHS patients' being asked their sexual orientation was unnecessary and another in 2018 with the headline: "The tyranny of the transgender minority has got to be stopped". 
In 1995, an interactive spin-off called Electronic Young Telegraph was launched on floppy disk. Described as an interactive computer magazine for children, Electronic Young Telegraph was edited by Adam Tanswell, who led the relaunch of the product on CD-Rom in 1998. Electronic Young Telegraph featured original content including interactive quizzes, informative features and computer games, as well as entertainment news and reviews. It was later re-branded as T:Drive in 1999. 
In November 2012, international customers accessing the Telegraph.co.uk site would have to sign up for a subscription package. Visitors had access to 20 free articles a month before having to subscribe for unlimited access. In March 2013, the pay meter system was also rolled out in the UK. 
My Telegraph offers a platform for readers to have their own blog, save articles, and network with other readers. Launched in May 2007, My Telegraph won a Cross Media Award from international newspaper organisation IFRA in October 2007. One of the judges, Robert Cauthorn, described the project as "the best deployment of blogging yet seen in any newspaper anywhere in the world". 
In May 2009, The Daily Telegraph obtained a full copy of all the expenses claims of British Members of Parliament. The Telegraph began publishing, in instalments from 8 May 2009, certain MPs' expenses. 
The Telegraph justified the publication of the information because it contended that the official information due to be released would have omitted key information about redesignating of second-home nominations. This led to a number of high-profile resignations from both the ruling Labour administration and the Conservative opposition. 
The Daily Telegraph has been named the National Newspaper of the Year in 2009, 1996 and 1993, while The Sunday Telegraph won the same award in 1999. 
In response, the Telegraph called Oborne's statement an "astonishing and unfounded attack, full of inaccuracy and innuendo". Later that month, Telegraph editor Chris Evans invited journalists at the newspaper to contribute their thoughts on the issue. Press Gazette reported later in 2015 that Oborne had joined the Daily Mail tabloid newspaper and The Telegraph had "issued new guidelines over the way editorial and commercial staff work together". 
In January 2017, the Telegraph Media Group had a higher number of upheld complaints than any other UK newspaper by its regulator IPSO. Most of these findings pertained to inaccuracy, as with other UK newspapers. 
In October 2017, a number of major western news organisations whose coverage had irked Beijing were excluded from Xi Jinping's speech event launching a new politburo. However, the Daily Telegraph had been granted an invitation to the event. 
In April 2019, Business Insider reported The Telegraph had partnered with Facebook to publish articles "downplaying 'technofears' and praising the company". 
The paper published premature obituaries for Cockie Hoogterp, the second wife of Baron Blixen, Dave Swarbrick in 1999, and Dorothy Southworth Ritter, the widow of Tex Ritter and mother of John Ritter, in August 2001. 
In January 2019, the paper published an article written by Camilla Tominey titled "Police called in after Scout group run from mosque is linked to Islamic extremist and Holocaust denier" in which it was reported that the police were investigating Ahammed Hussain, the Leader of the Scout Group at the Lewisham Islamic Centre, because he had links to extremist Muslim groups that promoted terrorism and antisemitism. 
The Guardian reported in 2018 that the China Watch newspaper supplement was being carried by The Telegraph along with other newspapers of record such as The New York Times, The Wall Street Journal and Le Figaro. 
In January 2021 British press regulator, the Independent Press Standards Organisation ordered The Daily Telegraph to publish corrections for a "significantly misleading" article published by Toby Young in July 2020 article "When we have herd immunity Boris will face a reckoning on this pointless and damaging lockdown" which spread COVID-19 misinformation that the common cold provided "natural immunity" to COVID-19 and that London was "probably approaching herd immunity". 
In 2014, The Telegraph was one of several media titles to give evidence to the House of Commons Select Committee 'Communicating climate science'. The paper told MPs they believe climate change is happening and humans play a role in it. Editors told the committee, "we believe that the climate is changing, that the reason for that change includes human activity, but that human ingenuity and adaptability should not be ignored in favour of economically damaging prescriptions." 
In July 2021, his former chief advisor, Dominic Cummings claimed that Prime Minister Boris Johnson had always referred to The Telegraph (and not the British public) as his "Real Boss". 
Born into an Irish Catholic family in the Belgravia district of Central London, Pope-Hennesssy's father was Major-General Richard Pope-Hennessy, who was the son of the politician John Pope Hennessy. Pope Hennessy's mother was Dame Una Pope-Hennessy. He was the elder of two sons; his younger brother, James Pope-Hennessy was a noted writer. 
Pope-Hennessy was educated at Downside School, a Catholic boarding school for boys, in Stratton-on-the-Fosse. He then went on to Balliol College at the University of Oxford, where he specialized in modern history. At Oxford, he was introduced by Logan Pearsall Smith, a family friend, to Kenneth Clark, who later became a mentor. 
Upon graduation, Pope-Hennessy embarked his journeyman years by traveling in continental Europe and becoming acquainted with art collections, both public and private. 
Between 1955 and 1963, Pope-Hennessy's three-volume Introduction to Italian Sculpture was published, covering Gothic, Renaissance and High Renaissance and Baroque sculpture. The following year, he was named Slade Professor of Fine Art at the University of Cambridge. 
Pope-Hennessy served as the director of the Victoria and Albert Museum between 1967 and 1973, and then as director of the British Museum from 1974 until 1976. There, he was nicknamed by colleagues as "The Pope". 
Pope-Hennessy was also one of many scholars to serve on the board of Save Venice Inc., a non-profit organization dedicated to the conservation and preservation of Venetian cultural heritage. 
Pope-Hennessy retired at the age of seventy-five and moved permanently to Florence with his lover, Michael Mallon, and resided at  Palazzo Canigiani, where he died five years later. Pope-Hennessy is buried in the Cimitero degli Allori in Florence. His gravestone includes a quote from the First Epistle to the Corinthians in the Bible. 
The name "Montcalm" was chosen by Enfield's selectmen in 1960 when the construction of I-89 was in the planning stages, to replace the name "South Notch" that had been proposed by state highway engineers. Montcalm had once been the name of a settlement in the area which had had its own post office and school. 
Aaron of Pesaro was an Italian Talmudist who flourished in the sixteenth century at Pesaro, Italy. He wrote "Toledot Aharon" (The Generations of Aaron), an index to Scriptural quotations in the Talmud, arranged in the order of the Bible. This was first printed at Freiburg in 1583, and, in an abbreviated form, is found in rabbinic Bibles. His works influenced Aaron ben Samuel.   
The 2012 United States House of Representatives elections in Arizona were held on Tuesday, November 6, 2012, to elect the nine U.S. Representatives from the state, one from each of the state's nine congressional districts, including the newly-created 9th district following the 2010 United States Census. The elections coincided with other federal and state elections, including a quadrennial presidential election, and a U.S. Senate election. Primary elections were held on August 28, 2012. 
The table shows the number and percentage of votes, as well as the number of seats gained and lost, by each political party in the 2012 elections for the United States House of Representatives in Arizona. 
Based upon the new map, the 1st district is slightly friendlier to Democrats than its predecessor. Incumbent Republican Paul Gosar, first elected in 2010, ran for election in the more conservative 4th district. 
The new 4th congressional district encompasses most of the rural areas in the old 2nd district, as well as significant portions of the old 1st, 5th, and 6th districts, according to the final maps of the Arizona Independent Redistricting Commission. The district is heavily-Republican. 
In the November 6, 2012, general election, Paul Gosar, who has represented the 1st district since 2011, was the Republican Party nominee. He moved to Prescott in order to run in the district.  
With the October 2011 redistricting, most of the 6th district became the 5th district and continued to favor Republicans. Incumbent Republican Jeff Flake, who has represented this district since 2001, sought the Republican nomination for the U.S. Senate. 
In accordance with the redrawn boundaries, most of the 4th district became the 7th district and remained the most Democratic district in Arizona. Incumbent Democrat Ed Pastor considered a run for the U.S. Senate but decided against it. 
State senator Kyrsten Sinema, who considered a bid for Congress and lived in the former 4th district, opted to run in the 9th district. 
Fistler did not receive enough write-in votes to appear on the general election ballot as a Republican. 
With the new map, most of the Maricopa County portion of the old 2nd district was renumbered as the 8th district and made more favorable to Republicans. Incumbent Republican Trent Franks, who had considered running for the U.S. Senate, instead ran successfully for re-election. 
With the new map, most of the old 5th District became the 9th District. It now encompasses portions of southern Phoenix, as well as all of Tempe and parts of Scottsdale, Mesa, Chandler and Paradise Valley. It is not considered safe for either party. 
Former Democratic state senator Kyrsten Sinema defeated Republican nominee Vernon Parker and Libertarian nominee Powell Gammill. Sinema won the general election on November 6, 2012. 
The population was 9,663 in the 2001 census, which doubled during the regatta in early August. The population at the 2011 census was 10,405. 
Charles Godfrey Leland's 19th-century verses describe the towns poetically as "The two great Cowes that in loud thunder roar/This on the eastern, that the western shore". 
Cowes has been seen as a home for international yacht racing since the founding of the Royal Yacht Squadron in 1815. It gives its name to the world's oldest regular regatta, Cowes Week, which occurs annually in the first week of August. Later, powerboat races are held. 
Much of the town's architecture is still heavily influenced by the style of ornate building that Prince Albert popularised. 
The name Westcowe was attested in 1413 as the name of one of two sandbanks, on each side of the River Medina estuary, so-called after a supposed likeness to cows. The name was subsequently transferred to fortifications built during the reign of Henry VIII on the east and west banks of the river to dispel a French invasion, referred to as cowforts or cowes. They subsequently gave their names to the towns of Cowes and East Cowes, replacing the earlier name of Shamblord. 
The town's name has been subject to dispute in the past, sometimes being called Cowes, and then West Cowes. For example, a milestone from the 17th century exists, calling the town Cowes, but up until the late 19th Century the Urban District Council bore the name West Cowes. In 1895 West Cowes Urban District Council applied for permission to change the name of the town to Cowes officially, and this was granted on 21 August 1895. 
Whilst the name Cowes has become well established on infrastructure related to the town (including maps, road signage and postal addresses), the name West Cowes remained on Admiralty charts, used by sailors,  until 2015, when it was corrected following a letter from a Cowes resident. 
Red Funnel, the Southampton-based ferry company that provides routes from Southampton to both Cowes and East Cowes, has continued to use the name West Cowes for the town in information and publicity and as the name for the town's terminal. 
In earlier centuries the two settlements were much smaller and known as East and West Shamblord or Shamelhorde, the East being the more significant settlement. 
The seaport at Cowes, Isle of Wight was the first stop on English soil before crossing the Atlantic Ocean with many ships loaded with Germans and Swiss passengers leaving from Rotterdam going to the New World destination of the port City of Philadelphia, Pennsylvania. These Germans and Swiss passengers were going to become British subjects in Colonial America, and the English captains made a written record of the stop in Cowes, England. 
In Cowes the 18th-century house of Westbourne was home to a collector of customs whose son, born there in 1795, lived to become Dr Thomas Arnold, headmaster of Rugby School. 
Northwood House was the home of the Ward family. It was donated under trust to the town in 1929, the grounds becoming Northwood Park.  William George Ward was a close friend of the poet Tennyson and in whose memory the poet wrote six lines. 
Industry in both Cowes and East Cowes has always centred on the building and design of marine craft and materials associated with boat-making, including the early flying boats, and sail-making. It is the place where the first hovercraft was tested. 
Major present-day employers include BAE Systems Integrated System Technologies (Insyte), which occupies the site of the old Somerton Aerodrome at Newport Road, Cowes; and GKN Aerospace in East Cowes. 
The population of the town increases dramatically during Cowes Week, the busiest time of the year for local businesses. The town was reported to be doing well in 2009, despite the economic downturn. 
The high street is where most of the retail shops in the town are located. These include specialist sailing shops catering for yachting enthusiasts. 
Cowes was once served by a rail link to and from the island's capital Newport but as part of cutbacks made on the recommendation of Dr Beeching in the 1960s the line to Newport was cut in 1966. The trackbed south of Arctic Road is now maintained as a cycle path. 
To begin with, the scheme suffered with a huge lack in the number of people using the service, receiving no passengers in its first few days of operation. 
Prior to the network revision by Southern Vectis in April 2006, the park and ride was served by routes 1, 2 and 3, with routes 2 and 3 running under the Route Rouge branding. All services to Cowes served the site, with buses using Three Gates Road to pass between the two current alternate routings, except route 1, which ran via the current park and ride branch but along Mill Hill road as opposed to Newport Road. 
Later in 2008, there were some instances of vandalism at the site, with one woman's car having its windows smashed after she left it in the site overnight. Police are working with the Isle of Wight Council to try to improve security at the site. The council have been told that members of the public are leaving their valuables inside cars at the site, which could be targeted by thieves. 
"Thrown Away" is a 1981 song by The Stranglers. It was the first single from their concept album, The Gospel According to the Meninblack. This was The Stranglers' attempt at a Euro disco song, and the band were confident it would be a hit. However, despite an appearance on Top of the Pops, it could only reach No. 42 in the UK Singles Chart, and continued a two-year period of relative commercial decline for the band. 
Simon Francis Lee (born 29 March 1957 in Gillingham, Kent) is a Professor of Law and Director of Citizenship & Governance Research at The Open University, Visiting Fellow, St Edmund's College, Cambridge, and Emeritus Professor of Jurisprudence at Queen's University Belfast. 
Lee attended school in Gillingham before winning the Brackenbury scholarship to read Jurisprudence at Balliol College, Oxford, where in 1977 he won the Sweet & Maxwell Prize for the University of Oxford "Best Distinction in Law Moderations", in 1978 the Winter Williams Essay Prize and in 1979 took first class honours.  He then attended Yale Law School studying for the LLM as a Harkness Fellow. 
In the annual Times Higher Awards 2006, the University won the category of Outstanding Contribution by a University to the Local Community, for its work with Bradford City Football Club and the local Muslim community in Manningham, and silver for the overall University of the Year.[citation needed] 
In November 2008, the chair of governors at Leeds Beckett University (then Leeds Metropolitan University), Ninian Watt, informed Professor Lee that serious complaints regarding his treatment of staff had been made by a number of staff in the university in such a way that these could not be ignored. Rather than face a suspension, Professor Lee opted to resign and signed a compromise agreement. 
Leeds Metropolitan University announced Simon Lee's resignation on 14 January 2009. The resignation of Lee was preceded, two days earlier, by the resignation of Sir Brendan Foster, in support of Lee. 
Some recent works by Lee include the following: 2016    https://ukconstitutionallaw.org/2016/11/29/simon-lee-dicey-sentiments/  2018    https://judicialpowerproject.org.uk/simon-lee-judicial-power-what-is-left-unsaid/  2019    https://ukconstitutionallaw.org/2019/09/26/simon-lee-the-supremes-seventh-dominant-or-diminished/  2017    https://sixtybookworkout.wordpress.com/  2018    https://uptoyouskip.net/  
Trophon iarae is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Muricidae, the murex snails or rock snails. 
Beckenbach was famous for his work on inequalities and for this subject organized three Oberwolfach seminars (in 1976, 1978, and 1981). He was a co-author of several college textbooks in mathematics, including algebra, trigonometry, and analytic geometry. 
From 1933 to 1960, he was married to Madelene Shelby Simons and had from this marriage a son and two daughters. In 1960, the marriage ended in divorce and in the same year he married his second wife Alice Judson Curtiss. 
The Kingswear Castle paddlesteamer was used for the drama. The scene was shot on the River Medway next to the boat's then moorings in The Historic Dockyard Chatham. In 2013 the ship returned to use on the River Dart in Devon.  Bella Wilfer and the Boffin family go on a family day out. The back streets of the workhouse were filmed in The Historic Dockyard Chatham. 
This article relating to a television programme from the UK is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Allabaculia, or alternatively Alabaculia, (foaled 1773) was a British racemare that was the winner of the first St. Leger Stakes in 1776. Her maternal pedigree was not recorded and she did not race under the name "Allabaculia", with the name bestowed on her at a much later date. Allabaculia does not appear in the General Stud Book compiled by the Weatherbys. 
On 17 March, the "brown-bay filly by Sampson" was fourth in the Craven Stakes held at the Newmarket meeting. The filly contended with 29 horses, losing to Maiden, Plunder and an unnamed colt by Gimcrack. She was fifth in a subscription race a few days later. This was the last start of her career. A mare named Allabaculia does not appear in the General Stud Book compiled by the Weatherby family in the early 1800s. 
Lumerman graduated with a degree in painting in 1935 from the National Academy of Fine Arts in Buenos Aires.  Lumerman studied there with European trained teachers including Aquiles Badi known for his Constructivist and metaphysical tendencies and es:Emilio Centurion known for his command of volumes and form, as well as with es:Carlos Ripamonte a painter of an earlier generation known for his work in an Impressionist vein. 
In 1936, Lumerman won first prize in the VI Feminine Salon of Fine Arts in Buenos Aires.  In a 1993 essay, art historian Cesar Magrini evokes the period and describes Lumerman as "...a pioneer and an explorer of new paths.  Those were years when one could count on the fingers of one hand those women who were permitted to paint, model or sculpt without its being considered a perversion." 
In 1945, Juana Lumerman spent a year exhibiting, traveling and working in Brazil.  Throughout Lumerman's career, dynamic images of carnival, soccer and tango were to serve as counterpoints to more statically structured, more metaphysical, cityscape and still life themes in her painting. 
Despite her travels to Brazil and to Argentina's colorful northern provinces, Lumerman's palette tended to be cool and tonally somber. The artist typically painted easel-size works in oil on board or canvas using a loosely figurative style notable for its fluidity of line and skillful paint handling. 
In a 1952 article the British fine art magazine "The Studio" names Juana Lumerman, Raquel Forner and  es:Mane Bernardo as the three key women in Argentina's visual arts scene. 
Juana Lumerman painted in her studio on Paraguay Street in downtown Buenos Aires until her death in 1982. 
Martha Bodunrin (born 1952) is a Nigerian politician. She was a member of the People's Democratic Party and the House of Representatives 
She joined the People's Democratic Party and was their candidate.  In 2010 she was a member of the House of Representatives when massacres happened in the villages of around the city of Jos. Hundreds died when adults and children were killed. Bodunrin compared the violence to the Rwanda genocides. 
In 2011 she was re-elected to the House of Representatives. Other women elected that year included Folake Olunloyo, Maimunat Adaji, Suleiman Oba Nimota, Betty Okogua-Apiafi, Rose Oko and Nkoyo Toyo. 
The massacres attracted international attention and Bodunrin became an expert witness. Bodunrin has been involved in lobbying parliament to honour its 2000 agreement to the idea of an International Criminal Court who would have the authority to deal with crimes against humanity. 
This biographical article about a football defender from Uruguay born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The following is a list of episodes for the Canadian television series Mr. Young, which airs on YTV in Canada and Disney XD internationally. 
Adam Young (Brendan Meyer), a fourteen-year-old genius, starts work as a high school science teacher. When the school bully, Jordan "Slab" Slabinski (Kurt Ostlund), threatens to beat him up and steals Adam's master key and wreaks havoc throughout the school. Now Adam must get creative in order to resolve the conflict and outwit Slab. 
Guest stars: Brett Dier as Hutch and Gordon Myren as Arthur. Recurring: Raugi Yu as Dang and Anna Galvin as Rachel Young 
Adam learns that Echo (Matreya Fedor) is taking the same route home from school and is excited to walk with her until he learns he has detention duty and the only way to get out of it is to prevent anyone from getting in trouble. Adam and Derby try the whole week to keep Slab from getting detention. 
Guest stars: Amit Josan as Fortran.Recurring:Paula Shaw as Ms. Byrne Absent: Emily Tennant as Ivy Young. 
Adam becomes jealous when Derby accidentally invents a miracle hair growth formula. When someone wants to market his formula, Derby has to recreate it but cannot remember what the formula was. Meanwhile, Ivy needs to pass her CPR course. By the end of the episode, Ivy (Emily Tennant) still did not pass, although she had saved Preston Pickles (she did not pass even if she did it on a real person because Mr. Tater said it only works on the dummy). 
When Adam's "college buddy," a gorgeous twenty-three-year-old girl, comes to visit, Adam thinks she wants to be more than just friends. Derby finds out that she has a boyfriend and has to try to stop Adam from embarrassing himself on their date. Meanwhile, Echo convinces Slab to stage a non-violent protest to prevent Tater from getting rid of the vending machines while Slab gets her to bully people for him. 
Adam tries to get the school's ban on cheerleaders lifted by solving a twenty-five-year-old mystery. It turns out to be Slab's mother who put the glue on the chicken head to blame Rachel (Adam's Mom) . While Rachel was in suspension, Slab's mother kissed Slab's father and married him 11 years later. This story also explains why Mr. Tater is bald. 
Absent: Emily Tennant as Ivy Young, as she is seen as one of the cheerleaders for the Finnegan Fryers and she is mentioned. 
When Adam discovers that Slab is secretly taking ballet, he and Derby follow him to dance class hoping to blackmail him into behaving at school. 
After Adam finds out that Echo is taking her "little sister" to the school carnival, Adam signs up to be a "big brother" so they can spend the day together. Unfortunately, Derby made a typo on the questionnaire which said that Adam was 41 instead of 14, so Adam ends up with a "little brother" who is older than him. Echo's "little sister" starts stalking Derby while Adam's "little brother" spends a lot of time with Echo. 
Adam is made faculty advisor for the school play "Romeo & Juliet", but when Tater casts Echo as Juliet, Adam tries to prevent her from kissing another Romeo.  
Adam holds an overnight astronomy class in the quad, but finds himself competing for his students' attention with principal Tater, who treats it like a camping trip. Adam tries to trick the class into camping with him. Meanwhile, Ivy plays a horsing game with Dang. 
When Adam's mom sells his prized "Mr. Marvelous" comic book to Slab, Adam dresses up as the superhero in an attempt to get it back. 
With Adam, Dang, Mr. Tater, and Mrs. Bryne as the judges, the students try to write a school song for Finnegan High. When all the individual songs turn out to be bad, they all work together. 
Echo shows Adam what he missed when he graduated at age 9. Ivy tries to keep herself clean for picture day and Slab becomes interested in photosynthesis and wants to produce his own food just like plants. 
It's Halloween night, and Echo invites Adam to go to a horror movie screening at the school. In order to attend, a grounded Adam must hide from his mom when she shows up at school. 
Adam tries to get his students to appreciate having a young teacher by pretending to be his own substitute, a cranky old man. The students appreciate his substitute so Principal Tater fires Adam. 
Finnegan High School staff members are auctioned off as servants for a fund-raiser. Adam sees it as an opportunity to spend a day with Echo, but is disappointed when she bids on Mrs. Byrne instead, and his sister Ivy bids on him. Meanwhile Slab bids on Principal Tater for $50,000, and Derby bids on Dang to teach him how to fight. 
Adam gets a new student: Joseph, a ten-year-old genius. At first, Adam is thrilled to have a younger version of himself to mentor. But when he is shown up by Joseph, he lets jealousy get the best of him. 
After being pranked by his students, a fed-up Adam quits Finnegan High School and takes a job in the NASA Space Program. While trying to impress his friends with his new job at NASA, Adam accidentally launches them all into outer space.  
Adam follows Echo to the exotic country of Sanduras in the hopes of spending time with her, but he keeps getting pulled away by his guardian, Mrs. Byrne. Meanwhile, Derby and Slab travel to Sanduras by hot air balloon, and Tater and Dang search for a legendary beast: the Sasquawk. 
The producer of the popular science-based TV show, "Science Schmience" arrives at Finnegan, looking to hire Adam as the show's new host. Adam agrees, seeing this as a great opportunity to spread his love of science to a broad audience. But, when the producer grows bored of Adam's science-y technobabble, he hires Derby as the zanier host of the show. 
Having had his career ruined by Derby, Preston Pickles takes a job as Finnegan High's new shop teacher. But while no one else will believe him, Derby is convinced that Preston is trying to get rid of him. Derby must find a way to restart Preston's career as an infomercial pitchman, or face the wrath of the Derbinator 3000. 
Adam pretends to be a student at Finnegan High, so that he can join the Quiz Team and help Echo win a trophy. But when Slab takes Echo's spot on the team, Adam tries to force Slab off, so Echo can take his place. 
Adam's robot from a previous episode, ARTHUR, returns after being defeated and recycling himself and reprogrammed himself to make android copies of all humans, but the person he is based on comes and he knocks him unconscious at the end. Meanwhile, Echo writes a report about the dangers of robotics, but chaos ensues when the robot Echo holds a paper about the wonders of robotics. But the Derby robot does not get replaced. 
When Adam finds out that Echo is obsessed with Dark Demon, a heavy metal musician that Adam knew in college, he tries to get his old friend to come to Finnegan High. But when Dark Demon refuses to make an appearance, Adam pretends to be the leather-clad rocker, and must perform at Echo's Save the Ferrets benefit. 
After Adam secretly tweaks Echo's science fair project, she wins first prize. With everyone thinking Echo is a genius, she is instantly graduated from Finnegan and offered a full scholarship to Great Northern University. Now Adam, with the help of Derby and Slab, must crash a frat party and convince Echo to come back to Finnegan. 
Adam's plan to take Echo to the school dance is foiled by Principal Tater. Determined to catch a notorious prankster, the "Gagmeister General," red-handed, Tater recruits Adam for a stakeout. Meanwhile, Ivy tries to get sympathy votes for Queen of the Dance by taking Derby as her date. 
Adam is scared his love letter will be shown to Echo until his signature is cut, but another student, Jared, claims he wrote it, he soon has to find a way to prove that Jared didn't write it, also to make sure no one knows it was him. 
Bharath Bopanna (born 7 September 1992) is an Indian model and film actor in the Kannada cinema. He is popularly known by his TV screen name "Lucky" 
Bharath was born on 7 September 1992. He was born to a Kodava speaking community in Madikeri taluk, Kodagu district of Karnataka. 
During his school days, he represented Bantwal taluk in Volleyball and Badminton tournament. He started his career as a Freelancer model in 2014. And also was working in BPO for Aditya Birla Minacs Company. And then moved as Cyber Security analyst in Capgemini. 
Trinity Methodist Episcopal Church and Rectory is a historic Methodist Episcopal church and rectory located at Poughkeepsie, Dutchess County, New York.  The church was built in 1892, and is a Romanesque Revival style brick and stone church. It features a massive hexagonal tower with castellated elements and an opern belfry.  The rectory was also built in 1892, and is a 2 1/2-story Queen Anne style dwelling. 
This article about a historic property or district in Dutchess County, New York, that is listed on the National Register of Historic Places, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a church or other Christian place of worship in New York is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Its most famous station employee was one Luis Donaldo Colosio, who worked as a part-time and backup announcer for two years. 
In 2004, XEDJ went off the air due to legal problems, though some sources say 2007. The concession expired on January 8, 2017. 
Fukui Castle Ruins-daimyomachi Station is served by the Fukui Railway Fukubu Line, and is located 19.3 kilometers from the terminus of the line at Echizen-Takefu. It is also the terminus of a branch line to Fukui Station.  Trains heading from Echizen-Takefu Station to Fukui Station switch directions at this station as if at a switchback; other trains terminate at Tawaramachi.  
 Gulab Singh Saini was an Indian freedom fighter and commander-in-chief of the army of princely state of Ballabhgarh. He led the army of Ballabhgarh state in the Indian Rebellion of 1857 and was hanged on 9 January 1858 in Delhi's Chandni Chowk along with two other leaders of the mutiny. 
On May 10, 1857 when English soldiers advanced from Merut and Ambala to attack Delhi, they had to fight a fierce battle with Gulab Singh Saini and his dare-devil native army. Having completely routed the English army and having made them flee for their lives, he thus played significant role in the coronation of  Bahadur Shah Zafar once again as the emperor of India. 
Gulab Singh Saini was hanged, along with Nahar Singh and Madho Singh,  in the Chandni Chowk of New Delhi on 9 January 1858 after they had been allegedly captured by deception by English forces. Thereupon, all of his property and land was confiscated by the British colonialists and all public records pertaining to him and his companions were burnt down to erase the influence of their martyrdom on the natives. 
McRoberts attended Carmel High School in Carmel, Indiana and led the Greyhounds in both scoring and rebounding during his senior year. According to the Carmel Monthly magazine, McRoberts became an assistant coach for the Carmel High School's varsity basketball team during the 2020-2021 season.  
As of 2021, 247sports.org rates McRoberts as the 3rd highest rated recruit in the history of Duke basketball.  
McRoberts' late-season numbers improved as he recorded 10 of his 15 double-figure scoring games in his final 14 games, while averaging 10.4 points and 6.3 rebounds (with a 59.6 FG%). 
McRoberts underwent a successful lumbar discectomy on August 3, 2006. He had been suffering from chronic back problems since high school and had the operation to alleviate the problem. 
On December 19, 2006 against Kent State, McRoberts had a career-high 19 points, six blocks, six rebounds, four assists, and four steals making him the first Duke player to tally at least four in all five categories. 
On March 22, 2007, McRoberts declared himself eligible for the 2007 NBA draft. On June 28, 2007, he was selected by the Portland Trail Blazers with the 37th overall pick in the NBA draft. 
On January 9, 2008, McRoberts was assigned to the Idaho Stampede, the Trail Blazers' D-League affiliate. After being with the Stampede for nearly a month, and getting an over 20-minute per game increase in playing time, McRoberts was called back up to the Trail Blazers. 
On June 26, 2008, the night of the 2008 NBA draft, McRoberts was traded by the Trail Blazers to his hometown Indiana Pacers in a deal that sent him along with Brandon Rush and Jarrett Jack in return for 11th overall pick Jerryd Bayless and Ike Diogu. 
On December 14, 2011, the Los Angeles Lakers signed McRoberts to a two-year deal worth about $6 million. 
On August 10, 2012, McRoberts was traded to the Orlando Magic as part of the blockbuster deal that sent All-Star center Dwight Howard to the Lakers. 
On July 11, 2013, McRoberts re-signed with the Bobcats. On March 28, 2014, McRoberts scored a career high 24 points in a loss to the Orlando Magic. He finished the season with career highs in games played and starts with 78 each. On April 30, 2014, McRoberts underwent successful surgery to remove bone spurs from his left big toe. 
On December 27, 2016, McRoberts was ruled out indefinitely with a stress fracture in his problematic left foot. 
On July 7, 2017, McRoberts was traded, along with a 2023 second round draft pick and cash considerations, to the Dallas Mavericks in exchange for A. J. Hammons. On February 10, 2018, he was waived by the Mavericks. He saw action in two games for the Mavericks after spending the first 37 games of the season on the inactive list while rehabbing a left foot injury. 
McRoberts can play both power forward and center. His scoring mostly comes off fast breaks, rebounds and hustle plays. He is a screen-setter with a decent jumper, and possesses excellent passing skills for a big man. He is considered an average defender. Pau Gasol called McRoberts "scrappy and a hustler". 
This article about a location in Raqqa Governorate, Syria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to Sudanese association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Peace Harbor Hospital Heliport (FAA LID: 4OR9) was a private heliport located one mile southwest of Florence in Lane County, Oregon, United States. 
David Henry Dewhurst (born August 18, 1945) is an American politician, businessman, and attorney who served as the 41st Lieutenant Governor of Texas, serving from 2003 to 2015. A member of the Republican Party, he was the Texas Land Commissioner from 1999 to 2003. He was a candidate in 2012 for the U.S. Senate seat vacated by the retiring Republican Kay Bailey Hutchison, but he lost his party's runoff election to former Solicitor General Ted Cruz, who went on to win the general election. 
Dewhurst's third term as lieutenant governor ended on January 20, 2015. He served as an advisory board member at the United States Secretary of Energy led by former Governor Rick Perry who was appointed by President Donald Trump in 2017. 
Dewhurst's father, David Dewhurst Jr., was a World War II pilot of a Martin B-26 Marauder of the 553d Fighter-Bomber Squadron. On D-Day, flying over Cotentin peninsula in the "Dinah Might", he led a squadron bombing German positions on Utah Beach. After the war, David Dewhurst Jr. was killed by a drunk driver, leaving behind his wife and his two sons, David and Eugene. 
Both brothers visited the Utah Beach Museum on June 7, 2007 and discovered an exhibit detailing their father's mission on D-Day. Moved, the Dewhurst brothers contributed millions of dollars for the extension of the museum, allowing it to purchase a B-26 Marauder and to open a new building. 
Dewhurst is a businessman, a rancher, and a community leader in Houston, where he has served on civic and charitable boards. He graduated from Lamar High School in Houston and earned his bachelor's degree and played basketball at the University of Arizona in Tucson, Arizona, where he was a brother of the Beta Theta Pi fraternity. There he received a BA in English with a minor in history. 
In 1981, Dewhurst and Ted Law re-established Falcon Seaboard, a Texas-based diversified energy and investments company in Houston that Law had founded in 1935. The company quickly made Dewhurst a millionaire, but collapsed just as quickly, going into bankruptcy. Dewhurst then went into business constructing cogeneration plants, which proved to be a tremendous success. In 1996, the company sold its plants for $226 million, and in 2011, Dewhurst was worth an estimated $200 million. 
In 1995, Dewhurst married Tammy Jo Hopkins, a 32-year-old model. After she pled no contest to driving while intoxicated in 1999, the couple announced that she would seek full-time help for alcohol abuse. The couple divorced in 2000. 
In 2021, Dewhurst was arrested on charges of domestic violence. Dallas police did not release the name of the victim in the incident and did not describe the victim's relationship with Dewhurst.  
He breeds registered Black Angus cattle and once competed in National Cutting Horse Association competitions. He also speaks Spanish. 
Dewhurst was elected lieutenant governor in November 2002, when he defeated former Democratic Comptroller John Sharp of Victoria, now the chancellor of Texas A&M University. In that campaign, Dewhurst stressed his interest in public education and opposition to school vouchers. He again outspent his opponent significantly with a $9 million campaign.  Dewhurst polled 2,341,875 votes (51.77 percent) to Sharp's 2,082,281 (46.03 percent). 
Dewhurst succeeded Bill Ratliff. (Ratliff did not contest the lieutenant governor's position in the primary, opting instead for re-election to his state senate seat.) 
Summarizing Dewhurst's first term, The New York Times wrote, "Amid low expectations, Mr. Dewhurst surprised many that first session, helping to steer a major tort-reform package and cutting the budget while earning the respect of his colleagues as a burgeoning team player." However, the paper also noted that he "frequently frustrated senators from both parties for not appearing to hold firm in negotiations with the House or with [Gov. Rick] Perry." 
Patrick said after state Senator Wendy Davis of Fort Worth (who was the Democratic nominee for governor) filibustered the bill to ban late-term abortions in Texas that Dewhurst has "lost his grip on the reins of the Senate". Patrick called for new leadership in the chamber. 
Polling by the University of Texas at Austin and The Texas Tribune had showed Dewhurst leading his opponents in the primary with 26 percent of the vote, to Patrick's 13 percent, Patterson's 10 percent and Staples' 5 percent. At the time, 46 percent of voters were reported as  undecided. 
In his capacity as the presiding officer of the Texas Senate, Dewhurst, in the third consecutive special session called by the governor, allowed the suspension of the custom that two thirds of the body must vote to consider a bill. 
Dewhurst's leadership on redistricting brought him into legal conflict with his former land commissioner opponent, Richard Raymond, the only elected official to have been a plaintiff in the 2006 U.S. Supreme Court review of the constitutionality of the redistricting plan. Dewhurst and Raymond have also sparred over education policy. 
He is known by his "Texas Children First" initiative with more severe consequences for child sexual predators in Texas and throughout the United States. The initiative includes extending statute of limitations on child sex crimes and leading the passage of Jessica's Law. The bill was signed into law by Texas Governor Rick Perry but the death penalty for second-time child rapists was struck down by the U.S. Supreme Court. 
Dewhurst was accused by state senator Dan Patrick of helping to stop a bill, the passage of which would have been an attempt to make the pat downs of airplane passengers by personnel of the U.S. Transportation Security Agency (TSA) a felony in Texas. 
In an August 3 recording, originally released by police to the Dallas-Fort Worth NBC affiliate, NBC-DFW, Dewhurst identifies himself as the lieutenant governor and asks to speak to the police station's "most senior police officer you have where you are right now". He tells a police sergeant that Ellen Bevers, his stepsister's daughter-in-law, is a schoolteacher and "the sweetest woman in the world", and says he's sure she has been incarcerated on a "mistaken charge". 
On July 18, 2011, Dewhurst addressed his supporters in an online video on his campaign website, announcing his candidacy for the vacant U.S. Senate seat for the Republican nomination. His rivals included former Mayor of Dallas Tom Leppert, ESPN college football analyst Craig James and former state Solicitor General Ted Cruz, the eventual nominee. 
After a year-long campaign for the Republican nomination, Dewhurst lost to Cruz in a run-off on July 31, 2012. Cruz then won the seat in the general election against Democrat Paul Sadler of Henderson. 
Aavi Kumar is a 2015 Tamil horror comedy film directed by Kandeepan. The film stars Udhaya and Kanika Tiwari in the lead roles while Nassar, Jagan and Manobala among others form an ensemble cast. This movie is an unofficial remake of Mohanlal starrer Vismayathumbathu (2004). Music for the film was composed by Vijay Antony and Srikanth Deva and the film opened to negative reviews in July 2015. 
The film struggled to find a distributor and initially, the makers considered giving the film to Cheran's newly launched C2H network to provide a straight-to-DVD release, but eventually opted against doing so. 
The CFMA continued an existing 1992 preemption of state laws enacted in the Futures Trading Practices Act of 1992 which prevented the law from treating eligible OTC derivatives transactions as gambling or otherwise illegal. It also extended that preemption to security-based derivatives that had previously been excluded from the CEA and its preemption of state law. 
The CFMA, as enacted by President Clinton, went beyond the recommendations of a Presidential Working Group on Financial Markets (PWG) report titled "Over-the Counter Derivatives and the Commodity Exchange Act" (the "PWG Report"). 
Before 1974, the CEA only applied to agricultural commodities. "Future delivery" contracts in agricultural commodities listed in the CEA were required to be traded on regulated exchanges such as the Chicago Board of Trade. 
After the 1974 law change, the CEA continued to require that all "future delivery" contracts in commodities covered by the law be executed on a regulated exchange. This meant any "future delivery" contract entered into by parties off a regulated exchange would be illegal and unenforceable. The term "future delivery" was not defined in the CEA. Its meaning evolved through CFTC actions and court rulings. 
To eliminate this risk, the CFTC and the Congress acted to give "legal certainty" to swaps and, more generally, to the OTC derivatives market activities of "sophisticated parties." 
CFTC Chair Brooksley Born replied that the CFTC had exclusive authority over "futures" under the CEA and could not allow the other PWG members to dictate the CFTC's authority under that statute. She pointed out the "concept release" did not propose, nor presuppose the need for, any change in the regulatory treatment of OTC derivatives. She noted, however, that changes in the OTC derivatives market had made that market more similar to futures markets. 
Congress passed a law preventing the CFTC from changing its treatment of OTC derivatives through March 1999. CFTC Chair Born lost control of the issue at the CFTC when three of her four fellow Commissioners announced they supported the legislation and would temporarily not vote to take any action concerning OTC derivatives. CFTC Chair Born resigned effective June 1999.  Her successor, William Rainer, was CFTC Chair when the PWG Report was issued in November 1999. 
The PWG Report also emphasized the desire to "maintain U.S. leadership in these rapidly developing markets" by discouraging the movement of such transactions "offshore." In the 1998 Congressional hearings concerning the CFTC "concept release" Representative James A. Leach (R-IA) had tied the controversy to "systemic risk" by arguing the movement of transactions to jurisdictions outside the United States would replace U.S. regulation with laxer foreign supervision. 
It can be argued that the PWG Report recommendations and the CFMA as enacted did not change the "regulation" of OTC derivatives because there was no existing regulation under the CEA or securities laws. The change to the CEA, however, would be the elimination of existing criteria for distinguishing OTC derivatives from "futures." 
Title I also resolved the issue of "hybrid instruments" by defining when such an instrument would be considered a "security" subject to security laws and excluded from the CEA even though it had a "commodity component." Equivalent treatment of bank products was provided in Title IV. 
Title I retained the CEA's existing preemption of state gambling and other laws that could render a CFTC exempted transaction illegal. It made that preemption applicable to all exempted or excluded transactions. 
Title I also created a new system under which three different types of exchanges could be established based on the types of commodities and participants on such exchanges. 
Title II of the CFMA repealed the 1982 Shad-Johnson Accord that had prohibited single stock and narrow stock index futures and replaced that with a joint CFTC and SEC regulated "security futures" system. 
Title III established a framework for SEC regulation of "security-based swaps." The PWG Report had not addressed this issue. 
Title IV established a framework for CFTC regulation of "bank products." This included coverage of deposit based "hybrid instruments", but went further. The PWG Report had not dealt with these issues beyond how Title IV overlapped with Title I. 
The CFMA did not provide the CFTC or SEC the broader "risk assessment" authority over affiliates of futures commission merchants or broker-dealers that the PWG Report had recommended. 
H.R. 4541 was introduced in the House of Representatives on May 25, 2000, as the Commodities Futures Modernization Act of 2000. Three separate House Committees held hearings on the bill. Each Committee reported out a different amended version of H.R. 4541 by September 6, 2000. 
Another Commodity Futures Modernization Act of 2000 was introduced in the Senate on June 8, 2000, as S. 2697. A joint hearing of the Senate Agriculture and Banking Committees was held to consider that bill. The Senate Agriculture Committee reported out an amended version of S. 2697 on August 25, 2000. 
During the House and Senate committee hearings on these bills, Committee Chairs and Ranking Members described a tight legislative schedule for the bills because of the election year's short Congressional schedule. Sponsors had delayed introduction of the bills as they vainly awaited agreement between the CFTC and SEC on how to regulate the single stock futures contemplated by the PWG Report. That issue dominated the hearings. 
On September 14, 2000, the SEC and CFTC announced they had agreed on a joint regulation approach for "security futures." Senior Treasury Department officials hailed the "historic agreement" as eliminating "the major obstacles to forming a consensus bill." At the same time, Senator Phil Gramm (R-TX), the Chair of the Senate Banking Committee, was quoted as insisting that any bill brought to the Senate Floor would need to be expanded to include prohibitions on SEC regulation of the swaps market. 
As so passed by the House, H.R. 4541 contained, in Title I, the language concerning OTC derivatives that became the source for Title I of the CFMA and, in Title II, the language regulating "security futures" that became the source for Title II of the CFMA. Titles III and IV would be added when the CFMA was enacted into law two months later. 
When Congress returned into session for two days in mid-November, the sponsor of H.R. 4541, Representative Thomas Ewing (R-IL), described Senator Gramm as the "one man" blocking Senate passage of H.R. 4541. Senator Richard G. Lugar (R-IN), the sponsor of S. 2697, was reported to be considering forcing H.R. 4541 to the Senate Floor against Senator Gramm's objections. 
After Congress returned into session on December 4, 2000, there were reports Senator Gramm and the Treasury Department were exchanging proposed language to deal with the issues raised by Sen. Gramm, followed by a report those negotiations had reached an impasse. On December 14, however, the Treasury Department announced agreement had been reached the night before and urged Congress to enact into law the agreed upon language. 
The SEC, the PWG, and others have also expressed concern about the "systemic risk" created by a lack of centralized clearing of credit default swaps. Although (as noted in Section 2 above) the CFMA created the possibility of centralized clearing by removing the pre-CFMA requirements that OTC derivatives not be subject to centralized clearing, the CFMA did not require such clearing, even for "standardized" transactions. 
The first provision of the CFMA to receive widespread popular attention was the "Enron Loophole". In most accounts, this "loophole" was the CEA's new section 2(h). Section 2(h) created two exemptions from the CEA for "exempt commodities" such as oil and other "energy" products. 
First, any transaction in exempt commodities not executed on a "trading facility" between "eligible contract participants" (acting as principals) was exempted from most CEA provisions (other than fraud and anti-manipulation provisions). This exemption in Section 2(h)(1) of the CEA covered the "bilateral swaps market" for exempt "trading facilities." 
While the language of Section 2(h) was in H.R. 4541 as passed by the House, the portion of Section 2(h) dealing with the exempt commercial market had been deleted from S. 2697 when the Senate Agriculture Committee reported out an amended version of that bill. H.R. 4541 served as the basis for Titles I and II of the CFMA.  The Senate Agriculture Committee's removal of the Section 2(h) language from S. 2697, however, served as the basis for later Senate concern over the origins of Section 2(h). 
In 2008 Congress enacted into law over President Bush's veto an Omnibus Farm Bill that contained the "Close the Enron Loophole Act." This added to CEA Section 2(h)(2) a new definition of "electronic trading facility" and imposed on such facilities requirements applicable to fully regulated exchanges (i.e. "designated contract markets") such as the NYMEX. The legislation did not change Section 2(h)(1) exemption for the "bilateral swaps market" in exempt commodities. 
On August 11, 2009, the Treasury Department sent to Congress proposed legislation titled the "Over-the-Counter Derivatives Markets Act of 2009." The Treasury Department stated that under this proposed legislation "the OTC derivative markets will be comprehensively regulated for the first time." 
On December 11, 2009, the House passed H.R. 4173, the so-called Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act of 2009, which included a revised version of the Treasury Department's proposed legislation that would repeal the same provisions of the CFMA noted above. 
House of Glass is the fourth and final novel in the Buru Quartet tetralogy by the Indonesian author Pramoedya Ananta Toer. The original Indonesian edition was published in 1988 and an English translation by Max Lane was published in 1997. 
The Buru Quartet follows the life of Minke, a heroic character loosely based upon pioneering journalist Tirto Adhi Soerjo. Unlike the other novels, House of Glass is not narrated by Minke. Instead, it follows the perspective of his nemesis, a self-loathing colonial official who is trying to destroy the emergent Indonesian independence movement. 
The novel begins with Minke going into exile for five years as a punishment for criticising the government in his newspaper. He is accompanied by Meneer (Jacques) Pangemanann, whom the Dutch colonial authorities then task to spy upon the dissident movement. 
Despite Pangemanann's inner turmoil and his secret admiration for Minke, he nonetheless engineers the journalist's destruction. Visiting Minke's grave, he mourns over his rival. 
John Morley stated that the novel provides "an illuminating, moving account of colonial psychosis", through its exploration of how Pangemanann "succumbs to the lures of power and privilege at the cost of betraying his people and, in the end, himself". 
This is a list of Argentine Academy Award winners and nominees. This list details the performances of Argentine filmmakers, actors, actresses and films that have either been submitted, nominated or have won an Academy Award. 
This list focuses on Argentine films that won or were nominated for the foreign language film award. 
In her early career, Hopko was active as an expert in advocacy, media and political communications, and also worked as a journalist. 
In 2001, she worked as a correspondent of the Inter TV channel in Lviv. In 2002, she led the radio program "EcoHarmony" on Lux Radio. In 2004, she served as a correspondent of the First National TV channel in Lviv. In 2005, she wrote for the program "Life of the Forest." 
Hopko has received awards and honors and won national and international competitions. She was a finalist in the 2nd European audiovisual competition for young journalists, Sustainable Development in News, held in Paris. She also coordinated production of the film Advocacy in Ukraine. 
Hopko has contributed to various training programs for civil society activists in Ukraine, Kazakhstan, the Kyrgyz Republic, Georgia, and Belarus. 
From 2005 to 2007, she worked as communications manager of the Ukraine Citizen Action Network (UCAN/ISC, USAID contractor) in Kyiv, and led environmental journalism training programs in Donetsk Oblast, Belarus and Kazakhstan. 
In 2009, she co-founded the Life Regional Advocacy Center, Ukraine's primary partner of the Bloomberg Initiative to reduce tobacco use, and the Ukrainian representative of ENSP, FCA and WHO. Hopko was deputy director of the Center until April 2012. 
In January 2012, Hopko became a member of the Board of Trustees of the Ohkmatdyt National Children's Specialized Hospital. 
From 2010 to 2012, she was an adviser for the Morality, Spirituality and National Health parliamentary group. From January 2011 to September 2014, she was an advocacy expert at the Institute of Political Education (expert at seminars for assistants, advisors of Members of the Parliament, civic activist) and at the National Democracy Institute (NDI). 
From February to September 2014, she worked as a coordinator of the Reanimation Package of Reforms initiative and served in an inter-factional parliamentary group, Platform of the Reforms. 
During the parliamentary elections following the EuroMaidan revolution, Hopko headed the list of the Samopomich (of Self Reliance[citation needed]) Party, and was elected to the Parliament of Ukraine, where she was appointed chair of the Foreign Affairs Committee on 4 December 2014. 
Hopko was one of a group of young MPs who rode the 2014 revolutionary wave of youth into the upper echelons of Ukrainian politics. The group's supporters considered them less corruptible, as they weren't part of the country's old elite networks that consisted mostly of men who'd gained wealth and power through backdoor deals after the fall of Communism.[citation needed] 
Supporting the ratification of the Rome Statute of the International Criminal Court, Hopko stated: "It is a demonstration of readiness to build a rule-of-law state in which it is possible to punish for crimes against humanity and genocide."[This quote needs a citation] 
On 31 August 2015, Hopko and four other MPs of the Self Reliance party voted in support of amendments to the Ukrainian Constitution that would lead to decentralization. As a result, she and the other MPs were ousted from the party "with great honor".[This quote needs a citation] Hopko stated that the constitutional amendment was "an important step towards comprehensive change in Ukraine" and contained "no concessions to Russia".[This quote needs a citation] 
In May 2017, she co-sponsored a bill in the Ukrainian parliament requiring 75% of national television programming, and 50% of local programming, to be in the Ukrainian language. Hopko and her associates believe that widespread use of the Russian language undermines Ukrainian statehood.[citation needed] 
ADV Films has licensed the rights for the North American release of Magikano on DVD, and released the first volume on December 4, 2007. ADV Films' Anime Network began airing the anime on January 3, 2008 on their Subscription On Demand platform. On March 6, 2008 the anime began airing on their Free On Demand platform. In July 2008, the series became one of over 30 ADV titles to be transferred to Funimation. 
Ayumi Mamiya is a witch cursed to lose her powers but there is one boy who can break the spell and save her. Haruo Yoshikawa thinks he is a normal boy but unknown to him his three sisters are witches who use their magical powers to keep him protected and ignorant about the existence of magic. Now Ayumi must wake up Haruo's latent powers to save herself but his sisters will have none of that. 
Anime reviewers such as the Anime News Network and Mania stated that Magikano has potential. However, Anime News Network joined viewers who disliked the anime, commenting that "it seems devoid of any ambition at all". This same network criticized the ending as "pointless and stupid" reflecting on the abrupt conclusion that changes in tone suddenly. 
Still, anime reviewers such as activeAnime praise the Magikano series and observe the "racy girls with magical means with more comedy and twists that harem fans can imagine!" (Ellingwood, Holly). 
These were the eight pay television operating companies in Uganda, including mode of transmission and area of coverage, as of January 2019. 
At that time, there were 2.2 million pay-television customers in the country, according to the Uganda Communications Commission. 
The 2018 presidential campaign of Maxim Suraykin, Chairman of the Central Committee of the Communists of Russia, was announced on 28 May 2017. During the campaign Suraykin said that he expects to win, or take at least second place. 
Following the election, Maxim Suraykin scored 499,342 votes (0.68%), taking seventh (penultimate) place. 
In December 2016, it became known that the party of Communists of Russia nominated Maxim Suraykin as presidential candidate. 
On 28 May 2017, the Plenum of the Central Committee of the Communists of Russia took the decision on nomination of Maxim Suraykin as presidential candidate. 
In November 2017, Maxim Suraykin was one of the candidates proposed by the Left Front as a single candidate from the left opposition. The results of the voting on the website of the Left Front Suraikin won 59 votes. 
On 24 December Maxim Suraykin were officially nominated at the Communists Russia National Convention. On the same day he submitted to the Central Election Commission. 
His programm consists of two main points. What he would do in the first hundred days and the transitional period between capitalism and a socialist system. 
Signatures in support Suraykin began to gather before New Year holidays. On 22 January Suraykin reported that it was collected 170,000 signatures in the required 100,000. 
On 31 January Maxim Suraykin handed over the signatures to the CEC. The audit revealed only 3.72% of defective signatures with a maximum permissible 5%. 
On 27 January 2018, Maxim Suraykin visited Saint Petersburg, thus starting his presidential campaign journey across the country. Suraykin visited the events dedicated to the 74th anniversary of the lifting of the siege of Leningrad, where he honored the memory of the victims during the siege and laid flowers at Piskaryovskoye Memorial Cemetery. Later, he visited the exhibition of automotive technology during the war, and met with residents of the Kalininsky district of St. Petersburg. 
On 9 February Maxim Suraykin visited Ryazan. During his visit he put flowers to the statue of Lenin. He continued to visit the local markets and factories. 
After losing the election, Maxim Suraykin criticized the election, saying: "we know how our electoral system works." 
Suraykin said that his "real result" should be from 15% to 20%, but did not rule out that "the unique electoral system will eventually give less than a percent." He noted that such an indicator would not suit him at all. Then declared: "I warn all members of the (Electoral) Commission, all heads of the commissions where you have zero, guys, we to you will come. We will study these results and achieve criminal liability for counterfeiters. We are quite a strong party." 
Mills began teaching physiology at McGill in 1884, eventually becoming the first Joseph Morley Drake Chair professor of physiology in 1891. He founded the Society for the Study of Comparative Physiology in 1885, was elected to the Royal Society of Canada in 1890, and became president of the Natural History Society of Montreal in 1894. 
Born in New Mexico, Nesbett earned his law degree at the University of San Francisco in 1940 and served with distinction in the Navy during World War II, commanding the USS Atlas and earning a Bronze Star. 
He settled in Anchorage, Alaska after the war and practiced law until his appointment in 1959 to be the first chief justice of the newly created Alaska Supreme Court. Given three years to set up the new state's courts, he accomplished the job in 6 months. He served on the court until 1970, when an airplane accident led him to resign for reasons of health. 
Nesbett was also involved with an effort to reopen an Alaskan coal mine; he was president of the Buffalo Coal Mining Company and suffered financial losses when the company was unable to successfully reopen the mine. 
Nesbett married Enid Elsie "Barbara" Allen, an English nurse whom he met in England during the war; he left 6 children, 2 sons and 4 daughters, at the time of his death. 
He was probably one of the first writers to utilize his lyrical literary voice to proclaim and African identity and to expose the polemics of ethnic classification in the Dominican Republic. 
Speed skating at the 2011 Canada Winter Games was held at the permanent Canada Games Oval in Halifax, Nova Scotia.  
Kaufusi also played college football at Brigham Young University and attended junior college at Dixie State. 
Most recently, Kaufusi was defensive-line coach at Brigham Young University, stepping down in January 2018. He played a key role in recruiting Polynesian players to BYU. Kaufusi was one of just a few Tongans coaching in Division I football. 
Kaufusi's three sons, Bronson, Corbin, and Devin all played college football for the BYU Cougars, with Bronson and Corbin both having played for the BYU basketball team as well. His wife, Michelle Kaufusi is currently mayor of Provo, Utah. 
This biographical article relating to an American football defensive lineman born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
As a result of this potential outcome, Colorado Representative Bob Beauprez introduced legislation before the United States House to cut foreign aid to countries that refused to extradite people suspected of murdering American law enforcement agents.  This bill was signed into law in November 2005.  One local radio personality declared that if anything good came of Young's death it would be because it would highlight the problem of illegal immigration. 
"Supernova" is a song by Norwegian pop and rap duo Cir.Cuz, featuring Julie Bergan. It was released on November 30, 2012, as a digital download in Norway. The song peaked at number 5 on the Norwegian Singles Chart. 
A music video to accompany the release of "Supernova" was first released onto YouTube on December 27, 2012 at a total length of three minutes and fifty-five seconds. 
Pilafian participated in the National Music Camp in Interlochen, MI and was the second tuba player to win the concerto competition. Via his performance at Interlochen, he was awarded scholarships to study at both Dartmouth College and the Tanglewood Music Center. Leonard Bernstein chose Pilafian to perform in the world premier of Bernstein's Mass at the opening of the John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts. He earned his bachelor's degree in music at the University of Miami in 1972. 
Since then, Pilafian performed numerous times in international concerts and recordings. He founded the Empire Brass and performed in the Broadway Musicals Doctor Jazz and Much Ado About Nothing. He also played with Boston Brass from 2013-2019 
Pilafian started teaching at Arizona State University in 1994 and later at North Dakota State University in 2017. Among his notable students is Marcus Rojas. 
Hans-Werner Bothe (born 23 September 1952 in Langelsheim, near Goslar) is a German philosopher and neurosurgeon. Bothe is founder of the recent field of research on Neurobionics. 
Bothe initiated and organized the 1st International Workshop on Neurobionics in 1992 and founded thereby the recent field of research on Neurobionics, which aims at substitution of impaired functions of brain and spinal cord by neurosurgical implantation of microelectronic systems. For that purpose, he brought together an international consortium of scientists covering for mathematics, neuroinformatics, biological basic research, microsystems, and medicine. 
In 1991 he launched the International Neurobionics Foundation together with Daniel Goeudevert, Madjid Samii, and other representatives of science, industry, and policy. From 1991 until 1995 he managed the foundation as executive director of the board. He developed microelectronic implants to treat blind patients suffering from damaged retina (with B. Fischer, J.W. Bartha, et al.), microelectronic therapy to manage urinary incontinence (with B. von Heyden), and paraplegia (with J. Holsheimer). 
Tiffany is a town in Dunn County, Wisconsin, United States. The population was 633 at the 2000 census.  The villages of Boyceville and Downing are located within the town. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 633 people, 230 households, and 177 families residing in the town. The population density was 21.1 people per square mile (8.2/km2). There were 239 housing units at an average density of 8.0 per square mile (3.1/km2). The racial makeup of the town was 99.53% White, and 0.47% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.26% of the population. 
There were 230 households, out of which 38.3% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 67.0% were married couples living together, 5.7% had a female householder with no husband present, and 23.0% were non-families. 16.5% of all households were made up of individuals, and 6.5% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.75 and the average family size was 3.10. 
In the town, the population was spread out, with 27.8% under the age of 18, 8.8% from 18 to 24, 26.5% from 25 to 44, 25.9% from 45 to 64, and 10.9% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 37 years. For every 100 females, there were 110.3 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 109.6 males. 
The median income for a household in the town was $38,750, and the median income for a family was $42,750. Males had a median income of $31,500 versus $21,023 for females. The per capita income for the town was $18,203. About 12.9% of families and 10.4% of the population were below the poverty line, including 15.0% of those under age 18 and none of those age 65 or over. 
With his brother Giovanni Tegano, he is considered to be the boss of the Tegano 'ndrina.[citation needed] The clan hails from the Archi neighbourhood in the city of Reggio Calabria. He has been sentenced to life imprisonment for murder, extortion and mafia association. 
The Tegano clan sided with the De Stefano clan in the Second 'Ndrangheta war, which raged from 1985 to 1991. The alliance was sealed by the marriage between Orazio De Stefano and Antonietta Benestare, a niece of Giovanni Tegano on December 2, 1985. The bloody six-year war between the Condello-Imerti clan and De Stefano allied with the Tegano clan left 621 deaths. 
While the main leaders of De Stefano clan were killed it fell upon the Teganos to wage the war. The Teganos were the key negotiators for the 'pax mafiosa' in Reggio Calabria in the 1990s between the Tegano, De Stefano, Libri and Latella clans on one side and the Imerti, Serraino, Condello and Rosmini clans on the other, in which they divided their spheres of influence in Reggio Calabria. 
He became a fugitive in 1994, and was arrested on August 6, 2004. At that time, differences between the Tegano clan and the De Stefanos emerged over the division of extortion rackets.[citation needed] The Teganos secured the neutrality of their old enemy Pasquale Condello. 
After sitting out a season, Andy Kaufmann returned for the 1992-93 campaign and helped lead Illinois to a 19-13 record and trip to the NCAA Tournament. 
Alexander Duncan McEachern (born September 27, 1939) is a former provincial level politician from Alberta, Canada. He served as a member of the Legislative Assembly of Alberta from 1986 to 1993. 
McEachern ran for political office for the first time in the 1975 Alberta general election. He ran in the electoral district of Edmonton-Glenora as a candidate for the New Democrats but was badly defeated by incumbent cabinet minister Lou Hyndman. 
He made a second attempt to run for office in the 1979 general election in the Edmonton-Kingsway electoral district. This time he finished second to incumbent Progressive Conservative MLA Kenneth Paproski. He attempted a third run for office in the 1982 Alberta general election with another second-place finish slightly improving his vote total to Progressive Conservative candidate Carl Paproski. 
McEachern is still active with the Alberta New Democrats serving as the President of the Lesser Slave Lake electoral district. 
David Gary Holdsworth (born 8 November 1968) is an English former professional footballer turned manager. 
As a player, he was a defender who played between 1986 and 2005 for Watford, Sheffield United, Birmingham City, Walsall, Bolton Wanderers and Gretna. In 2008, he moved into management and has since been in charge of Ilkeston Town, Mansfield Town, Lincoln City and Goole. 
Holdsworth started his career at Watford in the mid 1980s, going on to make more than 250 league appearances for the club. At Watford he played alongside his brother Dean Holdsworth. 
In March 1999 Holdsworth transferred to Birmingham City. He helped Birmingham to the play offs at the end of that season where they faced his former club Watford. However Holdsworth was sent off as they lost on penalties. He spent three full seasons there, helping them to the 2001 League Cup Final in which he was an unused substitute in the defeat to Liverpool. 
In January 2002 he went on loan to Walsall. At Walsall he scored once against Coventry but was sent off twice in 3-0 defeats to Sheffield Wednesday and Wolves. 
After being released by Birmingham in 2002, he joined Bolton Wanderers on a free transfer where he played alongside his brother Dean again. However, he only made one appearance for the Trotters: in a League Cup defeat to Bury (David started and his brother Dean came on as a substitute). Shortly afterwards he joined Scarborough in the Football Conference and then Scottish club Gretna where he retired. Whilst at Gretna he scored once, his goal coming in the Scottish Cup against Dumbarton. 
After retiring from playing he became reserve team manager at Gretna, where he was appointed director of youth development in May 2006, but was sacked in a cost-cutting exercise a few months later. On 20 May 2008, Holdsworth was appointed to his first managerial role, taking over at Northern Premier League Premier Division side Ilkeston Town from Nigel Jemson, the first appointment of new owner Check Whyte. 
On 29 December 2008 Holdsworth was appointed as the new manager of Conference National club Mansfield Town having led Ilkeston to sixth in the Northern Premier League Premier Division, ten points off first placed Hednesford Town with two games in hand. 
On 18 November 2010, it was announced that Holdsworth had agreed to leave Field Mill by mutual consent after less than two years with the club. 
On 14 October 2013, he returned to management with Goole with his former Sheffield United teammate Curtis Woodhouse acting as his assistant. Holdsworth stepped down as Goole manager on 27 January 2014 with Woodhouse taking over the role. 
In 1977, Carradine starred opposite Harvey Keitel in Ridley Scott's The Duellists. Pretty Baby followed in 1978. He has acted in several offbeat films of Altman's protege Alan Rudolph, playing a disarmingly candid madman in Choose Me (1984), an incompetent petty criminal in Trouble in Mind (1985), and an American artist in 1930s Paris in The Moderns (1988). 
In 2016 Carradine returned to star in his fourth Alan Rudolph film Ray Meets Helen, which was the final screen appearance of Sondra Locke. 
In July 2016, Carradine hosted a month-long series of Western films on Turner Classic Movies. He appeared in dozens of wraparounds on the channel, discussing such films as Stagecoach, featuring his father, and McCabe and Mrs. Miller, in which he himself appears in a small role. 
In 2012, Carradine lent his voice to the video game Hitman: Absolution, voicing the primary antagonist Blake Dexter. 
On November 18, 2006, Carradine married actress Hayley DuMond, in Turin, Italy. They met in 1997 when they co-starred in the Burt Reynolds film The Hunter's Moon. 
After 15 matches, the league splits into two sections of eight teams each, with teams playing every other team in their section once (either at home or away). The exact matches are determined upon the league table at the time of the split. 
Championship Play-off start at 14 November to Final at 5 December. If scores are tied after regular time, the higher placed team advances to the next phase. 
Promotion-Relegation Play-off start at 6 December. The 14th position of K3 League will face winner of K4 League Play-off for reach promotion to K3 League next season. 
This article about a South Korean football competition is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Aran Volcanic Group is a geologic group in Wales. It preserves fossils dating back to the Ordovician period. 
This article about a specific stratigraphic formation in the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Hindu-Muslim unity is a prerequisite for freedom of India. It is the religious and political duty of the Muslims that they should work for the freedom of India and continue this struggle until the Government accedes to their demand. It is their duty, which they must do with or without companions, it is the order of the Almighty. If non-Muslims extend to you the hand of friendship, you too must extend yours, for compromising for the right cause will establish you as true believers in Allah.
Malik Khizar Hayat Tiwana, the Premier of Punjab in colonial India, advocated for amity between the religious communities of undivided India, proclaiming March 1 as Communal Harmony Day and aiding in the establishment of a Communal Harmony Committee in Lahore, in which Raja Narendra Nath served as president and Maulvi Mahomed Ilyas as secretary. 
In the same vein, Kashmiri Indian politician and Supreme Court judge Markandey Katju wrote in The Nation: 
On the other hand, Ajay Verghese says that the conflicts between the Hindu-Muslim population existed long before arrival of the British to the Indian subcontinent; he says that in places where British had less influence (like the princely states), the number of communal riots was more frequent as compared to places which were directly under British rule (like British Indian provinces). 
The men's team class 9-10 table tennis event was part of the table tennis programme at the 2012 Summer Paralympics in London. The event took place from Wednesday 5 September to Saturday 8 September. 
They serve as bookends to the instrumental track "Terminal Frost", and feature David Gilmour's voice, electrically distorted, through a vocoder and a rising synth note. The narrator seems to express weariness with a lifetime spent in one body, waiting for the moment of death, but seeks consolation in the fact that this "waiting" will eventually end. 
"A New Machine has a sound I've never heard anyone do. The noise gates, the Vocoders, opened up something new which to me seemed like a wonderful sound effect that no one had done before; it's innovation of a sort."
The two songs were the first Pink Floyd songs to be credited solely to David Gilmour since "Childhood's End", from their 1972 album Obscured by Clouds. 
The organization was founded in 1975 at a conference of the Association of Zoos and Aquariums (then named the American Association of Zoological Parks and Aquariums). 
CAZA-AZAC's main vehicle is its accreditation program. Standards of conduct are set out for animal care, animal transport, human and animal contact; as well as operational matters such as staffing, physical facilities, and emergency preparation. Inspection teams, including at least one veterinarian and a senior zoology professional, audit all aspects of the operation of the potential member. 
Members must agree to a Code of Ethics. Included in the Code is agreeing to "Ensure that when animals are obtained from the wild, that such acquisitions will not have a deleterious effect upon the wild population and are acquired incorporating all legal and ethical approval methods and documentation." Further, mutilation of any animal for a cosmetic purpose or changing the animal's physical appearance without valid husbandry or medical reasons is also not permitted. 
Full re-inspections of members' facilities are made every five years. If, during that period, a concern is raised about any aspect of a member institution, the Accreditation Commission or Ethics Committee may conduct an interim review. 
The organization states that member organizations have a long history of working to restore biodiversity and preserve species in Canada and abroad, collaborating regularly with government agencies, NGO's and volunteer organizations with those aims. Members "participate in close to 800 conservation and science programs within their facilities and are directly involved in 20 field projects, most linked directly to helping save endangered species." 
The organization's website sets out policies and position statements on a number of issues, such as the limited use of wild or exotic animals for performances, and around the issue of captive dolphins and whales. 
Protests of conditions at Marineland of Canada continue, with a demonstration on May 17, 2014 when the park opened for the season. 
Devi Ahilya Vishwavidyalaya formerly University of Indore was established in 1964 by an Act of Legislature of Madhya Pradesh. Dr. Zakir Hussain, then Vice President of India, inaugurated the university in 1964. The jurisdiction of the university was limited to Indore district. 
In 1988, the university was renamed after the Holkar Maharani 'Devi Ahilya Bai Holkar' of the Maratha Empire as 'Devi Ahilya Vishwavidyalaya'. The word vishwavidyalaya is Hindi for university, thus, the university is called Devi Ahilya Vishwavidyalaya. 
During reorganization of the universities, its jurisdiction was expanded over to Indore division, which spans over seven districts. 
University spreads over an area of 760 acres in which academic classes holds in Takshila parisar (campus) of university which spreads over an area of 510 acres and Avanti parisar (campus) which spreads over 154 acres. Nalanda parisar (campus) is for administrative and official works which spreads over an area of 100 acres. 
During the initial stages of its development 1964-1984, University established conventional School of Studies in Physics, Mathematics, Statistics, and Chemistry.  It was one of the first few universities to start B.Ed. in 1968 and MBA in 1969. It later started Life Sciences, Economics, Biochemistry and Journalism. 
University is one of the first in starting as early as 1991 the experiment of self-supporting courses in order to have partial support for the development of infrastructure.  This experiment has certainly made a positive impact on the overall development of the University both in terms of employment opportunities on one side and students needs on the other. 
The Engineering and Technology (I.E.T.) Institute of Engineering and Technology, DAVV has started functioning since 1996 and now runs number of B.E. and M.E. courses. The admissions in I.E.T. is held through Madhya Pradesh Pre-Engineering Test (M.P.P.E.T.), which will be further altered in 2014 under which admissions will be held on the basis of all India ranking in Joint Entrance Exam (J.E.E.). University also runs medical and dental colleges. 
UGC has granted SAPs to School of Education, School of Economics, School of Life Sciences and School of Physics in the University. 
University is first in the state of Madhya Pradesh in innovation and has made a name in country for (a) Courses in Computer Science, Information Technology, Management and Engineering Sciences (Energy Management, Laser Optics, Instrumentation, Futures Studies, Technology Management, Data Sciences) (b) Its research work in fields of Education, Life Sciences, Physics, Economics and Chemistry and (c) Excellent Centers for Electronic Media, Adult Education and Information Technology. 
DAVV through its law faculty, School of Law has bestowed India and especially Madhya Pradesh with many legal illuminaries in all fields such as litigation, activists, corporate officers etc. SOL (School of Law) is one amongst the oldest and most recognized law schools in Indore and amongst top law schools in state. Its meritorious students have held its name high and are well placed in judicial services, public sector and private sector. 
Apart from specialized schools of studies university also conducts several research works with assistance of UGC. For this university have a separate committee of deans which suggest ways to streamline the entire process of Ph.D. thesis evaluation mechanism. The university have established a Sodha Peeth on Devi Ahilya to motivate research on regional issues. New postgraduate degree programmes in research on their lines of IITs/Central universities are envisaged. 
Gyanvani FM Radio was established on June 2006. It delivers educational content through radio to cross-segment of the society. 
Gyanvani is an educational FM radio station broadcasting in several cities of India. Gyanvani stations operate as media cooperative with day-to-day programmes being contributed by educational institutions, NGOs, government and semi-government organizations, UN agencies, ministries such as Agriculture, Environment, Health, Women and Child Welfare, Science & Technology etc. besides national-level institutions such as NCERT, NIOS and State Open Universities. 
The tradition of the Greeks says that St. Matthias planted the faith about Cappadocia and on the coasts of the Caspian Sea, residing chiefly near the port Issus. 
According to Nicephorus (Historia eccl., 2, 40), Matthias first preached the Gospel in Judaea, then in Aethiopia (by the region of Colchis, now in modern-day Georgia) and was crucified. An extant Coptic Acts of Andrew and Matthias, places his activity similarly in "the city of the cannibals" in Aethiopia.[a] A marker placed in the ruins of the Roman fortress at Gonio (Apsaros) in the modern Georgian region of Adjara claims that Matthias is buried at that site. 
The Synopsis of Dorotheus contains this tradition: "Matthias preached the Gospel to barbarians and meat-eaters in the interior of Ethiopia, where the sea harbor of Hyssus is, at the mouth of the river Phasis. He died at Sebastopolis, and was buried there, near the Temple of the Sun." 
Not that they became apostles through being chosen for some distinguished peculiarity of nature, since also Judas was chosen along with them. But they were capable of becoming apostles on being chosen by Him who foresees even ultimate issues. Matthias, accordingly, who was not chosen along with them, on showing himself worthy of becoming an apostle, is substituted for Judas.
Surviving fragments of the lost Gospels of Matthias attribute it to Matthias, but Early Church Fathers attributed it to heretical writings in the 2nd century. 
The Eastern Rites of the Eastern Orthodox Church celebrate his feast on 9 August. Yet the Western Rite parishes of the Orthodox Church continues the old Roman Rite of 24 and 25 February in leap years.[citation needed] 
It is claimed that St Matthias the Apostle's remains were brought to Italy through Empress Helena, mother of Emperor Constantine I (the Great); part of these relics would be interred in the Abbey of Santa Giustina, Padua, and the remaining in the Abbey of St. Matthias, Trier, Germany. According to Greek sources, the remains of the apostle are buried in the castle of Gonio-Apsaros, Georgia.[citation needed] 
 Oriana Baddeley is a professor of transnational art history at UAL where from 2011 to 2020 she was Dean of Research. 
She was co-founder of the UAL research centre for Transnational Art, Identity and Nation; is a Trustee of the St Catherine Foundation in London and New York; the Ashley Family Foundation; on the Advisory board of the Hyundai Tate Transnational Research Centre; and she is Chair of the Practice Research Advisory Group-UK. 
Alexandra is a ghost town in Yavapai County, Arizona, United States. The ghost town was settled during the frontier days of 1875 as a mining camp until abandoned in 1896. Alexandra is ten miles east of Mayer. 
This article show all participating team squads at the 2015 FIVB World Grand Prix, played by twelve countries with the final round held in. 
The five second division teams were split into two groups, north and south. The two regional winners met in the final. As Hapoel Acre forfeited its matches in the northern group, there was only one match in each regional group, acting as a semi-final. 
A TV series was made in 1994, directed by Tomas Alfredson and Svante Kettner. It was followed by a feature film in 1995, also directed by Alfredson. In late-July 2016 the recording of a new Bert film was announced. 
Between 1993 and 2002, a comic book, FF med Bert, was published and between 1992 and 1999, comic albums were published. 
Lill-Erik is the weak guy. He plays the accordion or the drums in the Heman Hunters. Before his arrival from Sundsvall, rumors make everybody think he is the strong "Stor-Erik" or "Erik the Great" who is able to beat up Klimpen. He has a fear of girls, after he showed his penis to his cousin at 5 years old and she told him it looked like a worm. Despite that, he had been on dates in later books. 
Rebecka Molin is the first girl Bert is in love with, which occurs in the mid 5th grade when the book series start. 
She also appears in the Bert comics, where she has a quicker temper, and two cousins, one is named Lovisa from Gothenburg who Bert doesn't know when she arrives by train making Bert confused, and another cousin named Antonia Ridderfjell. 
The Operacycle was an American indie rock band from Portland, Oregon. Initially formed as a solo project by multi-instrumentalist Jordan Hudson, the act's sole full-length album, Warmer, was released in 2000. 
The Operacycle toured the United States during the autumn of 2000 and performed at the College Music Journal (CMJ) music festival in New York. In addition to Warmer, the group has appeared on various self-titled and split EPs. In early 2002, Hudson became the founding drummer for The Thermals, while Riles joined Grails as lead guitarist. In addition, both Hudson and Riles performed and recorded for many years with M. Ward. 
He played professional soccer as a midfielder for Lincoln City Football Club. Currently he coaches at the Arizona soccer club SC del Sol. 
This biographical article related to association football in England, about a midfielder born in the 1960s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to an English association football manager is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Prerna Wanvari is an Indian  actor. She has acted in TV shows, like Bandini, Koi Aane Ko Hai,  Adalat, Gumrah: End of Innocence, Sapna Babul Ka...Bidaai and Parichay. She presented the Arts Programming Award at the International Emmy Awards Gala which was held at New York's Hilton Hotel on November 2012. 
K. P. Kunhahammed Kutty Master is an Indian politician from Kerala and a member of the Communist Party of India (Marxist). He is a member of the Kerala Legislative Assembly from  Kuttiady. 
This article about a Communist Party of India politician from Kerala is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
  The Competition Appeal Tribunal (CAT) of the United Kingdom was created by Section 12 and Schedule 2 to the     Enterprise Act 2002 which came into force on 1 April 2003. The Competition Service is an executive non-departmental public body which was created as a support body for the Competition Appeal Tribunal. 
In a judgment handed down in September 2014, the Competition Appeal Tribunal quashed the Office of Fair Trading's decision to accept commitments in the online hotel booking sector and the matter was reverted to the CMA for reconsideration. 
This article relating to law in the United Kingdom, or its constituent jurisdictions, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
After spending two years at Williams College, Heider transferred to Harvard College where he earned his B.A. in anthropology. Heider then spent a year touring Asia on a Sheldon Traveling Fellowship provided by Harvard. Returning to Harvard in 1958, Heider went on to earn an M.A. in 1959 and Ph.D. in 1966. 
He was married to the psychologist Eleanor Rosch with whom he studied the Dani people.  The couple divorced in the late 1970s. 
It has included going into the West Papua region in the 1960s and 1990s, as well as producing works on ethnographic film making and writing on Indonesian cinema. 
At the flag-raising ceremony, in protest at the flying of the Union Flag for his second place, O'Connor scaled a flagpole in the middle of the field and waved the Irish flag, while the pole was guarded by Con Leahy. 
In the hop, step and jump competition two days later, O'Connor beat his fellow-countryman, Con Leahy, to win the gold medal.  At 34 he was the oldest ever Gold Medal winner in this event. Prinstein, the champion in 1900 and 1904, did not feature in the medals. 
O'Connor won no more titles after 1906.  He remained involved in athletics all his life.  He was a founder member and first Vice-President of Waterford Athletic Club, and attended later Olympics both as judge and spectator.  He practised as a solicitor in Waterford, and was married with nine children.  He died in Waterford on 9 November 1957. 
This biographical article relating to Argentine cycling is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Deane was born in Cardiff and educated at Trinity College, Dublin. He was appointed Prebendary of Clonamery in Kilkenny Cathedral in 1671; Treasurer of Waterford Cathedral in 1687; and Dean of Cloyne in 1704; and held all three positions until his death. 
These are the official results of the Women's 200 metres event at the 1990 European Championships in Split, Yugoslavia, held at Stadion Poljud on 29 and 30 August 1990. 
Gorka was born in Haifa, Israel. He played college basketball for University of West Florida's Argonauts, Wallace State Community College and the Spring Hill College's Badgers, alongside Eric Campbell and Tony Younger. 
Gorka started his professional career with Hapoel Haifa and later joined Maccabi Kiryat Bialik and Maccabi Ramat Gan. 
In 2006, Gorka started his coaching career as the assistant coach of Ironi Nahariya under Ariel Beit-Halahmy. 
On August 18, 2014, Gorka was named the assistant coach of Bnei Herzliya under head coach Muli Katzurin. On February 10, 2015, Gorka was named Bnei Herzliya new head coach for the rest of the season. On April 2, 2015, Gorka was named Israeli League Coach of the Month for games played in March. 
On December 1, 2016, Gorka was named Israeli League Coach of the Month for games played in November. In his third season with Herzliya, he led the team to the 2017 Israeli League Playoffs as the fifth seed, but they eventually were eliminated by Maccabi Tel Aviv in the Quarterfinals. 
On December 5, 2017, Gorka parted ways with Herzliya after three years as the head coach. Six days later, Gorka was named the assistant coach of Hapoel Jerusalem for the rest of the season. 
On December 14, 2018, Gorka was named the head coach of Maccabi Rehovot for the rest of the season, replacing Roy Hagay. 
As of 2011, Gunachaur has a total number of 784 houses and population of 3808 of which 1986 include are males while 1822 are females according to the report published by Census India in 2011. The literacy rate of Gunachaur is 78.86%, higher than the state average of 75.84%. The population of children under the age of 6 years is 383 which is 10.06% of total population of Gunachaur, and child sex ratio is approximately 877 as compared to Punjab state average of 846. 
Most of the people are from Schedule Caste which constitutes 69.33% of total population in Gunachaur. The town does not have any Schedule Tribe population so far. 
As per the report published by Census India in 2011, 1237 people were engaged in work activities out of the total population of Gunachaur which includes 1096 males and 141 females. According to census survey report 2011, 86.50% workers describe their work as main work and 13.50% workers are involved in Marginal activity providing livelihood for less than 6 months. 
In 1659, the first local pension fund for vicars' widows was established. This gradually became a more popular option, but some parishes continued to practise widow conservation until the late 18th century. 
In Mark Brandenburg, widow conservation was a common practice in the 17th century. In 1698, Frederick III of Brandenburg banned widow conservation by the Juramentum simoniae, as being a form of purchase of the vicarage office. 
The first widow conservation in Mecklenburg is documented from 1551, and by 1580 it had become a common practice, which was recommended by the church order of 1602. By 1704, one third of all vicars' wives were the widow of the vicar's predecessor. 
From 1623 onward, however, there was also an increasing number of widow funds, which made widow conservation less necessary. The last widow conservation took place in the mid-19th century. 
In Pomerania, the church synod of 1545 saw no other choice but to tolerate the practice, and in 1572, the conservation of the widow or daughter of a vicar was officially declared the duty of his successor. An attempt to replace it with a dowry provided by the congregations in 1575 failed. 
During the 18th century, the practice started to decline because of more alternatives, such as the foundation of a fund for vicars' widows in Swedish Pomerania in 1775. 
In the Duchy of Saxony, a strong policy to prevent widow conservation was enforced already when it occurred in the 16th century, and attempts of having a successor of a vicar marry the widow or daughter of his predecessor were actually prevented and contested when it did occur. 
Born in Swan Village in Staffordshire, Whitehouse began working underground at a coal mine when he was eight years old.  He took part in his first strike when only ten, and within the next couple of years had experience two accidents at the pit. 
When the Midland Miners' Federation was established in 1886, Whitehouse was elected as its first secretary.  He served for two years, until he took up a full-time post as agent for the Somerset Miners' Association.  Almost immediately after starting, he was taken to court by a local mine-owner; he lost the case, but refused to pay the fine, and bailiffs took many of his possessions.  However, he remained in the post and managed to greatly increase members. 
Whitehouse was Somerset's delegate to the founding conference of the Miners' Federation of Great Britain, and served on its executive on several occasions.  He was also elected to Radstock Urban District Council as a Liberal-Labour member, serving from 1893 to 1898.  He retired from his union post in 1917 due to poor health, and died two years later. 
Dinwoodey was born in Idaho Falls, Idaho and received his bachelor's degree from the University of Utah. He went to Washington to attend The George Washington University School of Law, and during that period took a job at the fledgling BNA. BNA was conceived and established by noted newsman David Lawrence (publisher), founder of U.S. News & World Report, to report on the inner workings of Washington. 
Dinwoodey was a Latter-day Saint.  He served a three-year mission in Germany for The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints. 
The seigneurial system is based on the feudal system that subjected the census (referred to as "habitant" in New France) to the Lord. Based on the principle of entrepreneurship, the seigneurial system stimulated colonization efforts. 
Joseph N. Hall (born January 8, 1966) is an American author, software developer and programming consultant. Hall is known in the Perl programming community as the author of the book Effective Perl Programming with Randal L. Schwartz, and as a contributor of software to the CPAN. 
In the mid-1970s, Hall received US media coverage as a child prodigy and as a survivor of childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia. 
This biographical article relating to a computer specialist in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Carl B. Feldbaum (born February 1, 1944, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania) is an American author, businessman and lawyer. He co-authored "Looking the Tiger in the Eye" which was awarded the Christopher Medal and was a New York Times Book of the Year in 1988. 
From 1970 to 1973, Feldbaum served as Assistant District Attorney in Philadelphia. In 1973 he became an Assistant Special Prosecutor charged with investigating the Watergate scandal. He later served as Inspector General for Defense Intelligence in the Pentagon (1976-1979), Assistant to the Secretary of Energy (1979-1981), as President of Palomar Corporation (1981-1988), Chief of Staff to Senator Arlen Specter (1988-1993), and CEO of the Biotechnology Industry Organization (1993-2005). 
He presently resides in Ketchum, Idaho and serves as Director on the boards of Actelion, Ltd., Exelixis, BioVentures for Global Health and the Life Sciences Foundation.[citation needed] 
This article about an American businessperson born in the 1940s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Brazilian association football midfielder born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Since March 1985 the local government administration of the Gemeinde has been accommodated in the new town hall (Rathaus) near the site of the former castle and the Amtshaus (demolished in 1983). 
Sandra White, who had been playing Luise Kreitmeier, born Grandauer since episode 4, died unexpectedly at age 26 during the production of the second season. Mona Freiberg was then cast as a substitute, playing the new but similar role of Kathi Lipp. 
The opening and end theme was composed by Peter Sandloff and played by the Pasadena Roof Orchestra, recording numerous variations to match the tone of the individual episodes. 
Southaven High School is a public secondary school located in Southaven, Mississippi, United States.  It began in the fall of 1971, when construction was completed enough so that students could start the first classes. The original school taught 6th through 12th. 
Males and females have their own teams for basketball, soccer, track, cross country, bowling [citation needed], and golf. Only males can play football and baseball. Volleyball, softball, and color guard are restricted to females. Tennis and cheer leading are co-ed sports offered at Southaven. 
The Southaven High School Theatre program performs a play during the fall and a musical during the spring. The other performing and visual arts courses offered are Class Piano, Music Appreciation, AP Studio Art, AP Art History, Ceramics, Photography, and General Art. 
The 2019 Manitoba general election was held on September 10, 2019, to elect the 57 members to the Legislative Assembly of Manitoba. 
The incumbent Progressive Conservatives, led by Premier Brian Pallister, were re-elected to a second majority government with a loss of two seats. The NDP, led by Wab Kinew, gained six seats and retained their position as the official opposition. The Liberals, led by Dougald Lamont, won the remaining three seats. 
Under the Manitoba Elections Act, a general election must be held no later than the first Tuesday of October in the fourth calendar year following the previous election. As the previous election was held in 2016, the latest possible date for the election was October 6, 2020, or if that would have overlapped with a federal election period, the latest possible date would be April 20, 2021. 
However, incumbent Premier Brian Pallister announced instead in June 2019 that he would seek to hold the election over a year early, on September 10, 2019, in order to seek "a new mandate to keep moving Manitoba forward." Pallister visited Lieutenant Governor Janice Filmon on August 12 to officially drop the writ and begin the campaign period. 
It had been speculated that Pallister would call an early election in order to take advantage of a large lead in opinion polls, and to get the vote out of the way before new and potentially unpopular budget cuts took effect. A poll taken by the Winnipeg Free Press found that while most respondents disagreed with the early election and agreed that Pallister had moved up the date for partisan reasons, such sentiments were unlikely to imperil Pallister's re-election. 
By law, Manitoba's electoral boundaries are reviewed every 10 years. The latest review was completed the end of 2018, meaning the 2019 elections were the first ones contested using the new boundaries. 
The Deguynos Formation is a geologic formation in California. It preserves fossils dating back to the Neogene period. 
This article about a specific stratigraphic formation in California is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Karakulevo is located 7 km northwest of Mesyagutovo (the district's administrative centre) by road. Mesyagutovo is the nearest rural locality. 
In France she also presented TV programs in the end of the 1980s, then moved to England in the beginning of the 1990s. She continued singing off and on, and continued to write songs with many different people including Carrie Lennard, Dzal Martin, Claus Regli, Ian Whitmore, Tom Hardwell, and others, but did not record again until 2009, when she made the album, 'Prairie Burn' (released in 2010). 
While she was there, a woman who owned a couple of fashion outlets asked her to model for her and she began modelling. A Parisian modelling agency (Karin Models) scout chose her to come to Paris when she was 23. She arrived in Paris and was sent to Italy (Model Plan) and stayed in Italy for 2 years. 
Patti began her teaching career in Wuhan maple leaf international school with her life partner John Smith since 2011, she spent first few years teaching English even she only had limited ESL training, she later became a librarian. She was not married to John Smith, but her students still call her as Mrs. Smith. She also held school's music dramas each year with John Smith during her stay in Wuhan, few students in dramas ended up in Berklee College of Music.  
She made a podcast called "Travels with John Smith" in May, 2020 to talk about her life and travels during her time of teaching in Wuhan, China.  
He was born on 1 September 1913 in Kotigamgoda village, Padukka. His father Odiris Appuhami was a farmer. He started school at village school and then from Wonakal College, Padukka and finally to the English English School in Homagama. After school, Dharmakeerthi first joined the Department of Agriculture at Alston Place, Colombo as an overseer. 
Dharmakeerthi was married to Nandawathi Jayasuriya. The couple has 5 sons and 3 daughters. He died on 10 September 1987 at the age of 74. 
He also worked as a film assistant director, dialogue writer and a story writer in 1958 film Salli Malli Salli. In this film he emerged as a character actor. In 1981, he acted in the film Aradhana as a merciful father. He won the Best Supporting Actor Award at the 1982 Sarasaviya Awards. for that acting. This was the only award he received in 35 years of film career. He acted with his son Sarath Dharmakeerthi in the 1984 film Parasathuro. 
His final cinema appearance came through 1988 film Sagara Jalaya Madi Handuwa Oba Sanda directed by Sumitra Peries. 
His favorite political character was Philip Gunawardena. Dharmakeerthi contested for the Horana seat from the Mahajana Eksath Peramuna in the 1960 general election. However, he was placed third in the seat and received only 1555 votes. 
The BUT 9613T was a two-axle double-deck trolleybus chassis manufactured by British United Traction in 1957/58. A total of 90 were manufactured by Crossley Motors' Stockport factory, all for Glasgow. 
Mangelia sicula, common name the Sicilian mangelia, is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Mangeliidae. 
(Original description) The shell is somewhat fusiform. The spire is acuminated. The whorls are rounded, rather gibbous, concentrically ribbed, smooth. The aperture is short and ovate. The sinus is rather conspicuous. The color of the shell is dark chesnut-brown within and without. The lip is yellowish, crossed with fine brown lines. 
The color of the shell is chestnut- or chocolate-brown within and without, with narrow brown lines, more conspicuous on the thickened lip, which is lighter colored. The whorls are rounded, rather gibbous, those of the spire obtusely angulated. 
This marine species occurs in the Mediterranean Sea off Cyprus and Italy; in the Atlantic Ocean off Madeira. 
Achu soup is a traditional food in Cameroon, a yellow soup. It is made with cocoyam. Spices, water, palm oil, and "canwa or Nikki" (limestone), and fish are other ingredients. 
The 2009 FIBA Europe Under-20 Championship for Women was the eighth edition of the Women's European basketball championship for national under-20 teams. It was held in Gdynia, Poland, from 9 to 19 July 2009. France women's national under-20 basketball team won the tournament and became the European champions for the second time. 
The Pacific emerald dove or brown-capped emerald dove (Chalcophaps longirostris) is a pigeon which is a widespread resident breeding bird in the tropical and sub-tropical parts of Indonesia to northern and eastern Australia. It was formerly conspecific with the common emerald dove. 
This is a common species in rainforest and similar dense wet woodlands, farms, gardens, mangroves, and coastal heaths. It builds a scant stick nest in a tree up to five metres and lays two cream-coloured eggs. Breeding tends to occur in Australia in spring or early summer in southeastern Australia and late in the dry season in northern Australia. 
Its flight is fast and direct, with the regular beats and an occasional sharp flick of the wings which are characteristic of pigeons in general. It often flies low between the patches of dense forest it prefers, but when disturbed will frequently walk away rather than fly. They are particularly good weavers when flying through forests. When flying they expose a buff underwing and a chestnut colour of their flight feathers. 
The Pacific emerald dove is a stocky, medium-sized pigeon, typically 23 to 28 centimetres (9.1 to 11.0 inches) in length. The back and wings are bright emerald green. The flight feathers and tail are blackish, and broad black and white bars show on the lower back in flight. The head and underparts are dark vinous pink fading to greyish on the lower belly. The eyes are dark brown, the bill bright red, and the legs and feet rufous. 
The male has a white patch on the edge of the shoulders and a grey crown, which the female lacks. Females will tend to have a browner complexion with a grey mark on the shoulder. Immature birds resemble females but have brown scallops on their bodies and wing plumage. 
Pacific emerald doves usually occur singly, in pairs, or in small groups. They are quite terrestrial, often searching for fallen fruit on the ground and spending little time in trees except when roosting. They eat seeds and fruits of a wide variety of plants and are generally tame and approachable. 
The call is a low soft moaning cooing consisting of about six to seven coos starting quietly and rising. They also call a nasal "hoo-hoo-hoon". Males perform a bobbing dance during courtship. 
A former subspecies, C. l. chrysochlora, has been discontinued and forms re-allocated to C. l. rogersi and C. l. timorensis. 
The History of the Rise and Fall of the Slave Power in America is an early history of the American Civil War by Vice President Henry Wilson, who had been a Senator from Massachusetts during the war.  
The book was published in three volumes by J.R. Osgood and Company of Boston, Massachusetts. The first two volumes appeared in 1872, the year Wilson ran for vice president on the winning Republican ticket headed by Ulysses S. Grant. The last volume appeared in 1877, two years after the author's death in office.  
Wilson's history went through several more Osgood editions, and was also published by Houghton Mifflin in the 1870s and afterward. A three-volume reprint was published in 1969 by Negro Universities Press. The work has also appeared in microform.  
The book's title contains a relatively late usage of the term "Slave Power" for the politically powerful slaveholding class in the American South before the Civil War. 
This article on a nonfiction book about the American Civil War is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Fredericksburg Theater Company is a non-profit 501(c)(3) organization founded in 1997 by former city mayor Jeryl Hoover and based in Fredericksburg, Texas.  The company has been awarded the title of Best Theatre in the San Antonio Region on three occasion by the entertainment website Broadway World, most recently in 2019. 
The company mission states that it is to "provide superior theatrical programs for regional participation which entertain, educate, enrich and inspire." Company performances all take place in the Steve W Shepherd Theater which has a capacity of 250 seats. 
His main debut was while he was on the Fiorentina team, the biggest series, and continued to gain traction in his career from then on. 
This biographical article related to association football in Austria, about a forward, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Kanto Plains Association of Secondary School Principals (KPASSP) is an organization comprising the principals of various international schools in the Kanto region of Japan. 
"Every year, high school students from all over the Kanto Plain region compete to become members of the prestigious Tokyo International Honor Choir."  Students accepted are required to practice singing in a specific school with the other international students in the Kanto Plains area. 
This is a list of bridges and tunnels on the National Register of Historic Places in the U.S. state of Florida. 
 The 48th Arkansas Mounted Infantry is the least well documented of the Arkansas Confederate regiments raised in 1864. In May 1864, General J. O. Shelby occupied Northeast Arkansas, well behind Union Army lines. In early June 1864, General Shelby commissioned Colonel Thomas Hamilton McCray, among others to begin raising regiments in Northeast Arkansas. By June 13, Shelby reported to General Sterling Price that McCray's efforts were bearing fruit. 
The work of recruiting goes bravely on. Colonel McCray will have a brigade and Dobbin, Coffee, Freeman and Coleman will have regiments.
With the exception of Colonel William O. Coleman's 46th Arkansas Infantry (Mounted) all other Arkansas units were assigned to James F. Fagan's Division of Arkansas troops in Sterling Price's Army of Missouri for Price's 1864 Missouri Expedition, so it is assumed that the 48th is the designation of one of the Arkansas units assigned to Fagan's Division. Fagan's Division was involved in the following engagements during the raid: 
After the completion of Price's Raid, much of Fagan's Division was furloughed to return to the area from which it was recruited in order to forage and recover absentees and to return to the army at a prescribed date. 
At Boonsborough, on the suggestion of General Fagan, I detached two of his brigades (McCray's and Dobbin's), along with Freeman's brigade, of Marmaduke's division, to take the route to Northeast Arkansas, with instructions to collect all stragglers and deserters, and report south of the Arkansas River, at or near Washington, by the 15th, 20th, and 25th days of December, respectively
Flat Rock is a census-designated place in northeastern Thompson Township, Seneca County, Ohio, United States.  It has a post office with the ZIP code 44828. 
Flat Rock was originally called Lewisville, and under the latter name was platted in 1841. A post office called Flat Rock has been in operation since 1846. The present name comes from a flat layer of rock covering an artesian aquifer. 
It was created in the 1945 redistribution and mainly consisted of the abolished Bulla and Dalhousie and Castlemaine and Kyneton districts. 
The UNOH Battle at the Beach and the Whelen All-Star Shootout did not count towards the championship. 
The 2017 Ligas Superiores, the fifth division of Peruvian football (soccer), will be played by variable number teams by Departament.  
Two groups of three teams played home and away matches. The top two teams in each group moved on to the semifinals. 
Comercial Aguas Verdes made its debut on the tournament. Cristal Tumbes and Los Chanos were relegated for lack of resources. The team with the fewest points was relegated back to their District League of origin. 
Tadhg Barry was born in 1880 to a working-class family in Cork, Ireland. He was schooled at the Blarney Street National School and later the North Monastery. After school, Barry worked for four years at Our Lady's Asylum until 1909, when his interest in journalism led to him becoming a staff writer at the newly founded Cork Accent. Between 1910 and 1916, he worked at the Cork Free Press, a paper which competed with the Redmondite (Home Rule advocating) Cork Examiner. 
Upon his release in 1919, he became the full-time Branch Secretary to the ITGWU in Cork and was involved with the Irish soviets, a series of strikes by rural Irish workers mainly across Munster. In 1920, Barry was elected to the position of Alderman in Cork, placing him in a position of power alongside the now Lord Mayor Tomas MacCurtain and newly elected MP Terence MacSwiney. 
Barry's death was one of the last during the Irish War of Independence, which at that point was coming to a ceasefire. 
Barry's subsequent funeral drew an enormous 30,000 in attendance, chief amongst them Cork's own Michael Collins, who had left the on-going Anglo-Irish Treaty negotiations in order to attend. 
Louisville Male Traditional High School is a public co-ed secondary school serving students in grades 9 through 12 in the southside of Louisville, Kentucky, USA. It is part of the Jefferson County Public School District. 
 In the 1970s, Male was chosen as the Traditional High School,[clarification needed] becoming the first magnet program in the school district.
In 1976, an early-morning bomb explosion on Labor Day caused damage to the school's gymnasium; it occurred during several days of anti-busing protests in the Louisville area. The FBI was called in to investigate. 
The school runs a unique curriculum that is different from the other public high schools in the city. All students participate in the College Preparatory Program so as to aid in a smooth the transition to higher education. 
Students have an opportunity to graduate with a Commonwealth Diploma, which demands more than the required units for graduating high school in JCPS. One of the stipulations is the successful completion (i.e., receiving a grade of "C" or its equivalent) in 6 AP courses in the areas of English, science/mathematics, foreign language, and elective. 
Maxwell Field, formerly called High School Park, was the football stadium located behind Male's former location on Brook Street. This is now the site of the Dawson Orman Education Center. 
This article about a glacier in Antarctica or antarctic or sub-antarctic islands is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jainism had a continuous presence in the Bundelkhand region since antiquity. Jainism was flourishing during the Gupta period at Vidisha region. The Durjanpur idols installed during the rule of Ramagupta date to about 365 AD. The Udaigiri cave Parshvanath inscription mentioning the lineage of Bhadranvaya is dated to 425 AD. The great Shantinath temple at Deogarh was built before 862 CE, suggesting a prosperous Jain community in this region. 
The towns historically connected with the Golapurva community are in Chhatarpur, Tikamgarh, Sagar and Damoh districts in Madhya Pradesh and Lalitpur district in Uttar Pradesh. This region still has a large population of Golapurvas, 
A legendary account of the origin is given in Navalsah Chanderia's "Vardhamana Purana" written in 1769 AD. In this account the poet gives a history of the Golapurvas, then traces how own descent, his ancestor who lived at Chanderi in remote antiquity, gajaratha pratishta by his ancestors in 1634 AD at Bhelsi, and settlement of his ancestors at Khataura, where he was born. The temple built by his ancestors at Bhelsi still exists. 
Navalsah Chanderia mentions that Lord Adinath visited at a place named "Goyalgarh", where the local residents took the shravaka vratas from him. 
There is a tradition that the Golapurvas are descendants of the ancient Ikshvaku clan. The inscription at Saurai of Sam. 1864 states that the builder of the temple Singhahi Mohandas belonged to Ikshvaku vamsha, gotra Padmavati of the Golapurva community and baink Chanderia. It is also mentioned in some inscriptions at Nainagiri. 
The Pierre Werner Cricket Ground, also known as the Walferdange Cricket Ground, is a cricket ground in Walferdange, in central Luxembourg. It is the premier cricket venue in Luxembourg, being the home ground of the country's top club, the Optimists Cricket Club, which plays in the Belgian Cricket League, and of the Luxembourg national team. 
The ground has hosted matches between the Luxembourg national team and various other teams, including the Belgium national team and the MCC. The heavy use of the ground is illustrated by the programme in 2003, when it "was in use almost every day between mid-April and early October". That year two internationals against France and one against Belgium were played on the ground (though one of the games against France was rained off). A six-a-side tournament was hosted in 2007. 
The ground hosts a one-week junior training academy each July. In 2010 this was attended by forty boys and girls of all ages, who were coached by a Level 3 coach from the UK and benefited from the ground's "excellent facilities". 
In August 2020, the ground was selected to host the 2020 Luxembourg T20I Trophy, a tri-series between Luxembourg, Belgium and the Czech Republic. 
Chunder was the son of Nirmal Chandra Chunder, a prominent member of the Indian National Congress (INC) in the pre-independence era and a member of the Big Five of the Bengal Congress. He completed his BA (Hons.) in History at Presidency College, Calcutta, ranking first class first, and his LLB at the University of Calcutta. He was awarded a D Phil in Arts from the same university. 
From an early age Chunder joined the INC and became a member of the West Bengal Legislative Assembly from 1962-69. He was the Finance and Judicial Minister of West Bengal in 1968. From 1977 to 1979 he was the Education and Social Welfare Minister of India. 
Chunder was an attorney-at-law at the Calcutta High Court and an advocate of the Supreme Court of India. He was member of Senate and the faculty of law of the Calcutta University between 1961 and 1968. 
Chunder was the Founder-Chairman of West Bengal Heritage Commission and the President of the Board of Governors of IISWBM, India's first MBA school. From 2000 to 2005 he was a member of the executive council of the Rabindra Bharati University. Chunder was the President of the Presidency College Alumni Association from 1989-90 to 1993-94 and again during 1998-99. 
This article about an Indian National Congress politician from West Bengal is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to sport shooting in Spain is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kimizuka first entered the Japanese television industry by working on variety shows under Kin'ichi Hagimoto. He then began writing screenplays for television dramas, including such hits as Zutto anata ga suki datta and Bayside Shakedown. He has branched out into screenplays for film, including the hit Bayside Shakedown films, as well as directing. 
Kimizuka won the award for best screenplay for Bayside Shakedown: The Movie at the 1998 Yokohama Film Festival, and for Nobody to Watch Over Me at the 2008 Montreal World Film Festival. 
Western Leader is a local newspaper in Auckland, New Zealand. It is owned by media business Stuff Ltd. It was launched in 1963 and is published three times a week. The newspaper operates from the John Henry Centre on Pioneer Street in Henderson, and had a circulation of 77,950 in 2013, an increase of 11,000 over 2010. 
In 2019, reporter Torika Tokalau won the Community Journalist of the Year Award at the 2019 Voyager Media Awards. 
Yulia Khavronina (born 20 May 1992) is a Russian handballer who plays for Italian handball team PDO Salerno. 
This biographical article related to Russian handball is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ishwar Chandra Vidyasagar was the most prominent campaigner. He petitioned the Legislative council, but there was a counter petition against the proposal  with nearly four times more signatures by Radhakanta Deb and the Dharma Sabha. But Lord Dalhousie personally finalised the bill despite the opposition and it being considered a flagrant breach of Hindu customs as prevalent then. 
"Second marriages, after the death of the husband first espoused, are wholly unknown to the Hindu Law; though in practice, among the inferior castes, nothing is so common." 
Whereas it is known that, by the law as administered in the Civil Courts established in the territories in the possession and under the Government of the East India Company, Hindu widows with certain exceptions are held to be, by reason of their having been once married, incapable of contracting a second valid marriage, and the offsprings of such widows by any second marriage are held to be illegitimate and incapable of inheriting property; and 
Whereas many Hindus believe that this imputed legal incapacity, although it is in accordance with established custom, is not in accordance with a true interpretation of the precepts of their religion, and desire that the civil law administered by the Courts of Justice shall no longer prevent those Hindus who may he so minded from adopting a different custom, in accordance with the dictates of their own conscience, and 
Where it is just to relieve all such Hindus from this legal incapacity of which they complain, and the removal of all legal obstacles to the marriage of Hindu widows will tend to the promotion of good morals and to the public welfare; 
Matches will be played on 8 and 9 October 2016. Eight best placed Bundesliga teams from last season join the 24 winners of the previous round. 
Hay entered the Inner Temple in 1781, and was called to the bar in 1788. He then went the northern circuit. He had little success as a barrister, but was employed by Sir John Parker Mosley, 1st Baronet as steward to the Manchester manorial court. 
Possibly influenced by Lewis Bagot, a connection by marriage, Hay was ordained deacon in 1797, priest in 1798, and was placed at Ashton-under-Lyne. He was assistant curate at Disley, in 1798. In 1799 he was curate at Hollinwood for Rev. John Darbey. He lived at Dukenfield Lodge, a property in his wife's family that was owned by Francis Dukinfield Astley. 
In 1802 Charles Bragge, a family connection, presented Hay to the rectory of Ackworth, West Yorkshire. In 1806 William Markham gave him a prebend in York Minster. 
In 1812, at the time of the disorder at the Manchester Cotton Exchange and the reading of the Riot Act by two magistrates (Silvester and Wright), Hay found an ally in Charles Ethelston. They were like-minded. 
Present as a magistrate on 16 August 1819 at Peterloo, Hay wrote the letter of that evening to Lord Sidmouth giving an account of the events, James Norris being "very much fatigued by the harrassing duty of this day". He included the reading of the Riot Act, and the arrests of Henry Hunt and Joseph Johnson. In the film Peterloo by Mike Leigh, Hay is played by Jeff Rawle. 
In October 1819, Hay attended a dinner given by Lord Liverpool, the Prime Minister, where he was treated with high regard by Sir John Copley, the Solicitor General. The Seditious Meetings Act 1819 of December reportedly owes clauses to suggestions made by Hay to Copley. 
In the early 1820s the legal issues raised by Peterloo were still live, and the legal doctrine of unlawful assembly was still being worked out through case law. Hay was cross-examined in Redford v Birley (1822), before George Sowley Holroyd. On the question of at what point the Peterloo assembly became illegal, Hay stated: 
I will explain what I mean by tumultuous; that sort of meeting I consider illegal, and a breach of the peace, either in point of common sense, or according to legal authorities.
Hay gave up his position as chairman of the Salford Quarter Sessions in 1823, and was seriously ill in 1824. He was replaced as chairman by Thomas Starkie, and then in 1825 by James Norris. He was briefly back in court in 1825, and not in a good temper, after Starkie resigned, for a right of way case involving the magistrate Ralph Wright, at Flixton. 
At Rochdale, Hay was still active in local politics in the last summer of his life, extending the hustings on a vote affecting church rates. The church rate issue in Rochdale had been vexed for nearly a generation. Jacob Bright, father of John Bright, had refused to pay it over 20 times, from 1811 to 1833. 
Hay died on 10 December 1839, at Ackworth rectory. His obituary in the Gentleman's Magazine compared Hay's role at Peterloo with that of Sir Thomas Phillips in the recent Newport Rising. He was succeeded at Rochdale by John Edward Nassau Molesworth; and at Arkworth by Edmund Goodenough Bayly. 
Dietlind Foerster (born 18 March 1981) is a Namibian cricketer. She made her Women's Twenty20 International (WT20I) debut for the Namibia women's cricket team on 20 August 2018, against Malawi, in the 2018 Botswana Cricket Association Women's T20I Series. It was the first WT20I match to be played by Namibia. 
In August 2019, she was named in Namibia's squad for the 2019 ICC Women's World Twenty20 Qualifier tournament in Scotland. She played in Namibia's opening match of the tournament on 31 August 2019 against Ireland. In May 2021, she was named in Namibia's squad for the 2021 Kwibuka Women's T20 Tournament in Rwanda. 
This biographical article related to Namibian cricket is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Complete results are published on the CFPI and on the World Junior Athletics History website, and medal winners are published by category: Junior A, Male, Junior A, Female, and Junior B. 
The Commonwealth of Dominica competed for the first time at the championships. Detailed result lists can be found on the CFPI and on the World Junior Athletics History website.   An unofficial count yields the number of about 361 athletes (187 junior (under-20) and 174 youth (under-17)) from about 21 countries: 
Eliza S. Nestel was from Fort Wayne, Indiana, the daughter of blacksmith Daniel Nestel and Henrietta Goebel Nestel. She was a dwarf. Her parents immigrated to the United States from Prussia and Germany; they were both quite tall. She began making public appearances as a child with her older brother Charles, who was also a dwarf, under the management of William Ellinger, and with their father as chaperone. 
Foote and her brother Charles W. Nestel, known as "Commodore Foote", toured in the United States, Canada, Mexico, and Europe. They met with Abraham Lincoln at the White House in February 1864. While in Washington, she was the object of an anatomical study, along with her brother and others. 
Petnica Science Center was founded in 1982 as a Yugoslavian scientific center for elementary and high school high-achieving students, for extracurricular activities, supervised by university professors, researchers from various Yugoslav and (mostly) Serbian Institutes, and research assistants and graduate and postgraduate students. PSC states, on its website, to be "the biggest and, probably, the oldest (such center) in South Eastern Europe". 
The majority of PSC programs are designed for secondary-school students, although there are a lot of programs for primary-school pupils. There are special seminars and activities for university students and science teachers. 
PSC nourishes international character and attendants of regular Petnica programs come not only from all countries of former Yugoslavia, but also from other (mostly Balkans and European) countries. Most of the courses are being taught in the Serbian language, with which former Yugoslavians are familiar. International camps and conferences are held in English and, in lesser part, in Russian. 
Petnica Science Centre is located in the village Petnica, near Valjevo (Western Serbia). It has fully equipped boarding facilities with 100-bed dormitories and a restaurant, and possesses numerous laboratories, classrooms, big and multi-functional library with a carefully designed Teaching Resource Center. 
Portland Estates is a suburban neighbourhood in Woodlawn, an area of eastern Dartmouth in the Halifax Regional Municipality, Nova Scotia. It reaches from Eisener Blvd. in the west, all the way to Portland Hills in the east, and is located to the south of Portland Street (Route 207). 
Portland Estates is served by Metro Transit - Bus #57. One of the municipality's new bus rapid transit routes has a terminus in Portland Hills. 
Leslie was born in Edmonton, London. Educated at the Latymer School where he was an excellent student who was addicted to sport and spent much of his free time studying sports almanacks such as Wisden and Ruff's Guide to the Turf. 
On leaving school he was employed at the Royal Small Arms Factory, Enfield Lock in the Accounts Department. 
During the Second World War he served with the Eighth Army in the Western Desert and it was here that his encyclopaedic knowledge of sport was recognised and was signed up by ENSA. 
After demob he became popular on radio shows such as Variety Playhouse and In Town Tonight, he was also a regular on TV's Kaleidoscope and made many London Palladium performances. By 1952, he hosted Beat the Memory Man broadcast on Radio Luxembourg. 
For his act he simply stood on the stage and talked sport before accepting 'challenges' from the audience, who would call out all kinds of questions which he would normally answer immediately and adding a few more facts and figures. 
It's my belief that everyone was born with a perfect memory, but by the time they are 21, thanks to the invention of pen and paper, they are only using a fifth of it. The other four-fifths has gone dormant like a muscle not being used.
Unfortunately, he found the rigours of his career too great and in 1963 turned his back on the stage and became a civil servant and settled in Ruislip, Middlesex where he later died aged 72. 
As of 2021, the society has published 226 volumes, mainly concerning the counties of Durham and Northumberland. Included among the works published are volumes covering the documents of monasteries, including Finchale Priory, Coldingham Priory, Fountains Abbey, Hexham Priory, Whitby Abbey and Brinkburn Priory.  
Other records include wills and inventories from Yorkshire, obituaries from Durham Cathedral, heraldic visitations, documents from various archbishops of York and bishops of Durham, and records from the cities of York and Durham.  
The society has also published editions of the Lindisfarne Gospels and the Lindisfarne Psalter. In recent years it has published three volumes of material relating to Cumberland or Westmorland (including the cartulary of Lanercost Priory) jointly with the Cumberland and Westmorland Antiquarian and Archaeological Society. 
Swammerdamia passerella is a moth of the  family Yponomeutidae. It is found in Great Britain, Fennoscandia, Poland, Estonia and northern Russia. 
The larvae feed on Betula nana. Young larvae mine the leaves of their host plant. Later, they live freely under a slight web. Mining larvae can be found in June. 
This article on a moth of the family Yponomeutidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
KSTM (88.9 FM) is a radio station licensed to Indianola, Iowa, United States.  The station is owned by Simpson College. 
The company's rapid growth has triggered a chain of own products, acquisitions, and partnerships. It offers marketing communication products and services (ppurio, biz ppurio, donutbook, enFax, Callmix, Biz mailer), commerce services (SNS Form, Unicro), and enterprise mail product (Terrace Mail). It released IT infrastructure and related outsourcing services (Daou IDC, Daou Cloud) in 2013. It launched Daou Office designed for work and productivity in April 2014. 
Youn Duck, Kim was appointed CEO of the company in January 2016. In 2018, it launched online commerce inventory management service (Sabangnet), merging with Korea ASP. It holds 45 percent of market share by sales revenues in domestic multi-channel management market. 
Wayne Linton (born 21 October 1955) is  a former Australian rules footballer who played with Fitzroy in the Victorian Football League (VFL).  
The Australian Financial Complaints Authority or AFCA is an external dispute resolution (EDR) scheme for consumers who are unable to resolve complaints with member financial services organisations. It is operated as a not-for-profit company limited by guarantee and was authorised in 2018 by the then Minister for Revenue and Financial Services, Kelly O'Dwyer, in accordance with the Corporations Act 2001 (Cth). 
AFCA replaced the three pre-existing EDR schemes of the Financial Ombudsman Service (FOS), the Credit and Investments Ombudsman (CIO) and Superannuation Complaints Tribunal (SCT). 
Membership of AFCA is a requirement under law or license condition of all financial firms and financial service providers. 
The Australian Financial Complaints Authority was established on 1 November 2018, replacing the Financial Ombudsman Service (FOS), the Credit and Investments Ombudsman (CIO) and the Superannuation Complaints Tribunal (SCT). The Australian Government announced on 9 May 2017 that AFCA would be established in response to the review of external dispute resolution and complaints arrangements in the financial system. 
The Rules of AFCA outline the types of complaints that AFCA can consider, as well as their procedures, remedies and reporting obligations. The Rules were approved by the Australian Securities and Investments Commission (ASIC) on 12 September 2018. 
The AFCA only considers a complaint after the consumer has first attempted to resolve the dispute directly with their financial service provider. If the dispute is unable to be resolved or the outcome is unsatisfactory, AFCA can then consider it. 
Complaints can be filed with AFCA through an online form on their website. An AFCA representative will then contact the consumer and relevant financial service provider to settle the dispute. In the case a settlement cannot be reached, an AFCA case analyst will develop a balanced solution. The consumer can then either accept the proposed settlement from AFCA or take their dispute to court. 
The Australian Financial Complaints Authority is governed by a Board of Directors, which includes equal numbers of industry and consumer representatives. The Independent Chair of the Board is Helen Coonan. The Board appoints an independent Chief Ombudsman and CEO, presently David Locke. 
Eudolium is a genus of large sea snails, marine gastropod mollusks in the family Tonnidae, the tun shells. 
This Matale District, Central Province, Sri Lanka location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This is an incomplete list of Norwegian coats of arms. Today most municipalities and all counties have their own coats of arms. Many Norwegian military units and other public agencies and some private families have coats of arms. For more general information see the page about Norwegian heraldry. 
Arms for Troms og Finnmark county (two used together, not merged)[citation needed] and the municipalities (current and former) within it: 
Steven Ronald Greaves (born 17 January 1970 in Chelsea, London, England), is an English footballer who played as a central defender. He played in the Football League for Fulham, Brighton & Hove Albion, Preston North End, Ipswich Town and Scunthorpe United. 
This biographical article related to association football in England, about a defender born in the 1970s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He was born in Lucerne; his father Jost Schnyder von Wartensee was an upper-class citizen of Lucerne, holding high offices including grand councillor.  
In 1817 he settled in Frankfurt-am-Main, and lived there as teacher of composition and director of various musical institutions until his death on 30 August 1868. During this latter period he was highly regarded as a teacher, and had many pupils, among them the English composer Robert Lucas de Pearsall. 
George Grove wrote: "Schnyder appears to have been a man of exceptional ability, but his life was too desultory to admit of his leaving anything of permanent value, and there was always a strong amateur element about him." 
Innsmouth is a 2015 short horror film that was directed by Izzy Lee, who co-wrote and co-produced the film with Francesco Massaccesi. The film premiered on August 19, 2015 and is inspired by the works of H. P. Lovecraft, particularly The Shadow over Innsmouth. 
Detective Olmstead has arrived on a peculiar crime scene, with a body that has both a bite wound and an egg sac on her back. Her only clue is a photograph of the victim with a strange woman. Olmstead manages to determine that the photograph was taken in Innsmouth and travels there in search of answers, which causes her to cross paths with Alice Marsh. 
This biographical article relating to Japanese cross-country skiing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Le Mayet-de-Montagne is situated 16.6 miles south of Vichy in the north part of the Massif Central. It is situated at an altitude of around 1,800 feet. 
In 1334, le Mayet de Montagne belonged to Auvergne. The counts of Auvergne considered Le Mayet to be of great strategic value, and they held onto the town until 1589, when Henri IV decided to alter the borders of Bourbonnais to include Le Mayet. 
Taskans was also a writer, and published Jukebox Junkie in 1987 by Turnstone Press (a poetry chapbook). 
The King's School, Canterbury, 1541 (refounded) King's Ely, 1541 (refounded) The King's School, Chester, 1541 The King's School, Gloucester, 1541 The King's School, Peterborough, 1541 The King's School, Rochester, 1541 (refounded) The King's School, Worcester, 1541 
Macrotristria angularis, commonly known as the cherrynose, is an Australian cicada native to eastern Australia, where it is found in sclerophyll forests. 
The cherrynose gets its common name from a red structure that resembles a nose, yet is in fact a structure containing muscles that help the cicada suck xylem from trees with its proboscis. An alternate common name is whiskey drinker. 
The adult cherrynose is found on the upper branches and trunks of tall eucalypts in sclerophyll forests, and is becoming rare in the Sydney region. They have also been recorded from sheoaks, apples (Angophora), native cypress (Callitris) and Tamarix aphylla. 
The cover gained unexpected popularity, with the New Yorker making approximately $400,000 by February 2002 by selling copies of the picture as signed lithographs (all 750 copies of which sold out within 4 days) and unsigned posters. 
According to Kalman, the inspiration for the cover arose in a car on the way to a party.  She and Meyerowitz were talking about tribalism.  At one point she came up with the idea of "Bronxistan", to which Meyerowitz replied "You know, we've got a map here."  Originally, the picture was to be run on the back page of the magazine, but editors liked it so much that it was decided to make it the cover picture. 
The places depicted, with their explanations (according to the artists or to commentators), are as follows: 
Social care is frequently used as a synonymous term with social welfare, and as an alternative to social work. The term often implies informal networks of support and assistance as well as services funded following assessments by social work and other professions. 
Social care in the modern context encompasses many areas of need, each with a level of specialist services. These can be broadly categorised as follows: 
Social care is in the jurisdiction of the Minister of State for Social Care in the Department of Health and Social Care. 
Social care has long existed as an informal concept, through family and community support and charitable works. In medieval times, social care had been provided by monastic foundations, but at the Reformation, that support ended, because the monasteries were dissolved. The loss of monastic social support (and education) was one of the declared grievances behind the Pilgrimage of Grace. 
In December 1965 Douglas Houghton MP created the Committee on Local Authority Personal Social Services, chaired by Frederic Seebohm, Baron Seebohm. Amongst other things, the Seebohm Report (punlished 1868) recommended the establishment of a unified social service within each major local authority. 
The provision of social care by local councils was not changed at the creation of the NHS. As a consequence, council provision continued to be limited to the poor. One of the first acts of the Conservative Prime Minister Ted Heath was to pass the 1970 National Insurance Act, introducing Attendance Allowance as a universal welfare payment for those needing social care. 
A court decision means many care workers are entitled to back pay for overnight sleep shifts.[which?]  Many local authorities, charities and companies providing care say they cannot afford this and will fold without financial help from the government. The problem remains unresolved with some care providers facing possible bankruptcy. 
A director general for adult social care, Rosamund Roughton, was appointed to the Department of Health and Social Care in 2020, a similar position having been abolished in 2016 when Jon Rouse left. 
Rising unmet need for social care will not be resolved without genuine cross-party working to find a long-term solution to funding.
In March 2017, Chancellor Philip Hammond first announced a green paper on the future funding options for social care. Since the announcement, the green paper was marred by several delays, with the Health Secretary Matt Hancock giving evidence to select committees citing Brexit and lack of cross-party consensus as the reasons for the delay. Ultimately, the green paper never materialised during May's premiership. 
On 24 July 2019, in his first speech as Prime Minister, Boris Johnson pledged to fix social care "once and for all" with a "ready-to-go" plan. Since then, Johnson has clarified that reforms will be put forward before the end of the next parliamentary term. 
In August 2018, a Department of Health report warned that in a worst-case scenario, care workers migrating from elsewhere in the European Economic Area might stop coming after Brexit, and the resulting shortage of care workers could become so acute that people (mostly women) would be forced to give up paid work and stay home to care for dependent relatives. 
Adult social care can be understood as care to support the well-being of adults, similar to that which may be provided by a skilled relative or friend. It includes following directed care designed to maintain physical or mental health supervised by health-qualified staff, but not health treatment that would be undertaken by staff with health qualifications such as nursing.   The social care workforce encompasses: 
One type of work covers assessment and commissioning on behalf of local public finance, for people felt to be in need according to eligibility criteria. The public face for this activity is usually a social worker employed by the local authority. 
The range of work settings includes the community, hospitals, health centres, education and advice centres and people's homes. Social care practitioners frequently work in partnership with staff from other professions, including health, housing, education, advice and advocacy services and the law. 
Occupational Therapy is another important profession working in health and social care settings, contributing to the promotion of people's independence through advice and provision of equipment, and enhancing the suitability of housing through Adaptations. 
There are many other social care roles for which other qualifications, experience and training may be necessary. 
Examples of the range of professions within this field include policy makers, researchers, academics, project workers, support workers, employed care staff (in residential or domiciliary care settings sometimes confusingly referred to as "carers") and personal assistants. 
Although there is no formal or national hierarchy (rank) of social workers, many local authorities in England and Wales adopt a similar pattern of seniority of social workers. This is mainly for the purpose of case work allocation, supervision, leadership and management. As an example, below is an example of three role structure for an adults, childcare and mental health social work team. To compare, there are also links to the PCF levels of practitioner. 
The National Skills Academy for Social Care, launched in 2009, provides learning support and training practice for social care workers and employers in England, with a specific remit on leadership development. 
The Association of Directors of Adult Social Services is the official voice of senior social care managers in England. 
There are many other voluntary and independent organisations that exist to support the delivery of social care. These support both the social care workforce and people who use services, and include user-led organisations. 
Local authority spending on adult social care is a demand on the local tax revenue and for this reason and associated costs to the NHS from hospital admissions, Social care is high on the UK government's agenda, with an aim of integration of health, social care and education to reflect the overlap between these areas. 
Robots are being developed which it is hoped will be able to help with some social care. The Social Market Foundation has suggested that the adoption of technology should be 'properly handled' so that it complements human interaction rather than replacing it. 
Katsbaan is a hamlet of the town of Saugerties in Ulster County, New York, United States,  located north of the village of Saugerties and south of Catskill. 
The hamlet existed at least as far back as the American Revolution. The origin of the name, which means "tennis court", is possibly linked to the original Dutch visitors to the area who saw lacrosse being played by native Iroquois which they thought resembled tennis.[citation needed] 
The hamlet was settled by Dutch farmers and German Palatines prior to 1730, and was deeded to the Dutch Reformed Church by 1732. A stone church that was constructed at that time was used as a landmark on Colonial American maps, and still stands today. 
Brown played high school basketball at Cesar Chavez High School in Phoenix, Arizona. After high school, he served a two year prison term. 
Brown played his first two years of college basketball at Phoenix College, until 2015. He earned Spalding National JUCO Division II player of the year honor after averaging  20.1 points and 6.1 assists per game. After two years, Brown transferred to Loyola Marymount, where he averaged 13.2 points, 4.9 assists and 2.9 rebounds per game in his last two seasons. 
After going undrafted in the 2017 NBA draft, Brown joined Boncourt of the Swiss League. He played 30 games with the club and he was the Swiss League Top Scorer of the 2018 season, after averaging 27 points per game. He also added 3.5 rebounds and 3.3 assists per game. 
On September 25, 2018, he joined Panionios of the Greek Basket League. On November 27, 2018, he joined Poitiers 86 of the Pro B. 
On August 20, 2019, he signed for Rilski Sportist of the NBL. Brown averaged 15.6 points, 5.5 assists and 1.7 steals per game. He re-signed with the team on July 23, 2020. 
The original cast included:  Margot Lander, Hans Brenaa, Svend Erik Jensen, Inge Sand and Inge Goth. Its ABT premiere at the 54th Street Theatre in New York took place on 5 October 1961 and featured dancers Toni Lander, Royes Fernandez, Bruce Marks, Eleanor D'Antuono and Elisabeth Carroll. 
The order of the various sections of the ballet, as recorded by the Danish National Radio Symphony Orchestra and conducted by Gennady Rozhdestvensky in 1997, include: 
Overture (exercises at the barre) Tendus, Grands battements, fondus and frappes Ronds de jambe Silhouetter-au milieu Adagio Port de Bras et pas de badin Mirror Dance Ensemble Romantic Pas de deux Sortie Conclusion Pirouettes Releves Piques et grands pirouettes Solo for the Prima Ballerina Coda Small Leaps Mazurka Tarantella Broad Leaps (Finale) 
Tigoa (sometimes spelt Tingoa) is a village on Rennell Island, Solomon Islands. It is the administrative centre of Rennell and Bellona Province. It is located approximately 12-20 metres above sea level. 
Blu del Barrio (born September 15, 1997) is an American actor, known for playing Adira Tal in Star Trek: Discovery. 
Del Barrio was raised in Topanga, California by Argentinian parents. Del Barrio attended Crossroads School in California and was a finalist for the 2016 National YoungArts Foundation awards in the theater category. They also took part in ballet while growing up. Del Barrio then studied at the London Academy of Music and Dramatic Art, and graduated in 2019. While studying in London they played Duke in Otis & Eunice by the Royal College of Music. 
Del Barrio is non-binary and uses they/them pronouns. They first realized they might be non-binary after seeing Lachlan Watson on television. They chose the first name "Blu" in 2019, in honor of their favorite color from childhood. Being cast as a non-binary character in Star Trek: Discovery helped them come out publicly as non-binary. 
Del Barrio acted in short films and theater since the age of seven. In September 2020 it was announced that they would join the cast of Star Trek: Discovery as Adira Tal for Season 3. Del Barrio is the first out non-binary actor in Star Trek. Discovery executive producer Alex Kurtzman has said del Barrio will return for Season 4. 
Del Barrio has named Lachlan Watson, Indya Moore, Bex Taylor-Klaus, Theo Germaine, Asia Kate Dillon, and Brigette Lundy-Paine as non-binary role models for their career. 
This Australian rules football biography of a person born in 1919 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
2016 ICC Women's World Twenty20 was the fifth edition of ICC Women's World Twenty20. The tournament was hosted in India for the first time. Australia were the defending champions, after winning the 2014 tournament in Bangladesh. 
Below is a list of the squads which participated in the 2016 ICC Women's World Twenty20. The lists display the player's age and the number of T20I matches played (excluding the warm-up matches) at the start of the tournament. 
1On 11 March 2016, Cricket Australia reported it was withdrawing Grace Harris, diagnosed with deep vein thrombosis and named Nicola Carey as replacement. 
1On 22 March 2016, the England and Wales Cricket Board reported it was withdrawing Danielle Hazell, due to a calf injury and named Laura Marsh as replacement. 
On 5 February 2016, the Board of Control for Cricket in India announced its squad. Coach:  Purnima Rau 
1On 9 March 2016, the Pakistan Cricket Board reported it was withdrawing Sania Khan due to a fractured thumb and named Diana Baig as replacement. 
Neil R. McMillen is an American historian, and professor emeritus at University of Southern Mississippi. 
He graduated from the University of Southern Mississippi with a BA and MA, and from Vanderbilt University with a Ph.D. His papers are held at University of Southern Mississippi. 
He lives in Hattiesburg, Mississippi, in the winter and on Lake Superior in Upper Michigan in the summer. 
William Hearn (born 13 May 1850 in Paisley, Scotland) was a champion professional sculler of New Zealand, who emigrated to Victoria at a young age. He came to New Zealand in 1862, and had been a resident in Wellington since January 1876, nearly all the time having been employed by Messrs Greenfield and Stewart, timber merchants. 
Hearn was set to compete in January 1907 against champion sculler Jim Stanbury but the race does not appear to have happened. 
Menominee County is a county located in the Upper Peninsula in the U.S. state of Michigan. As of the 2020 Census, the population was 23,502. The county seat is Menominee. The county's name comes from an American Indian word meaning "wild rice eater" used to describe a tribe. The county was created in 1861 from area partitioned out of Delta County, under the name of Bleeker. When county government was organized in 1863, the name was changed to Menominee. 
There were 10,474 households, out of which 24.0% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 51.1% were married couples living together, 9.1% had a female householder with no husband present, and 34.9% were non-families. 30.4% of all households were made up of individuals, and 12.6% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.26 and the average family size was 2.77. 
The county population contained 21.0% under the age of 18, 6.5% from 18 to 24, 20.8% from 25 to 44, 32.7% from 45 to 64, and 19.1% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 46.2 years. The population was 50.3% male and 49.7% female. 
The median income for a household in the county was $42,014 and the median income for a family was $50,007. The per capita income for the county was $21,886. About 11.1% of people in families and 14.2% of the population were below the poverty line, including 22.6% of those under age 18 and 10.9% of those age 65 or over. 
Menominee County was strongly Republican-leaning at its start, but has been more middle-leaning during the 20th century. Since 1876, the Republican Party nominee has carried the county vote in 69% of the elections (25 of 36 elections). 
The Egyptian Patriotic Movement has recently gone into opposition to current president Abdel Fattah el-Sisi. On 13 December 2017, three of its members were arrested for allegedly harming national security by spreading false information. 
The BMW E41 and P80 series is a family of naturally-aspirated Formula One racing engines, designed and developed by BMW, and introduced in 2000 in partnership with Williams, and continued through 2006, during their partnership with Sauber. 
BMW's E41 engine was ready to compete in the 2000 season, fitted in the FW22 and driven by Ralf Schumacher and Jenson Button. Schumacher scored a podium finish in the engine's first race, and added two more during the course of the season. A series of consistent points-scoring finishes meant that Williams finished a competitive third in the Constructors' Championship, some distance behind the dominant Ferrari and McLaren teams, but ahead of engine manufacturers with more recent experience. 
For 2002, the reliability and consistency of the FW24 chassis was much improved, but Ferrari made a more significant step forward with its own F2002 chassis and dominated both championships. The team scored twelve more points than in the previous year and beat McLaren to second place in the Constructors' Championship, but only won a single race with Schumacher at the Malaysian Grand Prix. Moreover, Montoya was unable to win a single race, despite taking seven pole positions. 
The Williams team was more competitive in 2003, as both drivers won on two occasions and Montoya remained in contention for the Drivers' Championship until the penultimate race of the season. However, he ultimately fell short, as did the team in the Constructors' Championship, as although the FW25 was often the car to beat in the second half of the season, it took too much time to reach this point. 
BMW bought Swiss team Sauber in June 2005 to form the BMW Sauber F1 Team. The takeover came after BMW's relationship with Williams had deteriorated in the previous months, the partnership ending at the end of the 2005 season. The team, operated under a German racing licence, was based at Sauber's headquarters in Hinwil, Switzerland and BMW's headquarters in Munich, Germany. 
The team scored two podium finishes and came fifth in 2006, its first season in Formula One. This was followed by a second place in 2007 after the McLaren team had been excluded from the championship. Robert Kubica took the team's only Grand Prix victory at the 2008 Canadian Grand Prix. Following a poor 2009 season, BMW withdrew from Formula One and sold the team back to founder Peter Sauber. 
On 19 October 2006, BMW announced that Robert Kubica would partner Nick Heidfeld for the 2007 Formula One season with Sebastian Vettel taking the test and reserve driver role. Timo Glock was later signed as the team's second test driver. The team launched its 2007 car, the F1.07, on January 16, 2007. 
Kubica returned to racing action at the French Grand Prix and proved his recovery by finishing in fourth position. Over the remainder of the season, he and Heidfeld continued their form to score a total of 101 points, which secured the team second in the Constructors' Championship after McLaren's disqualification. Heidfeld scored another podium finish at the Hungarian Grand Prix and scored 61 points to Kubica's 39, while Vettel's sole appearance produced an additional point. 
On August 21, 2007, BMW confirmed its driver line-up of Heidfeld and Kubica for the 2008 season. Their 2008 car, the F1.08 was officially launched in Munich at BMW Welt on January 14, 2008. It made its track debut at Valencia the next day, with Robert Kubica driving. Team principal Mario Theissen set the target of the team's first win. 
The team also attained a second-place finish in the Monaco Grand Prix with Robert Kubica, beating both Ferraris and only trailing the McLaren of Lewis Hamilton by three seconds. 
In October the team confirmed that they would stick with Robert Kubica and Nick Heidfeld as their drivers for the 2009 Season. 
Following a meeting of the BMW board on July 28, the company held at press conference the following morning in which it confirmed the team's withdrawal from Formula One at the end of 2009. Chairman Norbert Reithofer described the decision as a strategic one. The Formula One Teams Association released a statement in response pledging its support to help the team remain in F1. 
On 15 September 2009, it was announced that BMW Sauber had secured a buyer, Qadbak Investments Limited which said to represent European and Middle Eastern interests. However Lotus had been given the 13th and final slot in the 2010 Championship. The team were awarded what was termed a 14th entry, which hinged either on another team dropping out or all the other teams agreeing to allow 28 cars to enter the 2010 Championship. 
On November 22, Swiss newspaper SonntagsZeitung revealed that Qadbak's attempt to purchase the team had failed as it did not have the necessary funds. Qadbak turned out to be a shell company with no assets and no investors behind it. On November 27, 2009 it was announced that Peter Sauber would repurchase the team conditional upon the team receiving a FIA entry for the 2010 season.  The FIA subsequently granted Sauber an entry on December 3. The team used Ferrari engines in 2010. 
Crystal Heights is a neighborhood in the north end of the Dartmouth area in Nova Scotia's Halifax Regional Municipality. 
Part of the larger neighbourhood of Albro Lake, Crystal Heights is a development comprising high-density apartment buildings. It is adjacent to Highfield Park, a similar development dating to the 1970s. 
He was born on 19 November 1934[citation needed] in Eora country in the inner city suburb of Balmain, Sydney, New South Wales. 
I have no mortgage on being dispossessed or having a tough life. We've all had it. Every  Aboriginal person I know of in my generation has had one hell of a time.  Nobody has a mortgage on that.  We've all been through it.  Our obligation, our mandate, as artists is to communicate with our people first.{Syron, HREOC, 15.11.92}
Syron began his artistic career in 1960 at the Ensemble Theatre in Kirribilli, Sydney under the guidance of New York trained American actor/director and esteemed teacher of the Strasberg Method, the late Hayes Gordon. 
Syron returned to Perth, Western Australia, following the 1967 referendum. In Perth, he directed at Aarne Neeme's The Playhouse, Perth for a short time, before being invited to return to Sydney and direct Fortune and Men's Eyes at his old alma mater the Ensemble. For this he received the inaugural Drama Critics' Award for Best Production and his leading man Max Phipps received Best Actor for his role of "Queenie". 
Syron was invited to join Sydney's Old Tote Theatre by Robert Quentin, Head of Drama at the University of New South Wales, and Robin Lovejoy, Artistic Director. He was the first Indigenous Australian to work as a director in the mainstream Australian theatre industry and in 1972 was appointed Theatre Consultant for the Aboriginal Arts Board of the inaugural Australia Council for the Arts, headed for the first time by an Indigenous person, the artist Wandjuk Marika.[citation needed] 
The following year, 1973, Syron co-founded the Australian National Playwrights Conference with Katharine Brisbane. Lloyd Richards, Head of Acting at Yale University and Artistic Director of the American National Playwrights Conference wrote to the Aboriginal unit of Australia Council in September 1993: 
It was Brian Syron, in fact, who was the instigator not only of the first National Black Playwrights Conference but the National Playwrights Conference.  Syron always said our culture is an oral one, it comes through our painting, through our singing, through our stories that's how we pass down our laws, that's how we have passed down our history for 60,000 years
At the second NBPC held in 1988 Syron directed a video of Jimmy Chi's stage musical Bran Nue Dae produced by Chi.[citation needed] 
He followed this in the early 1972 with workshops and acting classes held at the Black Theatre Arts & Cultural Centre (aka Black Theatre), Cope Street, Redfern where his pupils included Jack Davis, Hyllus Maris, Lester Bostock, Maureen Watson and Gerry Bostock.[citation needed] 
At the end of 1974 Syron went to Los Angeles to take up a Adler's invitation to work at the Stella Adler Los Angeles Acting Studio on Hollywood Boulevard.[citation needed] 
Leading Indigenous academic and Harvard University, USA graduate, Dr Roberta Sykes set up the Black Women's Action Group in 1985 with Syron as the (anonymous) Honorary Secretary and foundation member joining other Indigenous and non-Indigenous Australians in the support of the educational advancement of Indigenous women in their pursuit of academic success at leading international universities.[citation needed] 
In 1987 Syron was executive producer of the documentary-drama film production Karbara: First Born (1987), directed and produced by Richard Guthrie, during and following the 1987 Australian National Playwrights Conference. The film featured Lydia Miller and Ernie Dingo and screened at the Sydney Film Festival in 1987 and on ABC TV.[citation needed] 
Syron was employed on director Peter Weir's feature film The Last Wave (1977) as a consultant.[citation needed] 
In 1981, Syron played a small role of "The Neighbour" in The City's Edge (1983) (aka Running Man Edge of the City)", co-written by Robert Merritt the first Australian Indigenous scriptwriter of a feature film and the Nightclub Manager in Coolangatta Gold (1983).[citation needed] 
Backlash (1986) directed and produced by Bill Bennett featured Lydia Miller with Syron in the role of The Executioner or Kadachi Man.  Syron and the lead actors were the co-writers of this production although they were uncredited by Bennett.[citation needed]  The script improvisation by the actors is confirmed by Encore 
Syron and Rosalie Kunoth-Monks were employed as Co-Aboriginal Consultants on the television production Naked Under Capricorn (1989) directed by Rob Stewart, produced by Syron's brother-in-law Ray Alchin and starring Nigel Havers.[citation needed] 
 From 1990 to 1992 Syron directed the first feature film by an Indigenous Australia Jindalee Lady (1992) and is recognised as being the first First Nations director of a feature film.  Lowitja O'Donoghue, Chair of the Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander Commission wrote saying 
 Mr Syron is held in high esteem by both indigenous and non-indigenous Australians for his work as our first indigenous feature film director..He has made a valuable contribution to indigenous art in this country and has been a strong and articulate advocate in the movement to raise and promote the status of indigenous theatre and film as an integral part of Australia's cultural heritage"  (O'Donoghue, letter to Russell Mulvey, Edmonton, Canada, 8.12.1992) 
He was included to the national team in 2009 and won a silver medal at the 2012 Olympics, placing fourth in 2016. 
De Voogd broke his jaw during a friendly match against Pakistan in June 2012, but recovered for the 2012 Olympics. Next year he missed four months of competitions, including the European Championships, because of a foot injury. He was not selected for the 2014 World Championships. However, he did play in the 2018 World Cup, where they won the silver medal. In January 2020 he was dropped from the national team's training squad for the 2020 Summer Olympics. 
The Federation Regiment was an attempt by British General Gerald Templer to form a multiracial infantry regiment of the Malayan Federation Army. 
In 1933, the British War Office agreed to the formation of the Malay Regiment as a locally raised regiment of the British Army. Two battalions of the Malay Regiment were raised before the Japanese invasion of Malaya, and both battalions acquitted themselves well during the Battle of Malaya and the subsequent Battle of Singapore. 
In July 1952, the Federation Regiment Bill was passed in the Federal Legislative Council. This bill paved the way for the development of the first multiracial infantry unit as desired by General Gerald Templer. 
The Malayan Emergency was seen as a war between the British colonists and the Chinese-dominated Malayan Communist Party, with the Malays seemingly supporting the British cause. Hence, it was imperative that the Chinese population be involved in the campaign against the Communists. 
Templer had hoped to form a purely Chinese regiment, but his idea was met with hostility by the Malay rulers. They however agreed to his idea to raise at least three multiracial battalions recruited from among the locals in Malaya and mooted the formation of the Federation Regiment with the understanding that each battalion would be balanced by an additional battalion of the Malay Regiment. 
Templer selected a group of young Malayan men to be sent first to Eaton Hall in Chester, and then selected 24 young Malayans to undergo Officer Cadet Training at the Royal Military Academy at Sandhurst for later appointment as officers of the multiracial Federation Regiment. The term 12 Superb Men was coined by the Malayan Press after the publicity associated with the selection of the 13 men and their round Malaya exercise in an attempt to recruit men for the Federation Regiment. 
They paved the way for a multiracial armed forces in line with Templer's vision for the formation of a multiracial infantry regiment. 
On 1 January 1960, the Federation Regiment was merged with the Federation Reconnaissance Regiment and renamed the Federation Reconnaissance Corps. 
BattleForce was originally created by FASA Corporation, a wargame set in the BattleTech universe designed to allow the simulation of larger-scale actions. Units typically represent lances, but there are provisions for allowing the counters to represent larger units/formations, such as companies, battalions, and so forth. 
Normal BattleTech game play usually is set up for small encounters (up to 12 units per side).  Though large battles are possible using the normal games rules for BattleTech, the game can consume a lot of time to play.  BattleForce was designed to remedy this problem. 
In its simplest description the game of BattleForce is still a tactical level game comparable to BattleTech, but on a slightly larger scale.  Individual vehicles still retain statistics to track, but are much simplified over the normal game of BattleTech. 
For example, in BattleTech a BattleMech combat robot is tracked internally for 8 locations and for exterior armor in 11 locations, but in the game of BattleForce there is a pair of stats for armor and internal structure as a whole, both of which are usually single digit numbers between 1 and 9. 
There are also far less complicated rules for movement and for variables like terrain and movement's effect on weapon accuracy. 
Eulepidotis inclyta is a moth of the family Erebidae first described by Johan Christian Fabricius in 1775. It is found in the Neotropical realm, including Ecuador, Brazil and Honduras. 
This article on a moth of the subfamily Eulepidotinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Hermit of Santa Maria della Stella or Sanctuary of Santa Maria della Stella (in English: Sanctuary of Saint Mary of the Star) is an Italian hermitage, sited in a natural cave at Pazzano (Calabria) on Monte Stella. 
Its first mention was Greek code 598 of Paris. In the 11th century Byzantine monks lived in the sanctuary. Cristodulo was one of the first the Hegumen. In 1096, it became a minor monastery. In the Norman period it was converted to a Catholic monastery. In the 15th century, it became independent from San Giovanni Theristis monastery and Basilians abandoned the sanctuary. 
Winfield is a town in Scott County, Tennessee, United States. Originally named Chitwood in the late 18th century for Revolutionary War hero Captain James Chitwood after his family settled the area extensively, the name was changed following the Civil War due to the family's mixed allegiances. The population was 911 at the 2000 census and 967 at the 2010 census. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 911 people, 356 households, and 259 families residing in the town. The population density was 143.2 people per square mile (55.3/km2). There were 380 housing units at an average density of 59.7 per square mile (23.1/km2). The racial makeup of the town was 98.13% White, 0.99% Native American, 0.11% Asian, and 0.77% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 0.33% of the population. 
There were 356 households, out of which 34.6% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 55.1% were married couples living together, 13.8% had a female householder with no husband present, and 27.2% were non-families. 22.8% of all households were made up of individuals, and 7.6% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.56 and the average family size was 2.97. 
In the town, the population was spread out, with 27.3% under the age of 18, 10.4% from 18 to 24, 29.4% from 25 to 44, 24.3% from 45 to 64, and 8.6% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 32 years. For every 100 females, there were 93.8 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 94.7 males. 
The median income for a household in the town was $25,278, and the median income for a family was $28,077. Males had a median income of $25,260 versus $20,417 for females. The per capita income for the town was $14,059. About 17.7% of families and 19.8% of the population were below the poverty line, including 20.6% of those under age 18 and 27.0% of those age 65 or over. 
Plazi claims it adheres to copyright law and argues that taxonomic treatments do not qualify as literary and artistic work. Plazi claims that such works are therefore in the public domain and can be freely used and disseminated (with scientific practice requiring appropriate citation). 
The book deals with the relations between Islam and Western civilization. It is divided into 3 sections. The first section treats the history of the interactions between Europe and the Islamic world. The second section is concerned with the perceptions arising from these interactions by both societies. The third and final section is concerned with Islamic responses and reactions in earlier and recent times. 
This chapter contains an exploration of the meaning of orientalism. It is argued that the word orientalism was until relatively recently used mainly in two senses, to denote either a branch of scholarship or a school of painting. However Lewis contends that it has now been given a new meaning, "that of unsympathetic or hostile treatment of oriental peoples." (p100). 
The historical beginnings of oriental scholarship in Western Europe are dated to the time of the Renaissance. Its history is then traced from relatively narrow roots where one discipline, philology, recovered, studied, published and interpreted texts relating to one region, that which is now called the Middle East, to its gradual expansion to include other disciplines such as philosophy, theology, literature and history and a diversity of areas from the Ottoman Empire to India and China. 
Having reached a point where the multi-disciplinary approaches and the sheer number of regions under study rendered the term orientalist obsolete Lewis argues it was in effect formally abandoned by those he terms accredited orientalists at the 29th International Congress of Orientalists in 1973. Lewis laments that although the term has now been revived its usage has changed to that of a term of polemic abuse. 
An exploration of the rise of anti-orientalism follows where critics from a diversity of sources ranging from Islamicists to Arab Nationalists to Marxist theorists are briefly considered before Lewis concludes by identifying its main exponent in the United States, Edward Said. 
A significant proportion of the remainder of the chapter is devoted to a critique of Said's book Orientalism published in 1978. Lewis attributes the success of Said's book to its anti-Western stance, its use of, "the ideas, and still more the language of currently fashionable literary, philosophical and political theories." (p114) and its apparent simplification of complex problems. 
Finally the chapter concludes with a brief review of the counter-critique from Arab writers such as the Egyptian philosopher Fu'ad Zakana. 
The psychology of programming (PoP) is the field of research that deals with the psychological aspects of writing programs (often computer programs). The field has also been called the empirical studies of programming (ESP). It covers research into computer programmers' cognition, tools and methods for programming-related activities, and programming education. 
Psychologically, computer programming is a human activity which involves cognitions such as reading and writing computer language, learning, problem solving, and reasoning. 
Some methods which one can use to study the psychological aspects of computer programming include introspection, observation, experiment, and qualitative research. 
This article about a Roman Catholic church building in Italy is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Unlockable content refers to content that is available in video games but not accessible unless something is performed by the player to get access to it. Different genres of games have different styles and options of unlockable content that is standard among their games. The unlockable content varies, and can be as little as a single weapon or enhancement, to more than doubling the playable characters available to the player. 
Some games have established replayability for players through a rewards system. Once the player does unique or difficult actions in a game, such as killing a boss in a limited time, or collecting a certain number of items over the course of playing the game, the player can earn a reward, potentially unlocking more content, such as additional items for the player to use or vanity items to show the player's prowess at achievements. 
Companies such as Ubisoft have released programs and systems that take advantage of this metagame, by rewarding players who complete certain actions with points. These points, known in Ubisoft's Uplay service as "U" points, can be redeemed for in-game rewards such as additional in-game currency, character skins, missions, weapons, and the like. 
Especially with fighting games, defeating certain bosses or villains can unlock those characters, or other non-starting characters, as playable characters for the player. Games like Tekken and Soulcalibur offer such methods of unlocking content. 
Sometimes, the only action necessary to unlock new content is Internet availability. Games like Professor Layton and the Curious Village offered players additional puzzles every week by downloading the puzzles from the Internet over the Nintendo Wi-Fi Connection available in all the Nintendo DS handhelds. 
Sometimes a player can unlock content by collecting hidden items found throughout the game. Some games offer a purchase system of additional content, such as images, wallpapers, music and such, great example is the .hack video game series, by collecting the hidden items and redeeming them for the unlockable content. Sometimes the player can get these unlockables based on the total amount of hidden items found. 
Zimmeriana lasiodactylum is a species of cumacean, in the Gynodiastylidae family. It is found in Western Australia at depths of 9-23m. Specimens have been found of adult female and subadult male but not adult male. 
Poolville Independent School District is a public school district based in the community of Poolville, Texas (USA). 
Poolville ISD is located northwest of the Dallas/Fort Worth metropolitan area. It has a population as low as 550 students (around 300 in elementary, 100 in junior high, and about 150 in high school). 
On August 18, 1979, its new renovated airfield was opened and given the name of Cachimbo Airport. The apron of the airport is large enough for up to 20 small aircraft with full support and maintenance facilities. One unit of the Amazon Surveillance System is also located at the airport.[citation needed] 
No military units are permanently based at Cachimbo, a military airport operated by the Brazilian Air Force, not an Air Force Base. It is for exclusive military use and therefore no scheduled flights operate at this airport.[citation needed] 
The Bishoprics, etc., in West Indies Act 1842 (5 & 6 Vict. c. 4) was an Act of Parliament in the United Kingdom, which received the Royal Assent on 23 March 1842 and was repealed in 1971. 
This legislation in the United Kingdom, or its constituent jurisdictions, article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sokari Ekine is a Nigerian activist, blogger and author. She worked as a journalist at the Pambazuka News and has also written for Feminist Africa and New Internationalist. Ekine kept a blog between 2004 and 2014 in which she covered a number of topics including LGBTI rights, women's rights, and environmental issues. She has co-written or edited four books, and taught English to school children in Haiti. 
Ekine has edited the books Blood and Oil: Testimonies of Violence from Women of the Niger Delta (2001), SMS Uprising: Mobile Phone Activism in Africa (2010), African Awakenings with Firoze Manji (2011), and Queer African Reader with Hakima Abbas (2013). 
Ekine was born in Nigeria to a Nigerian father and British mother. She grew up in Nigeria but moved to England to attend college. She holds a Bachelor of Science degree in new technology and a Master of Arts degree in rights in education from the Institute of Education at the University of London. 
Ekine lived in the United States for a number of years before returning to the UK, where she found work as a further education lecturer. Her first venture online was in 1995 when she founded the Black Sisters Network email list. Ekine was treated for cancer in 2000, a factor in her move to Spain with her partner in 2004. 
Ekine wrote a weekly column for the Pambazuka News for nine years and served as their online editor in 2007. She began writing a blog, Black Looks, in 2004, which she continued for ten years. Common writing topics were LGBTI rights in Africa, gender identity, militarisation, human rights, art, the oil industry in the Niger Delta, Haiti, activism. and land rights. She began Black Looks 2 in 2014, a new blog focused on her photographic work. 
Ekine has also written for Feminist Africa and New Internationalist. She has written of the struggles of women against state forces and oil companies in the militarised and environmentally damaged Niger Delta. Ekine visited Haiti as online editor of Pambazuka News in 2007 to meet with women organizers for Fanmi Lavalas. 
In 2003 she was awarded an International Reporting Project fellowship from Johns Hopkins University and commissioned to write on health care in the country. She subsequently worked in Port-au-Prince teaching English in high schools for non-governmental organisation Growing Haiti. 
In 2016, Ekine began working on a photographic narrative entitled Spirit Desire: Resistance, Imagination and Sacred Memories in Haitian Vodoun. 
Murray Wallace (born 10 January 1993) is a Scottish professional footballer who plays as a defender for EFL Championship side Millwall. 
After beginning his career in his native Scotland playing for Falkirk, Wallace joined Huddersfield Town in 2012. He spent three years with Football League One side Scunthorpe United, transferring to Millwall for an undisclosed fee on 20 June 2018. He also played for the Scotland under-20 and under-21 football teams. 
Wallace returned to Huddersfield in May 2012 at the end of his loan at former club Falkirk. He was set to train with Simon Grayson's squad throughout the Play-Off campaign until he joined up with the Scotland Under-20 side ahead of a tournament being held in the Netherlands, as Huddersfield went on to win the Play-Off final beating Sheffield United on penalties to win promotion to the Championship. 
In the following two seasons, he would make sporadic appearances for the Terriers, mainly due to only being selected when other centre-backs were injured or suspended. 
On 25 August 2015, with appearances still being limited, Wallace joined Scunthorpe United on loan for a month in an emergency loan deal. After making 12 league appearances, he was recalled by Huddersfield on 1 November, along with team-mate Joe Lolley. 
Wallace signed a three-and-a-half year deal with Scunthorpe on 2 January 2016. Upon signing for the Iron, he featured in every minute of every competitive fixture until 29 August 2017, when his run of 7,560 consecutive playing minutes was broken as he didn't feature in Scunthorpe's EFL Trophy game against Sunderland U21s. 
The William Hill Sportswoman of the Year Award was an award, which was first handed out in 2011, after William Hill decided to launch an award with a women-only shortlist to vote for after the BBC failed to announce any female nominations for the 2011 BBC Sports Personality of the Year Award, which caused somewhat of a public outcry. 
The tribe owns two tourist attractions here: Billie Swamp Safari, and Big Cypress National Preserve. 
The American rock band Phish held their millennium concert at the reservation from December 30, 1999 to January 1, 2000. With 85,000 people in attendance, it was the earliest and largest sold-out millennium concert. Phish performed three sets of music on the 30th, an afternoon set on the 31st, and an unprecedented "Midnight To Dawn" set, which ran from 11:50pm until sunrise on January 1, 2000. 
The entertainment complex is surrounded by 350 acres for outdoor events, in addition to a newly renovated rodeo arena with seating for 3,000 people. Stables have stalls for 86 horses. 
The tribe constructed the Ah-Tah-Thi-Ki Seminole Indian Museum, which opened in 1997. In 2005 it was the first tribal museum to receive accreditation from the American Association of Museums (AAM), and is a Smithsonian Institution Affiliate. 
The Israeli and French authorities were in close communication with each other on how to proceed, as the French law of extradition, like Israel's, does not allow extradition of nationals, except to countries of the European Union, to bring them to justice. 
In July 2012, after an official complaint from the Zeitouni family, France launched a criminal investigation into the death of Lee Zeitouni that led to Khayat and Robic being charged for homicide, failure to assist a person in danger and unlawful escape to avoid responsibility. 
In December 2014  Eric Robic, the driver of the car that hit Zeitouni, was found guilty of manslaughter and sentenced to 5 years in prison. Passenger Claude Khayat was found guilty of deliberately failing to provide assistance to a person in danger and was sentenced to 15 months. 
Lee Zeitouni was born in Kibbutz Neve Ur in 1986, and was the sibling of two brothers and a sister. At the time of her death, Zeitouni was a Pilates instructor. 
Thousands of people gathered for Zeitouni's funeral in her hometown of Kibbutz Neve Ur on September 18, 2011. 
Police officials conducted a nationwide search, and traced the vehicle to Eric Robic.  Police discovered his apartment to be empty, since he quickly escaped to France together with Khayat. Detectives determined that Robic and Khayat had been drinking in Tel Aviv and Ramat Gan, and left a bar at around 6 A.M. on the day that Zeitouni was killed. 
Soon after, Israeli police asked Interpol for assistance in bringing the French tourists into custody, and an international arrest warrant was issued for Robic and Khayat. 
On October 23, 2011, Khayat and Robic stated that they spoke to an Israeli attorney who specializes in traffic accidents, and requested that the attorney begin discussions with state prosecutors to explore their options for a plea bargain or a specific sentence. 
In December 2011, the two suspects stated that they do not plan to return to Israel to face justice, but are determined to stay in France. One of their lawyers stated that it was possible that the Israeli authorities would allow the trial to take place in France, but stated that there was still a "power struggle" between the French and Israeli authorities at the moment. 
In late November 2011, activists in a group working to extradite Khayat and Robic from France to Israel handed out flyers at Ben-Gurion International Airport to passengers arriving from France. The flyers had the slogan "license to kill" written on them, and the group hoped to appeal to the French passengers, many of whom are Jewish, to assist in extraditing them from France. 
Passenger Claude Khayat was found guilty of deliberately failing to provide assistance to a person in danger and was sentenced to 15 months in prison. 
The COVID-19 pandemic in Canada is part of the ongoing worldwide pandemic of coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19). It is caused by severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 (SARS-CoV-2). Most cases over the course of the pandemic have been in Ontario, Quebec and Alberta, with Alberta significantly ahead (45% and 55% higher, respectively) of those two largest provinces for cases per capita. Confirmed cases have been reported in all of Canada's provinces and territories. 
On January 12, 2020, the World Health Organization (WHO) confirmed that a novel coronavirus was the cause of a respiratory illness in a cluster of people in Wuhan City, Hubei Province, China, reported to the WHO on December 31, 2019. 
The case fatality ratio for COVID-19 has been much lower than SARS of 2003, but the transmission has been significantly greater, with a significant death toll. 
On January 1, 2020, the WHO set up the IMST (Incident Management Support Team) across all three levels of the organization: headquarters, regional headquarters and country-level, putting the organization on an emergency footing for dealing with the outbreak. 
On January 7, when it appeared that there was a health crisis emerging in Wuhan, Public Health Canada advised travellers to China to avoid contact with animals, noting that they were very carefully monitoring the situation. Still there was no evidence of what caused the illness, or how it spread. 
Initially, Canada faced a shortage of personal protective equipment, as the Trudeau government had cut PPE funding in the previous years. 
* On 17 July 2020, the large number of recoveries is due to a revision of the algorithm used in Quebec to determine whether a patient who is neither deceased nor currently hospitalized may be considered recovered. 
Early evidence out of Alberta suggests that the Pfizer and Moderna vaccines will continue to be effective against death or hospitalization from the Alpha and Gamma variants. A study in Ontario found that the Pfizer vaccine was 95% effective to prevent hospitalization or death from the Alpha, Beta and Gamma variants 7 days after the second dose. Moderna was 94% effective against Alpha 7 days after the 2nd dose. Moderna appeared to be highly effective against Delta. 
A preprint study from epidemiologists David Fisman and Ashleigh Tuite, at the University of Toronto, found that the Delta variant had a 120% greater risk of hospitalization, 287% greater risk of ICU admission and 137% greater risk of death compared to non-variant of concern strains of SARS-COV-2. 
On March 20, as part of the announcement on Canada's industrial strategy (see below), Trudeau stated that the National Research Council would work with small- and medium-sized companies on health research to fight the virus. 
On March 23, Theresa Tam began appearing in public service announcements on radio and television, urging personal hygiene, social distancing, and against unnecessary travel. 
On April 6, Tam began to suggest that the use of non-medical face masks in public could be an "additional measure" of protection. She stated to "protect others around you in situations where physical distancing is difficult to maintain", but that this is not proven to protect the wearer and is considered complementary to all existing health guidance issued thus far. 
In response to backlogs in COVID-19 testing, especially provinces like Ontario, Health Canada approved new rapid testing for the virus. 
Health Canada issued recommendations for long-term care homes.  They encouraged them to restrict outside visitors and volunteers, restrict employees from being transferred between multiple facilities, provide personal protective equipment, enforce physical distancing during meals, screen staff and essential visitors. On April 15, Trudeau announced that the federal government planned to provide additional pay to long-term care workers. 
In April 2020, the Department of National Defence gave the provinces the option to get Canadian Armed Forces assistance in combating the pandemic in long-term care facilities. Quebec was the first to act, with military personnel arriving on April 17. Ontario responded next, with Premier Doug Ford requesting military aid on April 22. 
Since March 30, individuals showing COVID-19 symptoms must be refused boarding on domestic flights (10 seats or more) and passenger trains. However, it excluded buses and intercity passenger rail services. Since April 20, all travellers were required to wear face masks while departing and arriving on air travel, including during security screenings. Those who did not comply were prevented from proceeding. 
On January 6, 2021, the federal government announced that all incoming travellers must present proof of a negative COVID-19 PCR test conducted within 72 hours of their departure time to board flights into Canada. 
Foreign flights are only allowed to land in Calgary, Montreal, Toronto, or Vancouver. In addition, all flights to the Caribbean and Mexico have been suspended until April 30. 
On October 6th, 2021, Justin Trudeau announced that vaccination will become mandatory for those seeking to board a plane or a train in Canada to fly domestically or internationally. Starting November 30th, 2021, the option to provide a negative COVID-19 test prior to boarding will no longer be possible and all passengers must be fully vaccinated. 
On March 18, the federal government announced an $82-billion response package with a variety of measures. On March 25, the COVID-19 Emergency Response Act received royal assent from Governor General Julie Payette. 
The CERB launched on April 6. On April 15, Trudeau announced an extension to the CERB to workers making up to $1,000 per month and that the government planned to work with the provinces to implement salary top-ups for essential workers who make less than $2,500 per month. 
The Canada Emergency Wage Subsidy (CEWS) was announced on April 1, an expanded version of the temporary business wage subsidy. The Parliament reconvened on April 11 to pass the COVID-19 Emergency Response Act, No. 2 on division. It implemented the CEWS, allowing eligible companies to receive a 75 percent subsidy on each of their employees' wages (up to their first $58,700) for 12 weeks retroactive to March 15. 
Trudeau introduced new financial aid programs on April 10, including the Canada Emergency Business Account (CEBA), which offers loans, interest-free until the end of 2022, of up to $40,000 for small- and medium-sized businesses. The CEBA was expanded on April 16 to make more businesses eligible.[how?] 
On October 12, 2020, the federal government rolled out a new income support program after the ending of CERB, the Canada Recovery Benefit (CRB). Another program, the Canada Recovery Caregiving Benefit (CRCB), supports Canadians working but have to take a break to care for dependents (a child below 12 years of age or a disabled family member). The benefit only applies if schools and care centres are closed or the dependent fell sick or contracted COVID-19. 
On July 3, 2020, the Ethics Commissioner announced an investigation into Trudeau and the government's decision to have WE Charity administer the summer student grant program. WE Charity was criticized for its close ties to the Trudeau family. On the same day, the Minister of Diversity and Inclusion and Youth, Bardish Chagger, announced that WE Charity would no longer administer the Canada Student Service Grant program. 
On March 12, Quebec declared a public health emergency, requiring international travellers to self-isolate for 14 days and banning gatherings of 250 people. Extending the ban to all gatherings outside workplaces and retail. 
On March 16, Prince Edward Island declared a public health emergency. Alberta and Ontario declared emergencies on March 17, followed by British Columbia, Newfoundland and Labrador, the Northwest Territories, Nunavut, Saskatchewan, and Yukon on March 18. New Brunswick, Manitoba, and Nova Scotia declared emergencies on March 19, March 20, and March 22 respectively. 
These emergencies allowed provinces to ban gatherings and require international travellers to self-isolate. On March 25, mandatory self-isolation was imposed federally, making it a legal requirement for all provinces that had not done so already. 
New Brunswick, the Northwest Territories, Nunavut, Prince Edward Island and have all restricted entry through interprovincial borders, prohibiting the entry of non-residents without a valid reason. Quebec has additionally restricted travel into 9 of its 18 regions and parts of 3 other regions. The borders of Nova Scotia and Newfoundland and Labrador are being screened, while also requiring travellers to self-isolate for 14 days upon entering the province. 
Schools in the Toronto District School Board were closed under a 2-week class-free quarantine beginning on the week after the regularly scheduled March Break. Virtual learning was implemented in the week following the quarantine and extended until the beginning of the next school year, giving students the option of going in-person with restrictions or continuing virtual learning. March Break was pushed back to the week of April 11. 
Laurentian University in Greater Sudbury was the first to voluntarily suspended classes and moved to online instruction on March 12. This was quickly followed by many other universities across the country. 
Ontario, Quebec, and Saskatchewan have mandated the closure of all businesses not deemed essential by the provinces. Essential businesses include grocery stores, takeout and delivery restaurants, pharmacies, transportation, manufacturing, food production, energy, and healthcare. 
Liquor and cannabis stores remained mainly open across the country, with governments reversing their closure orders due to alcohol withdrawal syndrome concerns. 
Alberta, British Columbia, New Brunswick, Prince Edward Island, and Manitoba all offered one-time payments that aimed to bridge the gap before implementating the federal Canada Emergency Response Benefit. Quebec's Temporary Aid for Workers Program provides up to four weeks of payments for those who do not qualify for federal assistance. Prince Edward Island also provides payments to those who have kept their jobs but work reduced hours. 
On March 19, the Pimicikamak Cree Nation in northern Manitoba restricted entry to essential travellers, and Chief David Monias said the Sayisi Dene and others are doing the same. 
As of March 19, the Council of the Haida Nation said it was discouraging all non-resident travel to the islands "for the time being." 
As of October 8, the infection rate in Indigenous communities had been one-third of the infection rate in non-Indigenous communities, according to an update from Indigenous Services Minister Marc Miller. Miller praised Indigenous leadership and with Indigenous Services Canada's Chief Medical Officer Dr. Tim Wong, encouraging Indigenous people to remain vigilant and safe. 
First Nations communities are prioritized amongst others in the first phase of vaccinations against the virus. 
The COVID-19 pandemic had a deep impact on the Canadian economy, leading it into a recession. The governments' social distancing rules had the effect of limiting economic activity in the country. Companies started considering mass-layoffs of workers, which was largely prevented by the Canada Emergency Wage Subsidy. But despite these efforts, Canada's unemployment rate was 13.5% in May 2020, the highest it has been since 1976. 
Many large-scale events that planned to take place in 2020 in Canada were cancelled or delayed. This includes all major sporting and artistic events. Canada's tourism and air travel sectors were hit especially hard due to travel restrictions. Some farmers feared a labour shortfall and bankruptcy. 
Provinces have faced COVID-19 testing backlogs due to a shortage of supplies, including the chemical reagents required to complete the tests. In late April, the federal government arranged for a cargo flight from China that delivered the equivalent of about six to nine months of production for one particular raw material for the 20-odd raw materials needed by supplier LuminUltra to supply reagent kits for RT-PCR machines. 
Provinces have faced COVID-19 testing backlogs due to a shortage of the chemical reagents and swabs required to complete the tests. 
LuminUltra Technologies Ltd. of Fredericton is producing reagent test kits to use with automated RT-PCR machines. On April 15, Trudeau announced that the company would be "ramping up production ... to meet the weekly demand in all provinces." The company announced the same day that it would provide "500,000 urgently needed COVID-19 tests per week to the Canadian federal government for use across Canada." 
Spartan Bioscience of Ottawa signed contracts with the federal government and the provinces of Alberta, Quebec, and Ontario to supply virus-RNA testing systems that process a single swab sample in 30 to 60 minutes. Together the contracts were for over one million swab test kits, and at least 250 handheld devices. On April 13, Health Canada approved this test, but on May 3 the test was recalled due to unreliable results. 
Bio-ID Diagnostics of Edmonton developed a direct 24-hour virus test that can be scaled to 20,000 samples per day. Since it is based on sequencing DNA it avoids false positives, and it detects a low concentration of the virus, substantially reducing false negatives in asymptomatic individuals. 
MedMira of Halifax developed one of the first rapid detection kits for HIV and has now developed a COVID-19 antibody test that takes three minutes from taking the blood drop specimen. 
Plantform Corp. of Guelph applied for funding from the National Research Council to develop an antibody test for COVID-19. 
The ancient Iranian town of Ganzak is identified as being near Leylan in the Miandoab plain. Ganzak was built by the Achaemenids, and was the seat of the satrap of Media. 
Karaops is a genus of Australian wall spiders that was first described by S. C. Crews & Mark Stephen Harvey in 2011. 
Jess Bourke, better known as JessB, is a rapper and former professional netballer from Auckland, New Zealand. She has released two EPs (Bloom and New Views) and won Best New Zealand Act at the 2019 MTV Europe Music Awards. 
This biographical article related to hip hop music is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jesaulenko started his football career with the Eastlake Football Club in the Canberra Australian National Football League.  In recognition of his achievements in the VFL the league awards the Alex Jesaulenko Medal to the best player in the Grand Final each year.  In 2008 the award was won by Nicholas Smith. 
In recent years the AFL has awarded the Alex Jesaulenko Medal to the winner of the Mark of the Year in recognition of Jesaulenko's famous mark in the 1970 VFL Grand Final, one of the most recognisable spectacular marks of all time. 
In State of Origin football, the medal was awarded to the best player on the ground for The Allies representative team. It was only awarded from 1995 to 1998, when The Allies team, consisting of players not from the major football states of Victoria, South Australia and Western Australia. It honoured Jesaulenko's Canberra origins being outside of the major Australian football states and hence would have qualified to play for The Allies had the concept existed during his career. 
This is intended to be a complete list of the properties and districts on the National Register of Historic Places in Clarke County, Mississippi, United States. Latitude and longitude coordinates are provided for many National Register properties and districts; these locations may be seen together in a map. 
There are 51 properties and districts listed on the National Register in the county.  Another property was once listed but has been removed. 
"No Exit" is a song by the American new wave band Blondie. It was the title track from their seventh studio album in 1999 and was released as a single in Europe, but not the US. 
A "gothic hip hop" track "No Exit" features rapper Coolio exchanging raps with Debbie Harry. It also uses an interpolation of Johann Sebastian Bach's "Toccata and Fugue in D minor" and Edvard Grieg's "In the Hall of the Mountain King". 
The single was released in the UK as a special tour souvenir CD. The released CD contains remixes of "No Exit", "Maria", "Nothing Is Real but the Girl" and a cover of Karen Young's 1978 disco hit "Hot Shot". 
A video was released for one of the "No Exit" remixes, which also featured rappers Inspectah Deck, U-God of Wu-Tang Clan, Havoc and Prodigy of Mobb Deep as "The Loud Allstars". 
The Loud Allstar Rock Remix was featured in the 1999 film 200 Cigarettes. A music video for the song, featuring the band with Coolio and the other rap performers, was produced in conjunction with the release of the film. 
All tracks are written by Debbie Harry, Chris Stein, Jimmy Destri, Coolio, Romy Ashby unless otherwise noted 
Broken Saints is a partially Flash-animated horror drama web series by Brooke Burgess, with technical direction from Ian Kirby and artwork by Andrew West. First released online from 2001 to 2003, it is one of the earliest examples of a motion comic. Characters for the most part remain in static poses and dialogue is indicated by speech balloons, but animated sequences are used to switch scenes and help advance the story, while music and sound effects are included.  
While Broken Saints was met with unanimous critical acclaim, it has remained relatively obscure since its initial release. Its word-of-mouth reverence from fans and subsequent popularity on Newgrounds has led the series to develop a cult following. 
Centered on philosophical, religious, political and spiritual themes, Broken Saints tells the story of four strangers from "the quiet corners of the globe" connected by a vision or visions they all receive of a coming evil. Their search for the truth behind their experiences leads them to far larger and more disturbing truths than they could have expected. 
The details of their respective visions vary, but each one contains a giant red cat's eye (accompanied by an electronic screech), the ubiquitous symbol of the series. After seeing it, the four main characters fall into a temporary coma. 
For the online release, several haikus are presented as each episode loads. All versions of the episodes contain quotes at the beginning and end from various sources, both tying in with themes and events of the respective episode. Each episode contains animated scenes which introduce and close the episode, and allude to various pop culture media such as The Matrix, Donnie Darko, Fight Club and The Wizard of Oz. 
Oran Bajir: Oran is a 29-year-old devout Muslim from Baghdad, Iraq. At the outset of the story he is involved in an armed resistance against Western domination, left to guard a small bunker in solitude. With nothing to do but read the Qur'an, Oran begins to doubt his mission and himself. Oran is voiced by Michael Dobson. 
Kamimura: Also known as "Kami", he is an elderly Shinto mystic and former Buddhist from rural Japan. He was estranged from his former Buddhist order over an incident concerning relics given him that he swore to protect. Goku, a former student, had demanded the box, in order to sell its contents. However, Kamimura had given his word and his word was his bond. Kamimura's voice actor is Colin Foo. 
Each of the chapters was written and directed by Burgess, with Kirby doing the technical direction and West providing the artwork. The series was co-produced in the first year (first six episodes) by Vancouver-based Switch Interactive with Budget Monk Productions. Illustrator Andrew West and Flash designer/programmer Ian Kirby were employees of Switch Interactive, and brought the concept to the studio's attention in 1999.[citation needed] 
Broken Saints is broken into 24 Flash-animated episodes that were released from 2001 to 2003. It totals about 12 hours of running time.[citation needed] 
The chapters vary in length and become progressively longer, many with two or three acts. The shortest is nine minutes long, while the longest, the 24th episode "Truth", is five acts long with a prologue and epilogue, totaling 1 hour and 23 minutes.[citation needed] 
The creators of Broken Saints received a grant from the Canadian government to assist in publishing the work to DVD. 
On November 30, 2008, Brooke Burgess announced on the official Broken Saints blog that a TV series was on the way. In the blog post was also embedded a trailer. The trailer was later revealed to be a pitch for a series. 
In 2015, on the series Facebook group, Burgess said he had a specific idea for a possible second season that would pick up 30 years after the events of the first. 
Illinois Mennonite Conference is an area conference of Mennonite Church USA. There are 100 credentialed leaders active ministers and over 6000 active members. It comprises 42 congregations and church plants, most of which have memberships of between 50 and 100. 
Some of the largest congregations include the Mennonite Church of Normal, Arthur Mennonite Church, and Lombard Mennonite Church. 
Lombard Mennonite Church has about 150 members.[citation needed] It is active in the local Ten Thousand Villages store and other ministries such as Lombard Mennonite Peace Center. The current lead pastor is Todd Friesen. Throughout its history, Mennonites have used this church as a launching point for starting mission churches in the city of Chicago. 
Emma Richards was ordained as the first female Mennonite minister at Lombard Mennonite Church in 1973. Lombard Mennonite is a member of the Illinois Mennonite Conference. 
The Roman Catholic Diocese of Katsina-Ala (Latin: Katsinen(sis)- Alen(sis) is a diocese located in the city of Katsina-Ala in the Ecclesiastical province of Abuja in Nigeria. Created on 29 December 2012 when it was split from the Roman Catholic Diocese of Makurdi. 
This article about a Roman Catholic diocese in Nigeria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The alternative pathway is a type of cascade reaction of the complement system and is a component of the innate immune system, a natural defense against infections. 
The alternative pathway is one of three complement pathways that opsonize and kill pathogens.  The pathway is triggered when the C3b protein directly binds a microbe.  It can also be triggered by foreign materials and damaged tissues. 
This change in shape allows the binding of plasma protein Factor B, which allows Factor D to cleave Factor B into Ba and Bb. 
Bb remains bound to C3(H2O) to form C3(H2O)Bb. This complex is also known as a fluid-phase C3-convertase.  This convertase, the alternative pathway C3-convertase, although only produced in small amounts, can cleave multiple C3 proteins into C3a and C3b.  The complex is believed to be unstable until it binds properdin, a serum protein.  The addition of properdin forms the complex C3bBbP, a stable compound which can bind an additional C3b to form alternative pathway C5-convertase. 
The C5-convertase of the alternative pathway consists of (C3b)2BbP (sometimes referred to as C3b2Bb). After the creation of C5 convertase (either as (C3b)2BbP or C4b2a3b from the classical pathway), the complement system follows the same path regardless of the means of activation (alternative, classical, or lectin).  C5-convertase cleaves C5 into C5a and C5b.  C5b binds sequentially to C6, C7, C8 and then to multiple molecules of C9 to form membrane attack complex. 
Since C3b is free and abundant in the plasma, it can bind to either a host cell or a pathogen surface.  To prevent complement activation from proceeding on the host cell, there are several different kinds of regulatory proteins that disrupt the complement activation process: 
Dysregulation of the complement system has been implicated in several diseases and pathologies, including Atypical hemolytic uremic syndrome in which kidney function is compromised. Age related macular degeneration (AMD) is now believed to be caused, at least in part, by complement overactivation in retinal tissues.  Alternative pathway activation also plays a significant role in complement-mediated renal disorders such as atypical haemolytic uraemic syndrome and C3 glomerulopathy. 
Etha Izora Dawley was born in Minnesota in 1873, the daughter of LaFayette David Dawley (1848-1936) and Lois Harriet Mathewson (1852-1918).  
Etha Izora Dawley taught in elementary schools before her marriage; since 1923 she took up adult education in Americanization Department of Los Angeles City schools.   
She was very active in club work; she was president of South Side Ebell; treasurer and auditor of the Los Angeles District Board.   
Etha Izora Dawley Holden moved to California in 1908 and lived at 2802 S. Western Ave., Los Angeles, California.  
O'Carroll has been a cast member of Mrs. Brown's Boys portraying Maria Brown since its incarnation. She reprised her role in the 2014 film, Mrs. Brown's Boys D'Movie and the 2017 chat show All Round to Mrs. Brown's. 
O'Carroll married her Mrs. Brown's Boys co-star, Martin Delany, on 18 May 2006. They have four sons together; Felix, Isaac, Eli and Dexter. Her aunt Fiona O'Carroll, sister of Brendan O'Carroll, died in 2020. 
In August 2017, O'Carroll completed a 260-mile walk from Cork to Belfast in aid of Billy's World, a charity for children with special needs. 
Bahalgachhia is a village in Patuakhali District in the Barisal Division of southern-central Bangladesh. 
Steve Pleau (born February 11, 1973) is an American ice hockey coach. He is currently employed by the Calgary Flames of the National Hockey League (NHL) as a professional scout. 
This biographical article relating to an American ice hockey player is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 1984 Railway Cup Hurling Championship was the 58th staging of the Railway Cup since its establishment by the Gaelic Athletic Association in 1927. The cup began on 17 March 1984 and ended on 18 March 1984. 
On 18 March 1984, Munster won the cup after a 1-18 to 2-09 defeat of Leinster in the final at Cusack Park. This was their 36th Railway Cup title overall and their first title since 1981. 
Bill Anderson Sings is a studio album by American country singer-songwriter Bill Anderson. It was released in February 1964 on Decca Records and was produced by Owen Bradley. The album was Anderson's second studio release as a recording artist and included two singles that became major hits on the Billboard country chart. The album itself would also reach positions on the Billboard charts following its release. 
Macrozamia occidua is a species of plant in the family Zamiaceae. It is endemic to Australia.  Its natural habitat is subtropical or tropical dry forests. 
The lake was used by the Imperial Japanese Navy Air Service units at Misawa Airfield to practice for the attack on Pearl Harbor during World War II due to its similarity in depth to Pearl Harbor in Hawaii. 
The Japanese government initiated a project beginning in the 1970s to convert the lake from brackish to fresh water to serve as a source of drinking, industrial and irrigation water despite the adverse environmental impact. 
On February 20, 2018, an F-16 of the US Air Force based at the nearby Misawa Air Base jettisoned two external fuel tanks into the lake after experiencing an engine fire. Tests conducted in March 2018 found no residual fuel in the lake following a cleanup effort by the Japan Maritime Self-Defense Force. Fishermen were given 85,000,000 yen (about $800,000) in a joint payment from the US and Japanese governments for loses incurred while the lake was closed to fishing during the cleanup efforts. 
Lake Ogawara is an abundant habitat for fish and birds, and is recognized as such by the Japanese Ministry of the Environment. A variety of marimo occurs naturally in the lake. 
In 1996 the sound of wild birds on the shores of Lake Ogawara was selected by the Ministry of the Environment as one of the 100 Soundscapes of Japan. 
In 2002, the Ministry of the Environment classified Lake Ogawara to be one of the 500 Important Wetlands in Japan, particularly for its biodiversity of aquatic flora, insects, and freshwater shellfish.  The lake also serves as a habitat for migratory wildfowl. 
The lake was previously home to the critically endangered Hucho perryi, which was last spotted in 1943. Migratory birds include the whooper swan and tundra swan, among others. 
Daedalus Entertainment was a Canadian game company that produced role-playing games and game supplements. 
Nakamura participated in the Japanese invasion of French Indochina in 1940 at the head of the 5th Division. 
On January 4, 1943, he received the post of General Officer in Thailand, first called the Siam Garrison Command, then the Japanese Thirty-ninth Army, and finally on July 7, 1945 the 18th Area Army. At the end of the war, he surrendered his troops to the allies and took his retirement in 1946. 
Sebastian County is a county located in the U.S. state of Arkansas. As of the 2010 census, the population was 125,744, making it the fourth-most populous county in Arkansas. The county has two county seats, Greenwood and Fort Smith. 
Sebastian County is Arkansas's 56th county, formed on January 6, 1851, and named for William K. Sebastian, United States Senator from Arkansas. 
In 2000 there were 45,300 households, out of which 32.80% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 52.40% were married couples living together, 11.30% had a female householder with no husband present, and 32.20% were non-families. 27.50% of all households were made up of individuals, and 10.00% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older.  The average household size was 2.49 and the average family size was 3.04. 
In the county, the population was spread out, with 26.00% under the age of 18, 9.20% from 18 to 24, 29.50% from 25 to 44, 22.30% from 45 to 64, and 13.00% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 36 years. For every 100 females, there were 95.30 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 92.10 males. 
The median income for a household in the county was $33,889, and the median income for a family was $41,303. Males had a median income of $30,056 versus $22,191 for females. The per capita income for the county was $18,424.  About 10.40% of families and 13.60% of the population were below the poverty line, including 18.60% of those under age 18 and 10.00% of those age 65 or over. 
As of 2010 census the population of Sebastian County was 125,744.  The racial makeup of the county was 72.83% Non-Hispanic white, 6.24% Non-Hispanic black, 1.88% Native American, 4.06% Asian, 0.09% Pacific Islander, 0.07% Non-Hispanics of some other race, 2.78% Non-Hispanics reporting two or more races and 12.82% Hispanics. 
Whereas most of Arkansas was overwhelmingly blue up to the mid-2000s, Sebastian has been a solidly Republican county at the presidential level since Dwight Eisenhower won it in 1952. Since that election, no Democrat has ever again carried this county, though native son Bill Clinton came within less than 1,000 votes of doing so during both of his campaigns. However, Democrats continued to split most local offices and state legislative seats with Republicans well into the 1990s. 
During the  Second World War, the British Special Operations Executive supplied the Haganah with weapons, training and funding, and the Haganah provided linguistic experts and operatives. The British provided commando training for special operations to both Shai operatives and FOSH veterans through a training school designated ME 102, which was set up by MI4. 
David Shaltiel was appointed head of Shai in April 1946; he was succeeded by Isser Be'eri in February 1948. 
By 1948, Shai had 68 staff members, 60 British and Jewish agents, and 80 Arab agents, and spent almost $700,000 per year. It was responsible for protecting Ta'as, the clandestine munitions industry and Rekhesh, the arms procurement organisation. 
Famous Shai operatives included Reuven Shiloah and Nahum Admoni. Shai was one of five intelligence agencies set up by David Ben-Gurion, the others being the internal security agency Shin Bet, the Aliyah Bet, responsible for smuggling immigrants, and the police intelligence forces. 
At least two important but differing definitions of "the Pilbara" region exist. Administratively it is one of the nine regions of Western Australia defined by the Regional Development Commissions Act 1993; the term also refers to the Pilbara shrublands bioregion (which differs in extent) under the Interim Biogeographic Regionalisation for Australia (IBRA). 
The area is known for its petroleum, natural gas and iron ore deposits, which contribute significantly to Australia's economy. Other than mining, pastoral activities as well as fishing and tourism are the main industries. 
The Pilbara Aboriginal Language Centre Wangka Maya says that the name for the Pilbara region derives from the Aboriginal word bilybara, meaning "dry" in the Nyamal and Banyjima languages. 
Alternatively, the Western Australia Gas Industry claims that the region takes its name from pilbarra, an Aboriginal word for the mullet that is available in local waters. The Pilbara Creek (originally spelt "Pilbarra") is a tributary of the Yule River, a significant river in the region. Sea mullet and barramundi can still be caught in the Yule River today. Pilbara Goldfield, discovered in 1885, was named after the creek, and the name later became associated with the region. 
In the 1950s, three British nuclear weapons tests were carried out in the Montebello Islands, 130 km (81 mi) off the Pilbara coast. 
In 2006, it was estimated that 15% of the population of the Pilbara identify as Aboriginal and/or Torres Strait Islander people, approximately 6,000 people. 
Many Pilbara communities face the many complex effects of colonisation, and lack adequate access to housing, health and education. A 1971 survey of 1,000 Aboriginal people conducted by Pat McPherson found that most had one or more serious diseases. At the McClelland Royal Commission into British nuclear testing, Aboriginals from the Pilbara provided evidence regarding the explosion on the Montebello Islands. 
Aboriginal communities are sited over a number of different places. Many have poor infrastructure, and relations between police and Aboriginal people are often tense. 
Under the Regional Development Commissions Act Pilbara is situated south of the Kimberley, and is made up of the local government areas of Shire of Ashburton, Shire of East Pilbara, City of Karratha and Town of Port Hedland. 
The Pilbara town of Marble Bar set a world record of most consecutive days of maximum temperatures of 100 degrees Fahrenheit (37.8 degrees Celsius) or more, during a period of 160 such days from 31 October 1923 to 7 April 1924. 
Iron ore deposits were first discovered by prospector Stan Hilditch, who in 1957 found a large iron ore deposit in the southern Ophthalmia Range, at what was to become the Mount Whaleback mine. 
A significant part of Pilbara's economy is based on liquified natural gas (LNG) through the North West Shelf Venture and Pluto LNG plant, both operated by Woodside. 
The region also has a number of cattle-grazing stations, and a substantial tourist sector, with popular natural attractions including the Karijini and Millstream-Chichester national parks and the Dampier Archipelago. 
The first railway in the Pilbara region was the narrow-gauge Marble Bar Railway between Port Hedland and Marble Bar. The Marble Bar Railway opened in July 1911 and closed in October 1951. The Roebourne-Cossack Tramway opened in 1897 and many industrial railways have been built to serve the mines. 
The dominant flora of the Pilbara is acacia trees and shrubs and drought-resistant Triodia spinifex grasses. Several species of acacia (wattle) trees are endemic to the Pilbara and are the focus of conservation programs, along with wildflowers and other local specialities.[citation needed] 
Wildlife has been damaged by the extraction of iron, natural gas and asbestos, but the protection of culturally and environmentally sensitive areas of the Pilbara is now enhanced by the delineation of several protected areas, including the Millstream-Chichester and the Karijini National Parks.[citation needed] 
The western Pilbara is part of the Pilbara freshwater ecoregion, also known as the Pilbara-Gascoyne or Indian Ocean drainage basin. The freshwater region is characterized by intermittent rivers which form deep gorges, and brackish-water caves that host endemic species. The region includes the drainages of the Murchison, Gascoyne, Ashburton, Fortescue, and De Grey rivers. The Great Sandy Desert, which covers the eastern Pilbara, has little freshwater habitat. 
Mwe Pon Kan is a village and small island in Madaya Township of Myanmar. It is located in the Pyin Oo Lwin District of the Mandalay Division, in central Myanmar. It lies just outside the north  of Mandalay city and beside the Ayeyarwady river. 
Dening was a career foreign service officer; and he was promoted regularly across the span of years. 
During the First World War Dening served with the Australian Imperial Force (service record). While serving with 31 Battalion AIF he was wounded in the Attack at Fromelles on 19 July 1916 and evacuated to England with shell shock. He later rejoined the 2nd Division as intelligence officer and was awarded an MBE in 1919. 
In 1950, Dening was an Assistant Under-Secretary of State in the Foreign Office when the King promoted him to be a Knight Commander of the Order of St Michael and St George.  He was the British Political Representative in Tokyo in 1950-1951 and when full diplomatic relations were re-established, his role was an essential element of the transition. 
Sir Esler appointed to be Her Majesty's Ambassador Extraordinary and Plenipotentiary at Tokyo on 6 May 1952. He was the Ambassador from 1952 through 1957. 
In 1955, Sir Esler promoted to be a Member of the First Class, or Knight Grand Cross, of the Order of St Michael and St George. 
In a statistical overview derived from writings by and about Maberley Esler Dening, OCLC/WorldCat encompasses roughly 7 works in 19 publications in 2 languages and 800+ library holdings . 
Paralaoma servilis is a species of very small air-breathing land snail, a terrestrial pulmonate gastropod mollusk or micromollusk in the family Punctidae, the dot snails. 
The native range for this species is thought to be New Zealand. However, the species is known to occur worldwide in numerous countries and islands outside of its native range, including: 
2. Van den Neucker T. & Ronsmans J. (2015). The globally invasive Paralaoma servilis (Gastropoda: Punctidae) reported for the first time in Belgium. Journal of Conchology 42(1):95-96. PDF 
Bleeding Star is the final studio album by New Zealand band Jean-Paul Sartre Experience. It was released in 1993 via Matador Records and is credited to JPS Experience. 
Trouser Press called Bleeding Star "an immaculate big-budget production [that] ... unveils a new commercial face for the band." The Washington Post wrote that the album "is unfailingly pretty, but the lovestruck ethereality of songs like 'Breathe' is a little too wistful for its own good." Miami New Times praised "Into You," writing that it "kicks in with the powerful, hypnotic, ambient guitar sounds the band's known for, with great pop melodies skipping across the top." 
Support races included the prestigious FIA GT1 World Championship as well as the FIA GT3 European Championship and GT4 European Cup. 
"The Renegade" is one of the most obscure and confusing of the short stories published in Exile and the Kingdom. It is presumed to be an allegory. The story begins with the narrator, who we are told has somehow lost his tongue, waiting in the desert with a rifle. Much of what the narrator says at the beginning of the story is not explained until much later. 
Some time later the narrator learns that another missionary is to be sent to look after the children in Taghaza but that a garrison of twenty French soldiers is to be maintained to ensure the missionary's safety (possibly a result of the narrator's disappearance). Upon learning this, he decides to escape the day before the missionary is due to arrive, steal a rifle and kill him. 
In killing the missionary, the narrator intends to instigate a conflict between the French and the Tribe. Although it seems this is not to effect revenge on his captors but to give the tribe a chance to conquer and spread throughout Europe. 
Eventually the missionary and his guide appear on the horizon and the narrator fires on them. Wounding his target, the narrator closes in and beats the missionary to death. The narrator comments on how good it feels to strike the face of goodness with his rifle butt. As soon as the new missionary is dead the tribesmen come for the narrator; alerted by his gunfire. 
The style Camus employs in "The Renegade" is representative of the fictional narrator and can sometimes be difficult to decipher. The story is written in the first person perspective and just like the narrator, the language is muddled, disjointed and disorganized; leaving the reader to piece together the facts from the hysterical and neurotic monologue. 
There is also the Absurd juxtaposition between the perceived right of religion and the violent and harmful means which the tribe and the narrator use to achieve it. Present also, is the Absurd notion that virtue creates sin. In the house of the Fetish, the Tribe presents the woman to the narrator, the woman submits to him and the tribe do not attempt to stop him but after the narrator has acted on his urges he is immediately and severely punished. 
At the end, when the narrator compares himself to Jesus on the cross, there is also the parallel that the narrator's actions will be the cause of further bloodshed. 
This is a list of architectural historians. The names are grouped by order of the historical period in which they were writing, which is not necessarily the same as the period in which they specialize. 
In finite geometry, PG(3,2) is the smallest three-dimensional projective space. It can be thought of as an extension of the Fano plane. It has 15 points, 35 lines, and 15 planes.  It also has the following properties: 
Take a complete graph K6. It has 15 edges, 15 perfect matchings and 20 triangles. Create a point for each of the 15 edges, and a line for each of the 20 triangles and 15 matchings. The incidence structure between each triangle or matching (line) to its three constituent edges (points), induces a PG(3,2). (Sylvester's work on duads and synthemes, 1859) 
Take a Fano plane and apply all 5040 permutations of its 7 points. Discard duplicate planes to obtain a set of 30 distinct Fano planes. Pick any of the 30, and pick the 14 others that have exactly one line in common with the first, not 0 or 3. The incidence structure between the 1+14 = 15 Fano planes and the 35 triplets they mutually cover induces a PG(3,2). 
The Doily diagram often used to represent the generalized quadrangle GQ(2,2) is also used to represent PG(3,2). This was described by Richard Doily.  
It is known that a PG(n,2) can be coordinatized with (GF(2))n + 1, i.e. a bit string of length n + 1. PG(3,2) can therefore be coordinatized with 4-bit strings. 
This song received favorable reviews. After being announced as the third single, a music video was also announced; however, this never materialized and instead the song was featured in a film directed by Warren Miller. 
The song was originally recorded in a room that the band nicknamed "The War Room." Bell states that "The Greatest Man That Ever Lived" took a long time to record; "I think the song 'The Greatest Man That Ever Lived' used about 20 feet of butcher paper and we discussed how we were going to successfully record it almost as long as actually recording it." 
Professional wrestler Austin Aries adopted the song as his ring entrance music, while also beginning to refer to himself as "The Greatest Man That Ever Lived". The song was released as a downloadable song for the game Rock Band on June 26, 2008, along with "Dreamin'" and "Troublemaker". 
The bombing of the Elisenvaara station of the Karelian railroad on 20 June 1944, during the final stages of the Continuation War, was the most fatal bombing in Finnish history; over one hundred civilians were killed when bombs hit a train of Karelian evacuees. 
In Russia the railroad is used to ship petroleum to the ports of the Gulf of Finland as well as lumber and iron ore pellets from Karelia. 
Many of his songs are acoustic rock, andalusian chords, soul music and oud type songs, blended with Israeli folk, Judeo-Yemenite and Pop overtones.  He has included the recitation of poems by Shalom Shabazi in his albums. 
Boaz Sharabi was born in Tel Aviv during the Mandate era, one of ten children born to a Yemenite Jewish family of artists. He had a twin sister, Ada, who was recorded as having died at birth, but Sharabi believes she was kidnapped as part of the Yemenite Children Affair. His brother Yoel Sharabi is a Hasidic and Yemenite entertainer for Jewish communities abroad.  Baruch Sharabi is a choreographer and Zion Sharabi is a songwriter. 
Sharabi composed the music for and appeared onscreen in the movies Beyond the Walls and Beyond the Walls 2. He held a close working relationship with lyricist and poet Ehud Manor and composer Matti Caspi. In the 1980s, he sang a duet with Shoshana Damari. 
Sharabi sold over two million records and had over 30 number one hits in the charts. His music was also popular in Lebanon and Turkey. 
After a long hiatus, Sharabi released a new album, Linshom (To Breathe), in 2007. The song Im at Adayin Ohevet Oti (If you still love me) was named song of the year for 2007 by the Israeli Public, via Galgalatz and Yediot Achronot 
Sharabi lives in Caesarea, and has been married three times. In the 1970s, he married Liora. After their divorce, he married Helen, a drug addict who committed suicide in 1991. In 2002, he married Pnina Tzadok, who was three decades his junior, and they had a son who was born in December 2004. They divorced in 2006. 
Vibrio tubiashii was originally isolated from juvenile and larval bivalve mollusks suffering from bacillary necrosis, now called vibriosis. It was originally discovered by Tubiash et al in 1965, hence the name, but not properly described until Hada et al in 1984. Since  its  discovery  and  identification,  V.  tubiashii  has  been implicated in shellfish vibriosis across the globe, and more recently, coral diseases.[citation needed] 
The hemolytic activity of V. tubiashii cultures increases during early growth stages and progressively decreases throughout the stationary phase, while proteolytic activity shows a gradual increase starting in the early stationary phase, suggesting that pathogenesis in this organism requires higher cell density. 
Urbas is a surname of primarily Eastern European extraction. The Polish-language form is derived from the diminutive of the given name Urban. Notable people with this surname include: 
On 3 May 2021 Islamic militants attacked Kodyel, a village in Foutouri, Burkina Faso. The attack left at least 30 people dead and another 20 injured. 
Tom Swift and His Submarine Boat, or, Under the Ocean for Sunken Treasure, is Volume 4 in the original Tom Swift novel series published by Grosset & Dunlap. 
Tom Swift's father has been working diligently on a secret project, which he reveals at the beginning of the book as a submarine. With the submarine, named the Advance, he plans to enter a contest for a government prize of $50,000. While in New Jersey to launch the submarine, Tom reads in a newspaper that a ship named the Boldero sank off the coast of Uruguay during a storm, taking down with it the sum of $300,000 in gold bullion. 
Tom persuades his father to pursue this treasure as opposed to competing for the government prize. While picking up a hired sea captain, Tom's plans are overheard by a contestant in the government contest, and a rivalry for the treasure begins. The other submarine, named the Wonder, soon sets off to follow Tom and his crew after they embark on their journey. 
Tom's crew consists of Tom Swift, his father, Mr. Sharp, Captain West, and Mr. Damon. Each of these take chores on board, including Mr. Damon, who seems to be the cook of the voyage. 
The submarines hold up at an island to resupply, and during the night, the Advance tries to slip away from the Wonder. Tom knows that the Wonder and its crew is not certain of the location of the wreck, and is merely following the Advance, hoping to steal the treasure at the last moment. 
After the Wonder tries to ram the Advance, Tom and his father take to the heavy underwater cannons, and successfully disable the Wonder, leaving her damaged and immobile. Tom and the Advance seize the opportunity to push ahead. 
Gold was found in a secret compartment behind the Captain's safe, and recovered from the Boldero just in time to escape from the now-arriving Wonder. With the $300,000 in gold as a deposit at Tom's local bank in Shopton, the bank considers Tom one of their biggest investors, and with this new power, Tom manages to bring his chum, Ned Newton, a promotion. 
Tom Swift Intrepid inventor & mechanic. Plucky, lively, resourceful, brave and clever. Home-schooled at a college level by his father, Barton Swift. Athlete and hunter. Familiar with how to stalk game and firearms.  Loves all things mechanical. Is a decent cook, too. 
Barton Swift Widower. Wealthy and conservative. Not flashy or pretentious. Inventor master machinist and holder of numerous patents.  In this episode, described as "aged", "nervous", "distracted" and "feeble." 
Mrs. Baggert Housekeeper. Kindly, and "loves Tom like a son." Employed by the Swift family since the time Tom's mother died. She is short of stature and has to stand on a soap box to kiss Tom goodbye on one of his voyages. 
John Sharp Professional balloonist and trapeze artist. Rescued by Tom when his hot-air balloon gets a bit too hot and burns. Deputy Sheriff as a sideline. Co-designer with Tom, of the Airship, Red Cloud. Tall, thin and 'dark' of complexion, he seems to now have given up speaking in short, choppy sentences, as in the 1st three books. "In residence" with the Swift family, has become sort of hands and feet for Tom's father. 
Addison Berg Representative of Bentley & Eagert (B&E), a Philadelphia submarine builder. Industrial spy and all-around bad guy. Hires Andy Foger to cause trouble for Tom. 
Garrett Jackson Aged (65+ years old) "engineer" who is more handyman/machinist and watchman type. Resides on Swift estate. 
Andy Foger Red haired, squinty-eyed bully, who makes great trouble for Tom. "Poor little rich kid", son of wealthy family, born with a chip on his shoulder. Reckless, blustery and angry. Showoff. "Has money, and not much else." Lately has upped ante to attempted murder when he traps Tom in an airtight compartment and leaves him to smother. 
Eradicate Andrew Jackson Abraham Lincoln Sampson, A.K.A. Rad-Aged Stereotypical Negro journeyman jack-of-all-trades. "Eradicates dirt." Gives the appearance of being lazy, but is actually a hard worker and entrepreneur/wheeler-dealer. Heavy deep-south accent and Uncle Remus attitude. Caretaker of mule Boomerang. In this tome, is limited to acting as estate watchman while the Swifts are voyaging. 
Sam Snedecker Cohort of Andy Foger. Voice of reason to Andy's scream of rage. No description given. Could be an OK guy if he were to stop associating with Andy Foger. 
Ned Newton Chum & companion of Tom, currently employed in Shopton National Bank. Ned has only a passing role in this tome. 
Mr. Wakefield Damon Elderly & eccentric adventurer whose main purpose in life seems to be blessing everybody and everything near his person. In this episode, he is "fond of good living." He had graduated from cycles to automobiles. In spite of ongoing trouble mastering most any conveyance he tries to control, has successfully piloted an airship. 
Unnamed Hotel Clerk Walk-on part. Single characteristic noted was a pinkie ring "with a large diamond." Hotels must pay well on the Jersey shore... 
Captain Alden Weston Soft-spoken and mild mannered sea captain hired by Swifts to navigate their sub to the South Atlantic. World traveler and soldier of fortune. Described as smooth of face and with merry blue eyes. Main characteristic is diffident, self-effacing language. Ends nearly every sentence with "if you don't mind" or "if I may say so" or variations of same. 
Admiral Fanchetti Commander of Brazilian cruiser San Paulo. Much absorbed with gold braid and bluster. Also able to leap to false conclusions with a single bound. Adept at passing out death sentences. 
Lieutenant Drascalo Fanchetti's hatchet-man, possibly XO. A one trick pony in that his dialogue is pretty much limited to shouting "Silenceo!" at every opportunity. Even the author makes note of this annoying trait... 
Gio Batta Gori is an epidemiologist and fellow with the Health Policy Center in Bethesda, Maryland which he established in 1997 and where he specializes in risk assessment and scientific research. He was deputy director of the United States' National Cancer Institute's Division of Cancer Cause and Prevention, where he directed the Smoking and Health Program and the Diet and Cancer Program. 
He organized and directed the Franklin Institute Policy Analysis Center, funded by Brown & Williamson. He is the editor-in-chief of the journal Regulatory Toxicology and Pharmacology. 
He has consulted for the tobacco industry, challenging specific scientific claims concerning the risks associated with tobacco use. He is also known for advocating the regulation and taxation of cigarettes and other tobacco products based on their specific delivery of carcinogens and other hazardous substances, so as to promote risk reduction. 
David Cantor writes that Gori has been criticised for his career as a consultant for the tobacco industry and that critics of Gori have questioned his scientific and management credentials. Other academics who have criticised Gori include Richard Kluger and Devra Davis. 
There is a ski resort at the Hohenwart, with a number of lifts. Along the road, there are many hotels and rental chalets. 
The village is administrated by a Sarpanch who is an elected representative of village as per constitution of India and Panchayati raj (India). 
He married Frieda Nachtigall Valderrama in 1960, and with her had their children Frida, Ursula, Manuel, Claudia, Hugo and Natalia Delgado Nachtigall. 
He joined Radio Panamericana in the fifties, as part of the administration of that radio station founded by his father at the beginning of the fifties. 
Then he founded Radio Programas del Peru, a nation-wide radio station dedicated to the national transmission of radio-drama programs, services, and counseling. 
Manuel returned from the US in 1979 and assumed leadership of RPP.  As such he would initiate the Information Center, space which would serve to reach more people through the wide dissemination of news; this program still characterizes this radio station today. 
The 1960 Illinois gubernatorial election was held in Illinois on November 8, 1960. Incumbent Governor William Stratton, a Republican seeking a third term, lost reelection to Democrat Otto Kerner Jr. 
The primaries and general election both coincided with those for federal offices (United States President, House, and United States Senate) and those for other state offices. The election was part of the 1960 Illinois elections. 
Heading into this election, Stratton was seen as vulnerable to being unseated if the Democrats ran a strong candidate, as he had only narrowly won reelection in 1956 (despite a strong overall performance by the Republican party in the state that year), and since the Democratic Party had nationally had a strong performance in the 1958 elections. 
Names floated as potential Democratic contenders included Chicago mayor Richard J. Daley. Daley opted not to run. Daley, the head of the Cook County Democratic Party and a political boss, helped slate Otto Kerner for the nomination. Kerner won the Democratic primary. 
SC Wacker Leipzig was a German association football club playing in Leipzig, Saxony. The club was formed 24 February 1895 out of the merger of the school clubs Concordia Leipzig and Saxonia Leipzig. Wacker was a founding member of the German Football Association (Deutscher Fussball Bund) in 1900. 
FC changed its name to SC Wacker Leipzig in 1918 and in 1921 was joined by Friesen Leipzig. One of the city's best sides, Wacker  remained in top-flight football from its foundation through to 1937. After the re-organization of German football into sixteen premier divisions under the Third Reich in 1933 Wacker played top-flight football in the Gauliga Sachsen for several seasons before being relegated in 1937. The club returned to Gauliga play for single season appearances in 1940 and 1944. 
In July 2008, he signed a one-year deal with Greek team Kolossos Rodou. After good season with them he extended his contract for one more season. 
In July 2010, he signed a one-year deal with Donetsk. In June 2011, he signed with Khimik Yuzhny. He left them in December 2011. Later that month he signed with Ikaros Kallitheas till the end of the season. 
This biographical article relating to a Bosnia and Herzegovina basketball figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
According to the Roman historian Procopius of Caesarea, in 551 emperor Justinian I built a temple in these environs, this is believed by some to have been what is now the cathedral in Dranda. In the Georgian Orthodox Catholicate of Abkhazia, Dranda was the seat of a bishop. 
There has been some restoration on the exterior walls of the structure and roof, covering with stucco much of the original brick architecture that was once visible. Small portions may still be seen in what was intentionally left untouched. 
This article on an Eastern Orthodox church building in Georgia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Stephen McCarter (born February 16, 1947) is a retired American politician and schoolteacher. He was a Democratic member of the Pennsylvania House of Representatives, representing the 154th legislative district from 2012 until 2020. The district is located in Montgomery and Philadelphia counties, including Cheltenham Township, Jenkintown, Springfield Township, and part of Philadelphia's 35th Ward. 
Prior to his election as a state representative, McCarter was a high school social studies teacher for 35 years in Abington and Lower Merion. He holds a Bachelor of Science degree in education from Temple University and a Masters of Science degree in education from the University of Pennsylvania. He also worked as an adjunct professor of education at the University of Pennsylvania, and was a Captain in the US Army Reserve. 
McCarter has served as the Chairman of the Cheltenham School District Local Tax Study Commission, and he was also a member of the Cheltenham Development Corporation, Cheltenham Historical Commission, and a board member and mideastern region president for the Pennsylvania State Education Association. McCarter and his wife Deborah currently reside in Glenside. They have lived in Cheltenham Township for 25 years, including nearby Elkins Park and Jenkintown. 
Following an announcement by incumbent State Representative Lawrence Curry that he would not be seeking re-election in 2012, McCarter announced his candidacy for the 154th District's house seat. He ran unopposed in the primary election and went on to defeat Republican Mark Sirinides with 72.62 percent of the vote. McCarter won every precinct in the legislative district. 
McCarter serves on the Aging & Older Adult Services, Children & Youth, Environmental Resources & Energy, and Policy committees. 
As a state representative, McCarter has called for increased state funding for infrastructure and education, and supported an extraction tax on natural gas drillers. Following the Supreme Court's decision on the Defense of Marriage Act, McCarter announced that he and State Representative Brian Sims would  introduce a bill to legalize same-sex marriage in Pennsylvania. 
This article about a building or structure in Uganda is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He traveled through the Netherlands, and then visited Parma. He painted historical scenes, portraits, and landscapes. In 1779 he was engaged in scene painting at Dessau. 
Buntingford Rural District  was a rural district in Hertfordshire, England from 1894 to 1935, covering the town of Buntingford and a number of surrounding parishes in the north-east of the county. 
The council met and had its offices at the Buntingford Union Workhouse, later known as Bridgefoot House. 
Edward H. Sargent FRSC is a Canadian scientist, who serves as University Professor of Electrical & Computer Engineering and Vice-President of Research and Innovation, and Strategic Initiatives at the University of Toronto. He also is the Canada Research Chair in Nanotechnology. He will join the Departments of Chemistry and of Electrical and Computer Engineering at Northwestern University, and will be affiliated with the International Institute for Nanotechnology at Northwestern. 
Sargent has made contributions in the use of colloidal quantum dots and perovskite materials for optoelectronic devices, including photovoltaic cells, photodetectors, and light emitting materials. Sargent has also published in the area of electrochemical reduction of carbon dioxide. 
Sargent has been honored with multiple awards for his research, including a Killam Prize for Engineering in 2020, the NSERC Brockhouse Award in Interdisciplinary Research and Engineering with Shana Kelley in 2016, and the Steacie Prize in 2012. He is a fellow of the Canadian Academy of Engineering, Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers and the American Association for the Advancement of Science. 
Sargent spent several summers in the early 1990s working on quantum well lasers at Nortel. He studied Engineering Physics at Queen's University at Kingston, earning his B.Sc.Eng. in 1995. Sargent then conducted graduate studies in Electrical and Computer Engineering, in the area of Photonics, at the University of Toronto, with Prof. Jingming Xu. He graduated with his Ph.D. in 1998. 
Sargent began his independent research career at the University of Toronto as an assistant professor in the Department of Electrical and Computer Engineering in 1998. He was promoted to Associate Professor in 2002, and full Professor in 2005. In 2015, Sargent was appointed as University Professor, the University of Toronto's most distinguished rank. 
Sargent has held several visiting professorships. From 2004 to 2005, he was a Nanotechnology and Photonics Visiting Professor at the MIT Microphotonics Center. In 2013 he was a Fulbright Visiting Professor at UCLA. In fall of 2017, he was a Somorjai Visiting Miller Professor at UC Berkeley, and in April 2018 he was a Distinguished Visiting Professor at the Rowland Institute at Harvard University. 
In 2005, he published for the general public about nanotechnology and its applications in everyday life, The Dance of Molecules: How Nanotechnology is Changing Our Lives. 
Sargent has also co-founded several university spin-off companies. In 2006, he founded InVisage Technologies, which was acquired by Apple in 2017. With Prof. Shana Kelley, Sargent co-founded Xagenic in 2010, a molecular diagnostics company. Xagenic was partially acquired in 2018 by the General Atomics - Electromagnetic Systems Group (GA-EMS). With Dr. Sjoerd Hoogland, Sargent also co-founded QD Solar in 2014, which aims to develop tandem solar cells using perovskites and quantum-dots. 
Sargent has been honored with multiple awards and learned society memberships for his research, including: 
Sargent is married to fellow University of Toronto Professor Shana Kelley. They met at a nanotechnology conference at UC Irvine, and have two children together. 
The song is a melancholy ballad about a finished relationship. San Basilio sings that "the party's over" and asks her former lover not to insist anymore: "What good is loving without love? Why put more wood on a fire that's already burnt out...?". 
"Midnight's Another Day" is a song written by Brian Wilson and Scott Bennett and is the 14th track of Wilson's 2008 album That Lucky Old Sun. An early version of the song was first released through Wilson's website in August 2007 before it was performed live a month later. Bennett considered the song to be "the most important song on the record" as it is about the time "when [Wilson] just dropped off the planet." Wilson stated that the song "describes how I feel around people... shy". 
"Midnight's Another Day" received critical acclaim from critics, who praised its melody and introspective balladry, with some considering it the best track on That Lucky Old Sun. 
It is known locally as the location of the open air music festival Bilbao BBK Live, that takes place during the first weekend of July. 
This article about a location in the Basque Country, Spain, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Gorge Trio is an American experimental rock band based in Oakland, California. It is composed of three-fourths of the critically acclaimed math rock band Colossamite, which disbanded in 1998, and is survived by three releases on Skin Graft Records.  
Gorge Trio includes current members of Deerhoof, The Flying Luttenbachers, Natural Dreamers, and former members of underground pioneers Iceburn and Sicbay. 
Sonochromatism or sonochromatopsia (Latin: sono-, (sound) + Greek: chromat- (colour) + Greek: -opsia (seeing)) is a neurological phenomenon in which colours are perceived as sounds. The phenomenon is created by the union between a brain and a colour-to-sound software or chip. People who report such experiences are known as sonochromats. The term was coined by Neil Harbisson to differentiate his experience of colour from people with chromesthesia or colour-to-sound synesthesia. 
Implantable colour-to-sound chips, software, mobile apps and cyborg antennas use Harbisson's Sonochromatic Scales as a standard transposition of colour frequencies to sound frequencies. 
The Sonochromatic Music Scale is a microtonal and logarithmic scale with 360 notes in an octave. Each note corresponds to a specific degree of the color wheel. 
Harbisson's Pure Sonochromatic Scale is a non-logarithmic scale based on the transposition of light frequencies to sound frequencies. The scale includes infrareds and ultraviolets, discards colour as being part of a colour wheel and ignores musical/logarithmic perception so it can overstep the limits of human perception. 
Homer M. "Buddy" DeLoach (born February 27, 1942) is an American politician. He was a member of the Georgia House of Representatives from 1995 to 2005. He is a member of the Republican Party. 
This article about a politician from the U.S. state of Georgia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Forever So is the official debut studio album by Australian indie folk band Husky, released in 2012 on Sub Pop Records and mixed by Noah Georgeson. It includes the song "History's Door" that won the triple j Unearthed contest. 
At the ARIA Music Awards of 2012, the album was nominated for ARIA Award for Best Adult Contemporary Album. 
The 12339 / 12340 Coalfield Express is a Superfast class Indian Railways day train connecting Kolkata with industrial towns and coal belts of Durgapur, Raniganj, Asansol, Dhanbad as well as between Dhanbad and Howrah railway station. 
In 2011, the train travelled several kilometres on the wrong track during a journey. The train took the wrong track at Khana Junction and travelled towards Bolpur instead of Dhanbad. It was sent back on the right track after the staff at the Talit railway station spotted the error. 
In 1982 the train had a scheduled stop at Burdwan junction. However, due to overbearing notoriety of the daily commuters in the Burdwan-Howrah section, which often culminated in serious altercations with other passengers[citation needed], the stoppage had been revoked. An EMU (electric multiple unit) local train was put into the service to cater to the daily passengers travelling from Burdwan to Howrah at that particular hour of the day. The train had few stops in between the two stations. 
Since the introduction of the new LHB racks the instances of daily commuters disturbing other commuters have lessened as the sitting space has been increased and standing space decreased[citation needed]. 
In 1855 Oliver moved again to South Bend, Indiana where he entered into a partnership with two businessmen to operate a foundry. His investment gave him a 25% ownership of the foundry. The company was named the South Bend Iron Works, and Oliver oversaw its operations. The business made a fair income and in 1856 Harvey Little and Oliver bought out the other shares. 
This geographical article about a location in Adana Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
ThinkPad  is a line of business-oriented laptop computers and tablets designed, developed and marketed by Lenovo. It was initially sold by IBM until 2005. ThinkPads have a distinct black, boxy design language, inspired by a Japanese bento lunchbox, which originated in 1990 and is still used in some models. 
The ThinkPad line was first developed at the IBM Yamato Facility in Japan, and the first ThinkPads were released in October 1992. 
ThinkPads have seen significant success in the business market. ThinkPad laptops have been used in outer space and for many years were the only laptops certified for use on the International Space Station. 
For decades IBM had also distributed small notepads with the word "THINK" emblazoned on a brown leatherette cover to customers and employees. The name "ThinkPad" was suggested by IBM employee Denny Wainwright, who had one such notepad in his pocket. The name was opposed by the IBM corporate naming committee as all the names for IBM computers were numeric at that time, but "ThinkPad" was kept due to praise from journalists and the public. 
In April 1992, IBM announced the first ThinkPad model, the 700, later renamed the 700T after the release of three newer models, the 300, (new) 700 and 700C in October 1992. The 700T was a tablet computer. 
This machine was the first product produced under IBM's new "differentiated product personality" strategy, a collaboration between Sapper and Tom Hardy, head of the corporate IBM Design Program. Development of the 700C also involved a close working relationship between Sapper and Kazuhiko Yamazaki, lead notebook designer at IBM's Yamato Design Center in Japan and liaison between Sapper and Yamato engineering. 
The first ThinkPad tablet, a PenPoint-based device formally known as the IBM 2521 ThinkPad, was positioned as a developer's release. The ThinkPad tablet became available for purchase by the general public in October of the same year.[when?][citation needed] 
Although Lenovo acquired the right to use the IBM brand name for five years after its acquisition of IBM's personal computer business, Lenovo only used it for three years. Today Lenovo manufactures and markets Think-branded products while IBM is mostly responsible for overseeing servicing and repairs for the Think line of products produced by Lenovo. Both IBM and Lenovo play a key role in the design of their "Think" branded products. 
In 2012, Lenovo produced a short run of special edition anniversary ThinkPads in Yonezawa, Yamagata, in partnership with NEC, as part of a larger goal to move manufacturing from away from China and in to Japan. 
In 2014, although sales rose 5.6 percent from the previous year, Lenovo lost its position as the top commercial notebook maker. However, the company celebrated a milestone in 2015 with the shipment of the 100 millionth unit of its ThinkPad line. 
The design language of the ThinkPad has remained very similar throughout the entire lifetime of the brand. Almost all models are solid black inside and out, with a boxy, right-angled external case design. Some newer Lenovo models incorporate more curved surfaces in their design. Many ThinkPads have incorporated magnesium, carbon fiber reinforced plastic or titanium into their chassis. 
Since 1992, the ThinkPad design has been regularly updated, developed and refined over the years by Sapper and the respective teams at IBM and later Lenovo. On the occasion of the 20th anniversary of ThinkPad's introduction, David Hill authored and designed a commemorative book about ThinkPad design titled ThinkPad Design: Spirit & Essence. 
Several unique features have appeared in the ThinkPad line, like drive protection, pointing stick or TPM chips. 
While few features remain unique to the series, several laptop technologies originated on ThinkPads: 
Early known as "IBM Access", later "ThinkVantage", the Lenovo Vantage is a suite of computer management applications. This software can give additional support for system management (backup, encrypting, system drivers installation and upgrade, system monitoring and other). Currently some old features replaced by internal Windows 10 features. 
ThinkShutter is the branding of a webcam privacy shutter present in some ThinkPad notebook computers. It is a simple mechanical sliding cover that allows the user to obstruct the webcam's view.  Some add-on webcams and other laptop brands provide a similar feature. IdeaPad notebooks carry the TrueBlock branding for their privacy shutters. 
Some ThinkPad models have a keyboard membrane and drain holes (P series, classic T series and T###p models), and some have a solid rubber or plastic membrane (like X1 series and current T and X series), without draining holes. 
The first ThinkPad 700 was equipped with the signature TrackPoint red dot pointing stick invented by Ted Selker. By 2000 the TouchPad pointer had become more popular for laptops due to innovations by Synaptics so IBM introduced UltraNav as a complementary combination of TrackPoint and TouchPad designed by Dave Sawin, Hiroaki Yasuda, Fusanobo Nakamura, and Mitsuo Horiuchi to please all users. 
Option for some ThinkPad that still uses the 2.5" drive bay; These system uses an accelerometer sensor to detect when a ThinkPad is falling and shut down the hard disk drive to prevent damage. 
The fingerprint reader was introduced as an option by IBM in 2004.ThinkPads were one of the first laptops to include this feature 
The Mobile broadband support is a common feature for most of actual ThinkPad models after 2006; the support of 3x3 MIMO is a common feature for most of hi-end models. 
The some additional features (dock stations, UltraBay, accessories support) were listed in Accessories section. 
External keyboard light, replaced by internal backlight; is an LED light located at the top of the LCD screen which illuminates the keyboard from above. 
The introduced in 2004 line of hi-end displays with wide view angles and optional high resolution (up to 15" 1600x1200 or (rarely) 2048x1536 pixels). Partially dropped in 2008 (after partial defunct of BOE-Hydis display supplier), and reintroduced as ordinary IPS screen option in 2013. 
Some Lenovo laptops (such as the X230, W530 and T430) block third-party batteries. Lenovo calls this feature "Battery Safeguard". It was first introduced on some models in May 2012. Laptops with this feature scan for security chips that only ThinkPad-branded batteries contain. Affected Thinkpads flash a message stating "Genuine Lenovo Battery Not Attached" when third-party batteries are used. 
The ThinkPad has shipped with Microsoft Windows from its inception until present day. Alongside MS-DOS, Windows 3.1x was the default operating system on the original ThinkPad 700. 
IBM and Microsoft's joint operating system, known as OS/2, although not as popular, was also made available as an option from the ThinkPad 700 in 1992, and was officially supported until the T43 in 2005. 
The following year, ThinkPads began shipping with Linux again, when the R61 and T61 were released with SUSE Linux Enterprise as an option. This was shortlived, as Lenovo discontinued that practice in 2009. ThinkPad hardware continued to be certified for Linux. 
In 2020, Lenovo shifted into much heavier support of Linux when they announced the ThinkPad X1 Carbon Gen 8, the P1 Gen 2, and the P53 would come with Fedora Linux as an option. This was the first time that Fedora Linux was made available as a preinstalled option from a major hardware vendor. Following that, Lenovo then began making Ubuntu available as a preinstalled option across nearly thirty different notebook and desktop models, and Fedora Linux on all of its P series lineup. 
ThinkPads have been used heavily in space programs. NASA purchased more than 500 ThinkPad 750 laptops for flight qualification, software development, and crew training, and astronaut (and senator) John Glenn used ThinkPad laptops on his spaceflight mission STS-95 in 1998. 
The ThinkPad 750 flew aboard the Space Shuttle Endeavour during a mission to repair the Hubble Space Telescope on 2 December 1993, running a NASA test program which checked if radiation in the space environment caused memory anomalies or other unexpected problems. ThinkPads were also used in conjunction with a joystick for the Portable In-Flight Landing Operations Trainer (PILOT). 
ThinkPads used aboard the space shuttle and International Space Station feature safety and operational improvements for the environment they must operate in. Modifications include Velcro tape to attach to surfaces, upgrades to the CPU and video card cooling fans to accommodate for microgravity (in which warmer air does not rise) and lower density of the cabin air, and an adapter for the station's 28 volt DC power. 
Throughout 2006, a ThinkPad A31p was being used in the Service Module Central Post of the International Space Station and seven ThinkPad A31p laptops were in service in orbit aboard the International Space Station. As of 2010, the Space Station was equipped with ThinkPad A31 computers and 32 ThinkPad T61p laptops. All laptops aboard the ISS are connected to the station's LAN via Wi-Fi and are connected to the ground at 3 Mbit/s up and 10 Mbit/s down, comparable to home DSL connection speeds. 
Since a new contract with HP in 2016 provided a small number of modified ZBook laptops for ISS use, ThinkPads are no longer the only laptops flown on the ISS but are the predominant laptop present there. 
For several years ThinkPads have been one of the preferred laptop brands used by the United Nations.     
ThinkPads have enjoyed cult popularity for many years, with older ThinkPad models remaining popular with enthusiasts and collectors, who see them as durable, highly usable machines. Aftermarket parts have been developed for some models, such as the X60 and X200, for which custom motherboards with more modern processors have been created. 
Laptop Magazine in 2006 called the ThinkPad the highest-quality laptop computer keyboard available. It was ranked first in reliability and support in PC Magazine's 2007 Survey. 
The ThinkPad was the PC Magazine 2006 Reader's Choice for PC based laptops, and ranked number 1 in Support for PC based laptops. The ThinkPad Series was the first product to receive PC World's Hall of Fame award. 
The Enderle Group's Rob Enderle said that the constant thing about ThinkPad is that the "brand stands for quality" and that "they build the best keyboard in the business." 
In the 2004 survey, they were ranked second (behind eMachines). Lenovo was named the most environment-friendly company in the electronics industry by Greenpeace in 2007 but has since dropped to place 14 of 17 as of October 2010. 
The IBM/Lenovo ThinkPad T60p received the Editor's Choice award for Mobile Graphic Workstation from PC Magazine. Lenovo ThinkPad X60 is the PC Magazine Editor's Choice amtong ultra-portable laptops. The Lenovo ThinkPad T400-Series was on PC World's Top 100 Products of 2009. 
Released in August 2011, the ThinkPad Tablet is the first in Lenovo's line of business-oriented Tablets with the ThinkPad brand. The tablet has been described by Gadget Mix as a premium business tablet. Since the Tablet is primarily business-oriented, it includes features for security, such as anti-theft software, the ability to remotely disable the tablet, SD card encryption, layered data encryption, and Cisco Virtual Private Network (VPN). 
Additionally, the ThinkPad Tablet is able to run software such as IBM's Lotus Notes Traveler. The stylus could be used to write notes on the Tablet, which also included software to convert this handwritten content to text. Another feature on the Tablet was a drag-and-drop utility designed to take advantage of the Tablet's touch capabilities. This feature could be used to transfer data between USB devices, internal storage, or an SD card. 
Slashgear summarized the ThinkPad Tablet by saying, "The stylus and the styling add up to a distinctive slate that doesn't merely attempt to ape Apple's iPad." 
In order to celebrate the 20th anniversary of the ThinkPad, Lenovo held a large party in New York where it announced several products, including the Tablet 2. Lenovo says that the ThinkPad Tablet 2 will be available on 28 October 2012 when Windows 8 is released. The ThinkPad Tablet 2 runs the Windows 8 Professional operating system. It will be able to run any desktop software compatible with this version of Windows. 
The ThinkPad 11e is a "budget" laptop computer for schools and students with an 11-inch screen and without trackpoint. 11e Yoga is a convertible version of 11e. 
The E Series is a low-cost ThinkPad line, designed for small business mass-market requirements, and currently contains only a 14" and 15" sub-lines. The E Series line of laptops replaced Lenovo's Edge Series, but somewhere (in some countries) currently (May 2019) offered as both of "Thinkpad Edge/E series" names. The E series also lack metals like magnesium and carbon fibre in their construction which other members of the ThinkPad family enjoy. 
The L Series replaced the former R Series, and is positioned as a mid-range ThinkPad offering with mainstream Intel Core i3/i5/i7 CPUs. The L Series have 3 sub-lines, the long-running 14" and 15.6" (and as launched this line had two models, L412 and the L512 in 2010); and as of 2018 there is also a 13" L380 available, which replaces the ThinkPad 13. 
The T series historically had high-end features, such as magnesium alloy roll-cages, high-density IPS screens known as FlexView (discontinued after the T60 series), 7-row keyboards, screen latches, the Lenovo UltraBay, and ThinkLight. Models included both 14.1-inch and 15.4-inch displays available in 4:3 and 16:10 aspect ratios. 
The Tx20 series ThinkPads came in two editions: 15" (T520) or a 14" (T420). These are the last ThinkPads to use the classic 7-row keyboard. 
The X Series is the main high-end ultraportable ThinkPad line, offering a lightweight, highly portable laptop with moderate performance. The current sub-lines for the X series includes: 
The mainstream current "workhorse" models is a X13 and X13 Yoga, the 13" successors of the classic discontinued 12" line of Lenovo X Series ThinkPads. 
The premium 14"/15" thin-and-light line were the 13.3" ThinkPad models (the X300/X301) with ultrabay CD-ROM and removable battery, but are now replaced by the modern premium X1-series ultrabook line, such as the X1 Carbon, X1 Yoga, and X1 Extreme sub-series. 
The X Series with "tablet" suffixes is an outdated variant of the 12" X Series models, with low voltage CPUs and a flip-screen tablet resistive touchscreen. These include the traditional ThinkPad features, and have been noted for using a higher quality AFFS-type screen with better viewing angles compared to the screens used on other ThinkPads. 
The P Series line of laptops replaced Lenovo's W Series and reintroduced 17" screens to the ThinkPad line. The P Series (excluding models with 's' suffix) is designed for engineers, architects, animators, etc. and comes with a variety of "high-end" options. All P Series models come included with fingerprint readers. The ThinkPad P Series includes features such as dedicated magnesium roll cages, more indicator LED lights, and high-resolution displays. 
The Stack has a "blocky, black, and rectangular" look with the ThinkPad logo. It shares a common design language with ThinkPad laptop computers. 
Current docking stations (or docks) add much of the functional abilities of a desktop computer, including multiple display outputs, additional USB ports, and occasionally other features. This allows the ThinkPads to be connected and disconnected from various peripherals quickly and easily. 
Recent docks connect via a proprietary connector located on the underside of the laptops; or via USB C. 
The internal replaceable (hot-swappable) CD-drive bay that supports a list of optional components, such as a CD-/DVD/Blu-ray drives, hard drive caddies, additional batteries, or device cradles. 
Some classic models (IBM and early Lenovo T and X series) can support an additional slice battery instead of the UltraBay additional battery. 
A hard drive was designed by Lenovo in 2009. It requires the input of a 4 digit PIN to access data and this can be set by the user. These drives are manufactured by Apricorn, Inc. 
Thinkpad mice come in several different varieties ranging from Bluetooth ones to wired ones to even ones with a trackpoint built-in and labelled as a scroll point 
GAN chargers with a type c output. They are mostly sold under the thinkplus branding in south-east Asia 
The 300-series (300, 310, 340, 345, 350, 360, 365, 370, 380, 385, 390 (all with various sub-series)) was a long-running value series starting at the 386SL/25 processor, all the way to the Pentium III 450. The 300 series was offered as a slightly lower-price alternative from the 700 series, with a few exceptions. 
The ThinkPad 360P and 360PE was a low-end version of ThinkPad 750P, and was unique model in the 300 series in that it could be used as a regular laptop, or transform into a tablet by flipping the monitor on top of itself. Retailing for $3,699 in 1995, the 360PE featured a touch sensitive monitor that operated with the stylus; the machine could run operating systems that supported the touch screen such as PenDOS 2.2. 
Back view of an IBM ThinkPad 390, showing the PS/2 mouse, DB25f printer, DE9m serial, DE15f, VGA and charger ports 
The 700-series was a hi-end ThinkPad line; The released models (700T, 710T and 730T tablets; 700, 701, 720, 730, 750, 755, 760, 765, 770 laptops with various sub-models) can be configured with the best screens, largest hard drives and fastest processors available in the ThinkPad range; some features can be found only on a 700 series models, and was the first successful ThinkPad introduced in 1992 (that was a tablet PC 700T model without a keyboard and a mouse). 
Based on ThinkPad design although branded WorkPad, the IBM WorkPad z50 was a Handheld PC running Windows CE, released in 1999. 
The ThinkPad S31 with the piano black finish option sitting on top of a Z61t; both ThinkPads deviate from the usual matte black. 
The S31 with the lid open showing the unique protruding keyboard; no touchpad was offered, to keep the laptop compact. 
An IBM ThinkPad 1400 i Series with the integrated CD-Player and customizable multimedia access buttons 
The A-series was developed as an all-around productivity machine, equipped with hardware powerful enough to make it a desktop replacement. Hence it was the biggest and heaviest ThinkPad series of its time, but also had features not even found in a T-series of the same age. The A-series was dropped in favor of the G-series and R-series. 
The R Series was a budget line, beginning with the R30 in 2001 and ending with the R400 and R500 presented in 2008. 
The R series reintroduced in 2018 (for Chinese market only) with the same hardware as E series models, but with aluminum display cover, discrete GPU, TPM chip and fingerprint reader. 
The G-series consisted of only three models, the G40, G41 and G50. Being large and heavy machines, equipped with powerful desktop processors, this line of ThinkPads consequently served mainly as replacements for desktop computers. 
The SL Series was launched in 2008 as a low-end ThinkPad targeted mainly geared toward small businesses. These lacked several traditional ThinkPad features, such as the ThinkLight, magnesium alloy roll cage, UltraBay, and lid latch, and use a 6-row keyboard with a different layout than the traditional 7-row ThinkPad keyboard; also, SL-series models have IdeaPad-based firmware. Models offered included 13.3" (SL300), 14" (SL400 and SL410) and 15.6" (SL500 and SL510). 
Models included 13.3" (Edge 13), 14" (Edge 14), and 15.6" (Edge 15) sizes. An 11.6" (Edge 11) model was offered, but not available in the United States. The latest models of E series can be offered with Edge branding, but this naming is optional and uncommon. 
The S Series is positioned as a mid-range ThinkPad offering, containing ultrabooks derived from the Edge Series.  As of August 2013, the S Series includes S531 and S440 models; their cases are made of aluminum and magnesium alloy, available in silver and gunmetal colors. 
The Lenovo ThinkPad Twist (S230u) is a laptop/tablet computer hybrid aimed at high-end users. The Twist gets its name from its screen's ability to twist in a manner that converts the device into a tablet. The Twist has a 12.5" screen and makes use of Intel's Core i7 processor and SSD technology in lieu of a hard drive. 
While this isn't the first time Lenovo had offered an AMD derived ThinkPad, it is the first to be released as an alternative premium offering to the established T Series and X Series ThinkPads, which use Intel chipsets instead. 
Mujib was born on 31 May 1947 in Basuara village of 4th Sreepur Union under Chauddagram upazila of Comilla district. He completed his B.Com. degree from Comilla Victoria College in 1970. 
In October 2014, at the age of 67, Mujib married Honufa Akhter Rikta, a 29 year old. In May 2016, the couple became parents of a baby girl. 
The FEI headquarters are in Lausanne, Switzerland. An FEI code of conduct protects the welfare of the horses from physical abuse or doping. 
The FEI recognizes eight disciplines under global governance in both regular and para-equestrianism competition:  
The FEI does not govern or provide rules for horse racing or polo, but in the latter case, it has signed a Memorandum of Understanding with the Federation of International Polo. 
To drive and develop equestrian sport globally in a modern, sustainable and structured manner with guaranteed integrity, athlete welfare, equal opportunity and a fair and ethical partnership with the horse. 
Jumping, Dressage and Eventing have been a part of the Olympics since 1912. Para-Equestrian Dressage has been part of the Paralympic games since 1996. Jumping has been part of the Youth Olympic Games since its creation in Singapore in 2010. 
The FEI has organized the FEI World Equestrian Games every four years since 1990.  The idea of the World Equestrian Games (WEG) came into being in the mid-1980s and was strongly supported by HRH Prince Philip, who was then FEI President. 
The FEI World Cup is an indoor series and takes place throughout the world with qualifying leagues leading to a final in each of the disciplines.   The FEI World Cup series began with show jumping in 1978 and has since been extended to the disciplines of dressage, driving, and vaulting. Main events include: 
FEI World, Continental and Regional Championships are held in all the FEI disciplines and age categories.  Events include: 
The FEI was formed in 1921 with the joining of the national organizations of Belgium, Denmark, France, Italy, Japan, Norway, Sweden and the United States of America. Today, there are 136 National Equestrian Federations affiliated with the FEI. 
There have been 13 different presidents of the organization. Major Jhkr Karl F. Quarles van Ufford is the only individual to have served twice. Nowadays, a President can serve for a maximum of three terms. Since 2014, the President of the FEI is Ingmar De Vos from Belgium. 
Era FM is the first radio station in Malaysia to hold three records in the Malaysia Book Of Records since 1998. In 2010, Era FM expanded to Kuching and Kota Kinabalu in East Malaysia, with full operation of on air studio and on ground team, with local announcers conversing in local dialects. Era FM Sabah will go completely local on 24 April 2017, which from then all the radio content aired on the Sabah version will be completely different from Peninsular Malaysia's Era FM. 
On 2 January 2018, Era FM was rebranded to ERA in a move by Astro Radio to integrate multiple platforms under the brand. A new logo is also unveiled with the rebranding. Era Sarawak goes completely local on 22 January 2018, which from then all the contents aired on Sarawak version will be completely different from Peninsular Malaysia. 
A common myth is that the club's first goalkeeper was Sir Arthur Conan Doyle. While Conan Doyle did play as AC Smith for an amateur side, Portsmouth Athletic Football Club, that flourished from 1882 to 1894, the first goalkeeper of the professional era was Matt Reilly who previously played for the successful Royal Artillery team. 
The club has won the League Championship twice, the FA Cup twice, never won the League Cup, the Charity Shield once (shared). 
This list details the club's achievements in all major competitions, and the top scorers for each season. Top scorers in bold were also the top scorers in the English league that season. Records of competitions such as the Hampshire Senior Cup are not included due to them being considered of less importance than the FA Cup and the League Cup. 
Note: bold text indicates a competition won. Note 2: Where fields are left blank, the club did not participate in a competition that season. 
Vostok and Voskhod were two spacecraft flown by the Soviet Union. Between 1960 and 1966, Vostok and Voskhod performed 11 successful, 2 partially successful and 3 unsuccessful missions. There are allegations that the Soviets had sent more Vostok missions than what Russian officials said, which are excluded from this list. 
In this region, the geology is dominated by the transition of the tectonic plate boundary from rift to  fault. The southernmost strands of the San Andreas Fault connect to the northernmost extensions of the East Pacific Rise. Consequently, the region is subject to earthquakes, and the crust is being stretched, which will result in a sinking of the terrain over time. 
The Colorado Desert's climate distinguishes it from other deserts. The region experiences greater summer daytime temperatures than higher-elevation deserts and almost never experiences frost. In addition, the Colorado Desert experiences two rainy seasons per year (in the winter and late summer), especially toward the southern portion of the region; the more northerly Mojave Desert usually has only winter rains. 
Some sub-regions of the Colorado Desert contain endemic flora. Along the Lower Colorado River Valley, in-flow side canyons, flatlands, or low-to-higher level elevations, at least three such flora occur: Hesperocallis undulata (desert lily), Nolina bigelovii (Bigelow's nolina), and Peucephyllum schottii (desert fir). 
The Colorado Desert is one of the least-populous regions in California, but human activities have had substantial impacts on the region's habitats and wildlife. Many unique communities, particularly aquatic and dune systems, are limited in distribution and separated by vast expanses of inhospitable, arid desert terrain. Even limited human disturbances can have markedly deleterious effects on the endemic and sensitive species supported by these unique regional systems. 
This Polish biographical article relating to ice hockey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sugar Grove is an unincorporated community in Montgomery County, Virginia, United States. Sugar Grove is part of the Blacksburg-Christiansburg metropolitan area . Sugar Grove at one time hosted a school, a post office, two stores, a vegetable canning facility, and a little less than one hundred families. 
The Sugar Grove is generally agreed[by whom?] to be bounded by the intersection of Bow Hill Road, Sugar Grove Road, and Elliots Creek Road. Craigs Mountain Road (VA 674) is the only way into Sugar Grove. From Pilot Road (VA 615) to the end of state maintenance on Bow Hill Road, it is approximately six miles, three and one half of those miles being a gravel road. 
Roads in the area have often been overlooked. It was not until 1999 that the Virginia Department of Transportation paved the worst one and one-half miles of road that contained at least one-half miles of one hundred foot drop-offs with no guard rail and no room to pass. 
There are a few commercial enterprises based in Sugar Grove and agricultural activity centers on timber harvesting and firewood suppliers. 
This Montgomery County, Virginia state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1900 Mottershaw formed the Sheffield Photo Company, which by 1905 was one of the leading film companies in the country. 
Mottershaw also made documentary films, an early example being The Coronation of King Peter I of Serbia in Belgrade, made in 1904, with Arnold Muir Wilson. 
The historical population is given in the following chart: La Folliaz was formed on 1 January 2005 from the union of the former municipalities of Lussy and Villarimboud. 
This article related to a river in Rio Grande do Norte, Brazil is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Monica Knudsen (born 25 March 1975) is a Norwegian football coach and former player who managed Toppserien club LSK Kvinner. As a player, Knudsen was a midfielder who won 87 caps for the Norway women's national football team between 1996 and 2003. 
She was on the Norwegian teams that hosted UEFA Women's Euro 1997 and then finished fourth at the 1999 FIFA Women's World Cup in the United States. Knudsen won the Toppserien league with her club Asker in 1998 and 1999. 
This biographical article related to women's association football in Norway is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Hahncappsia nigripes is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by William Schaus in 1920. It is found in Guatemala and Mexico. 
Leptospermum roei is a species of spreading shrub that is endemic to the southwest of Western Australia. It has thin, fibrous bark, long egg-shaped to narrow wedge-shaped leaves, white or pink flowers and small fruit that are shed with the seeds. 
This teatree grows on sand, on gravel or on granite outcrops in the Avon Wheatbelt, Coolgardie and Mallee biogeographic regions. 
This leptospermum is listed as "not threatened" by the Western Australian Government Department of Parks and Wildlife. 
He had a co-starring role in a feature documentary by director Tom Shadyac ("Bruce Almighty," "Liar, Liar")  entitled "I Am," a film based in part on Barasch's Field Notes on the Compassionate Life, and which was theatrically released in 70 U.S. venues to mostly favorable reviews. 
A trained musician, he has played and recorded with the Rock Bottom Remainders, a "lit-rock" band consisting of authors Amy Tan, Stephen King, Maya Angelou, and others. He has collaborated as a lyricist with Grammy and Academy Award-winner Alan Menken, composer of "Beauty and the Beast,""Little Mermaid," "Aladdin," et al., with whom he continues to work on the international Green World Children's Choirs to engage global youth in treeplanting efforts. 
Cerastium arcticum, the Arctic mouse-ear chickweed or Arctic mouse-ear, is a flower distributed at parts of western and southern Greenland, Baffin Island, Labrador, Iceland, Scotland, Norway and Svalbard. 
It grows in tufts, sometimes loosely, generally in damp places and on open gravel. Most of the plant is pubescent, the hairs appearing stiff. Leaves are elliptical. The flowers are white, rather large, beautiful when fully expanded, single or two together. Petals deeply notched and considerably longer than sepals.  
While Wizards & Warriors III hinted at a sequel at the end of the game, it has not happened. The publishing rights for the series remained with Acclaim, who went bankrupt in 2004, with their intellectual property rights going to Throwback Entertainment. As of late 2010, the Toronto-based company has no plans for any future games in the series. 
WOW Gospel 2011 is a gospel music compilation album from the award-winning WOW series.  Released on February 1, 2011 (which made it the first annual WOW Gospel album in the history of the series not released in January), the double CD album features thirty contemporary gospel hits.  The album cover pays tribute to Philadelphia, Pennsylvania.  The album debuted straight at number one on the Billboard Gospel Albums chart, and peaked at number 29 on the Billboard 200 in 2011. 
Five songs featured on WOW Gospel 2011 have reached number one on Gospel Songs chart:  The Best In Me, I Believe, God In Me, He Wants It All and Nobody Greater. 
He served as prefect of the Apostolic Prefecture of Bahr el-Gebel in Sudan from October 21, 1938, until his death. 
This multi-page article lists pharmaceutical drugs alphabetically by name. Many drugs have more than one name and, therefore, the same drug may be listed more than once. Brand names and  generic names are differentiated by capitalizing brand names. 
 eKool is a school management system used in Estonia covering 90% of the nation's school network connecting all the pupils, parents and teachers involved. It is estimated that this application is used by 28-30% of Estonians in total. The name eKool means eSchool in Estonian. 
Since 2014 eKool is also supported by mobile application which allows students and parents to access their information from mobile phones. However schools and teachers still need to use a computer. 
eKool can be accessed by combination of user-name and password, Estonian ID-card, Estonian Mobile-ID, Smart-ID or through online bank identification. eKool can be used by various interest groups: school personnel, students, parents and to some extent the local government overseeing their own school's. With one user account a person can access functionalities for different user groups where the user belongs to. 
The schools personnel carries out most of the data entry process to eKool which latter can be used by all parties that have right to access the information. Among the information schools provide are: 
The parents and the students can access the information and keep themselves up to date. From their own side they make it easy for the school to collect contact information because parents and students enter it themselves and keep eKool updated by using it. 
Williams was born and raised in Cincinnati, Ohio. He earned a degree in theatre from The Ohio State University. He lives in Los Angeles. 
Williams was a writer and host of the television series Science of the Movies, which aired on the Science Channel, and is a production of Discovery Communications. He also story produced the television mini-series Alien Encounters for Science Channel. He has appeared as a film critic on Current TV's The Rotten Tomatoes Show and as a guest host on G4's Attack of the Show! Williams is listed by Wired.com as one of the "Top 150 Geeky Media People on Twitter". 
Williams, whilst hosting the TV series "Science of the Movies" talked profusely about achieving "nerdvana" [a state at which science fiction and fantasy fans reach the ultimate state of their fandom of the genres.] "Nerdvana" was also the name of Williams' podcast and daily blog. 
Williams wrote and produced the movie news/comedy show NextMovie Daily for MTV Networks. He also produced The Yahoo Movie Show and TV in No Time for Yahoo, and CraveOnline's comedy web series Heads Up, which showcased movies, video games, and comic books through commentary and sketch comedy. Heads Up was honored in the Variety Show category by the 14th Annual Webby Awards. 
He was elected District Attorney in 1997 in a close race against then Assistant District Attorney Bradley Hellein, the Republican nominee.  Andreassi was unopposed for re-election in 2001.  In 2005, Hellein again ran against Andreassi.  Andreassi won that year by a comfortable margin. 
Prior to serving as DA, he was worked as an assistant Armstrong County public defender, Assistant to the Secretary/Treasurer of the PA AFL-CIO, Contract Administrator for the PA Nurses Association, attorney for the Airline Pilots Association, and as a private attorney as a partner in Steiner, Steiner and Andreassi. 
Andreassi's assistant district attorneys are First Assistant, Katie Charlton and Tim Miller.  Andreassi's predecessor, Republican George Kepple, serves as Andreassi's Deputy District Attorney. 
On May 3, 2016, the ACLU of Pennsylvania filed a federal lawsuit against Scott Andreassi for violation of the first amendment, false arrest and false imprisonment. 
Welton (or Wilton) was launched at Hull in 1809. She first traded between Hull and Quebec and then later with South America and the Caribbean. Lastly, she traded with India. She was lost in 1817 at Bengal. 
A list of "Country and Licensed Ships" showed Welton, J. Gritton, master, sailing for Bombay on 15 May 1815. 
Jagannath Prasad Bhanu was born on 8 August 1859 at Nagpur, the capital of then Central Provinces. He spent most of his life in Bilaspur in modern-day Chhattisgarh. He was a scholar of Hindi, Sanskrit, Prakrit, English, Urdu, Persian, Odia and Marathi. He was especially interested in linguistics and mathematics. 
A by-election was held in the Niutao constituency in Tuvalu on 5 May 2003. It was triggered by the death of the incumbent MP, Saloa Tauia. Tauia, the Speaker of Parliament, died in February, after having entered Parliament in the July 2002 general election. 
Niutao is a two-seat constituency, and in the 2002 general election it had returned Samuelu Teo and Saloa Tauia with 26.5% and 25.9% of the vote respectively, ahead of two other candidates. For the by-election, of course, only one seat would be provided for, Teo retaining the other. 
Teii would go on to be appointed deputy prime minister under Apisai Ielemia after the 2006 general election, Tuvalu Islands Headline News, November 2007 and would hold that position until he lost his seat in parliament in the 2010 general election. 
Odorrana andersonii is considered as being of "Least Concern" by the International Union for Conservation of Nature (IUCN), although over-exploitation for food and habitat change are threats to this species. 
Ware & Leland v. Mobile County, 209 U.S. 405 (1908), is a case in which the United States Supreme Court held that contracts for the sales of cotton for future delivery that do not oblige interstate shipments are not subjects of interstate commerce. The Court also held that a state tax on persons engaged in buying and selling cotton for future delivery was not a regulation of interstate commerce, and that the imposition of the tax was not beyond the power of the state. 
This article related to the Supreme Court of the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Spring Valley High School is located in unincorporated Northeast Columbia, South Carolina, United States, and is operated by Richland County School District Two. Opened in the fall of 1970, it was for a long time the sole high school operating in Richland School District Two, replacing Dentsville High School. 
In 2008, a new three story building replaced the pods as the new school building, integrating the original gymnasium and fine arts buildings as the only remaining pieces of the original campus. 
The discovery magnet program is designed for talented students and focuses on science and math, first founded in 1995. These courses are honors level and required for all members of the Discovery program.  All discovery members are required to complete two college-level research projects during their sophomore and junior year.  The completion of at least four AP courses (one math, one science, two others) is required for graduation from the discovery program. 
The explorations program is the sister program to discovery. The program focuses on math and science, and is a college-preparatory program, as opposed to an honors program. 
Siegfried Seidemann is a retired East German slalom canoeist who competed in the late 1950s. He won two medals in the mixed C-2 event at the ICF Canoe Slalom World Championships with a silver in 1957 and a bronze in 1959. 
According to Joseph Smith, the founder of the Latter Day Saint movement, the Word of Wisdom was received in 1833 as a revelation from God. After Smith's death, Brigham Young stated that the revelation was given in response to problems encountered while conducting meetings in the Smith family home: 
The Word of Wisdom was first published as a stand-alone broadsheet in December 1833. In 1835, it was included as Section LXXX in the first edition of the Doctrine and Covenants. 
Among the substances which the revelation indicates should not be ingested, the first is "wine or strong drink", which the revelation says should not be drunk. (An exception is allowed for the use of "pure wine of your own make" as part of the sacrament ordinance, though the LDS Church today uses water in place of wine.) The revelation also advises against the consumption of tobacco and "hot drinks". 
The Word of Wisdom revelation also suggests proper uses for some prohibited substances. While "strong drinks" are not to be ingested, they are appropriate when used "for the washing of your bodies"; likewise, while human ingestion of tobacco is forbidden, tobacco is said to be "an herb for bruises and all sick cattle, to be used with judgment and skill". 
The list of foods and substances which the revelation encourages includes "wholesome herbs [and] every fruit in the season thereof" and "that which yieldeth fruit, whether in the ground or above the ground". It also prescribes the use of "all grain", which is described as "the staff of life, not only for man but for the beasts of the field". Barley and other grains are recommended for use in making "mild drinks". 
The "beasts of the field, and the fowls of heaven, and all wild animals that run or creep on the earth" may be used as food "sparingly" and "with thanksgiving". 
The revelation states that it is pleasing to God if these are not used, "only in times of winter, or of cold, or famine" and times of "excess of hunger". 
The Word of Wisdom states that it comprises a "principle with promise". The promise given to those who followed the advice of the word of wisdom is as follows: 
And all saints who remember to keep and do these sayings, walking in obedience to the commandments, shall receive health in their navel and marrow to their bones; and shall find wisdom and great treasures of knowledge, even hidden treasures; and shall run and not be weary, and shall walk and not faint.  And I, the Lord, give unto them a promise, that the destroying angel shall pass by them, as the children of Israel, and not slay them. 
In 1842, Smith's brother Hyrum, who was the Assistant President of the Church and its presiding patriarch, provided an interpretation of the Word of Wisdom's proscription of "hot drinks": 
And again "hot drinks are not for the body, or belly;" there are many who wonder what this can mean; whether it refers to tea, or coffee, or not. I say it does refer to tea, and coffee. 
According to a book written by LDS missionary and hymnographer Joel H. Johnson in 1881, Joseph Smith shared Hyrum's interpretation: 
 I understand that some of the people are excusing themselves in using tea and coffee, because the Lord only said "hot drinks" in the revelation of the Word of Wisdom .... Tea and coffee ... are what the Lord meant when He said "hot drinks".
On August 19, 1835, Almon W. Babbitt was brought before the church's high council on three charges. On the charge of "not keeping the Word of Wisdom", Babbitt stated "that he had taken the liberty to break the Word of Wisdom, from the example of President Joseph Smith, Jun., and others, but acknowledged that it was wrong." 
In 1838, Smith was operating a hotel/tavern in Far West, Missouri. In June 1838, the high council of Far West felt compelled to remind Smith's family that there was a ban on the sale and consumption of "ardent spirits in the place". 
After Smith's death, several factions emerged from the Latter Day Saint movement. The largest of these groups, The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (LDS Church), was led by Brigham Young. At a general conference of the church held on September 9, 1851, Young called on the attendees to "leave off the use of" items mentioned in the Word of Wisdom: 
The Patriarch [John Smith] again rose to speak on the Word of Wisdom, and urging on the brethren to leave off using tobacco, &c. 
President Young rose to put the motion and called on all the sisters who will leave off the use of tea, coffee, &c., to manifest it by raising the right hand; seconded and carried. 
And then put the following motion; calling on all the boys  [sic] who were under ninety years of age who would covenant to leave off the use of tobacco, whisky, and all things mentioned in the Word of Wisdom, to manifest it in the same manner, which was carried unanimously." 
Though Young encouraged Mormons to follow the Word of Wisdom code, the church was tolerant of those who did not follow it. In 1860, he counseled those chewing tobacco in church meetings to at least be discreet and not excessive, but did not charge users with sin. By 1870, however, he ended the practice of chewing and spitting tobacco in the Salt Lake Tabernacle. 
Young also recognized a separation between using tobacco (which was discouraged), and selling it to non-Mormons as a business (which was encouraged). He also owned and maintained a bar in Salt Lake City for the sale of alcoholic beverages to non-Mormon travelers, on the theory that it was better for LDS Church authorities to run such establishments than for outsiders. 
The Word of Wisdom states that "flesh also of beasts and of the fowls of the air ... are to be used sparingly", and that "it is pleasing unto [God] that they should not be used, only in times of winter, or of cold, or famine." Unlike the injunctions against tobacco, alcohol, and hot drinks, however, compliance with this injunction has never been made mandatory. 
 That the children may live long / And be beautiful and strong, / Tea and coffee and tobacco they despise, / Drink no liquor, and they eat / But a very little meat; / They are seeking to be great and good and wise.
A student manual published by the church has suggested that the suggestion that the consumption of meat be limited to wintertime may to some degree be a historical relic of the time in which the "Word of Wisdom" was delivered by Smith: 
 17. Nevertheless, wheat for man, and corn for the ox, and oats for the horse, and rye for the fowls and for swine, and for all beasts of the field, and barley for all useful animals, and for mild drinks, as also other grain.
The revelation suggests that barley-based mild drinks (such as beer) may be permissible. As recently as 1901, apostles Brigham Young, Jr. and John Henry Smith argued that the revelation did not prohibit beer. However, LDS Church leaders now teach that consumption of any form of alcohol, including beer, violates the Word of Wisdom. 
In a pamphlet written in 1930 called The Word of Wisdom, apostle John A. Widtsoe taught that refined flour was contrary to the Word of Wisdom. The church, however, has never prohibited the use of refined flour. 
Today, adherence to the proscriptions of the Word of Wisdom is required for baptism and for entry into temples of the LDS Church. BYU historian Thomas G. Alexander points out that while the original Word of Wisdom as a "principle with promise" was given by revelation, there is no evidence that any church leader has claimed a separate new revelation, or even a spiritual confirmation, of changing the Word of Wisdom from "a principle with promise" to a commandment. 
The church's official statement on the interpretation of the Word of Wisdom is short: it reaffirms the long-standing meaning of "hot drinks" and extends the substances covered by prohibition: 
The only official interpretation of "hot drinks" (D&C 89:9) in the Word of Wisdom is the statement made by early Church leaders that the term "hot drinks" means tea and coffee. 
Members should not use any substance that contains illegal drugs. Nor should members use harmful or habit-forming substances except under the care of a competent physician. 
Although avoiding the prohibitions of the Word of Wisdom is a requirement for admission to LDS Church temples, violation of the Word of Wisdom no longer results in church discipline, as it once did; the church instructs its leaders that church discipline "should not be [used] to discipline or threaten members who do not comply with the Word of Wisdom". 
LDS Church leaders have counseled church members that they should not have personal interpretations of, or become extreme in their observance of the Word of Wisdom. One church leader specifically warned that adding additional unauthorized requirements, emphasizing it with excess zeal, or making it a "gospel hobby" is a sign of spiritual immaturity and sometimes apostasy. 
A 2019 study of attitudes among Mormons within the U.S. said that a quarter to a half of such individuals interpret the Word of Wisdom in variance with the official interpretation by the LDS Church in some manner. 
The prohibition of "wine or strong drink" is widely interpreted as a blanket prohibition of all alcoholic beverages, regardless of the level of alcoholic content of the drink. 
Generally, members of the LDS Church view the prohibition on "hot drinks" as covering coffee and tea, whether or not the drinks are hot. There is generally thought to be no prohibition against drinking hot water, herbal tea, hot chocolate, coffee substitutes such as Postum or malt drinks such as Ovaltine or Milo. Other members choose to prohibit themselves from drinking any beverage that contains caffeine. 
In the past, a number of church leaders have discouraged the use of such products. For example, in 1922, church president Heber J. Grant counseled the Latter-day Saints: 
I am not going to give any command, but I will ask it as a personal, individual favor to me, to let coca-cola  [sic] alone. There are plenty of other things you can get at the soda fountains without drinking that which is injurious. The Lord does not want you to use any drug that creates an appetite for itself. 
Two years after making this statement, Grant met with a representative of The Coca-Cola Company to discuss the church's position on Coca-Cola; at the conclusion of their second meeting, Grant stated that he was "sure I have not the slightest desire to recommend that the people leave Coca-Cola alone if th[e] amount [of caffeine in Coca-Cola] is absolutely harmless, which they claim it is." Grant never again spoke out against the use of cola drinks. 
With reference to cola drinks, the Church has never officially taken a position on this matter, but the leaders of the Church have advised, and we do now specifically advise, against the use of any drink containing harmful habit-forming drugs under circumstances that would result in acquiring the habit.  Any beverage that contains ingredients harmful to the body should be avoided. 
In 2019 the LDS Church clarified in New Era that medical marijuana should only be used "under the care of a competent physician." 
Speculation also exists concerning the use of alcohol as a cooking ingredient or the use of decaffeinated coffee or tea. The LDS Church has taken no official stance on either. 
On March 14, 2011, Oklahoma fired Jeff Capel, after the Sooners had back-to-back losing seasons for the first time since 1967. Capel led the Sooners to a 17-36 record since Blake Griffin left for the NBA. Overall, Capel was 96-69 in five seasons. Capel received a $1.75 million buyout from Oklahoma. On April 2, 2011, it was announced that Lon Kruger would leave UNLV to become the Sooners new coach. Kruger will be paid about $2.2 million annually. 
The Sooners' second leading scorer, Calvin Newell, transferred to the University of Central Florida. Newell decided to leave Oklahoma due to family issues. 
There are four documented mutations found in captive Bourke's parrots; yellow, Isabel, fallow and pink or rosa. 
The bird's call has been described as a "soft twitter". Other sounds made by the Bourke's parrot go "chu-vee", "chirrup chirrup", or when alarmed, "kik-kik-kik". 
The name of the Bourke's parrot comes from Sir Thomas L. Mitchell, who spotted the bird in New South Wales in 1835. Mitchell named the species after Sir Richard Bourke, the governor of the state at the time. 
The ornithologist John Gould wrote the first scientific description of the Bourke's parrot in 1841. Gould initially classified the species as Euphema bourkii, but it was later classified within the genus Neophema which fully consists of grass parakeets. 
In the mid-90s, the Bourke's was reclassified into its own genus, Neopsephotus. This was done because of a lack of evidence that the parrot could hybridize with the rest of the Neophema genus; they are different in colouration and live a nomadic lifestyle throughout the arid regions of Australia. The Bourke's parrot is still however referred to as a type of grass parakeet. 
The Bourke's parrot has been described as both arboreal and terrestrial; it perches and nests in trees, but also frequently lives on the ground where it can easily camouflage. The flight pattern of the Bourke's parakeet is short but swift, interspersed with gliding motions. It usually flies close to the ground in quick bursts, as it travels between trees. The bird's wing beat is minimal and produces an audible whirring sound. 
In the wild the Bourke's parrot tends to live in pairs or small groups, ranging from approximately four to six. Larger flocks ranging in the hundreds are also made by the species, particularly during times of drought. 
During the nesting season, males are highly territorial, chasing away any potential intruders or threats. Breeding season for the Bourke's parrot usually occurs between the months of August and October, but can also draw out into December, depending on the season and availability of resources. 
Once the chicks hatch, both parents feed their young. Offspring begin fledging at about 4 weeks of age, becoming fully independent around 8 to 10 days later. 
Bourke's parrots forage on the ground and in bushes for grasses and seeds, most active feeding at dusk and dawn. Due to their diet the Bourke's parrot works as a known seed disperser. 
The Bourke's parrot is a relatively popular aviary bird. It is particularly common among new bird owners, as it is known for its quiet and passive temperament. Due to their peaceful nature, Bourke's parrots may be kept in captivity with a number of other species including finches, doves and other small parakeets. 
There have been recorded instances of the Bourke's parrot producing hybrids with the scarlet-chested parrot (Neophema splendida). 
Carlton Elijah Tillery (born August 8, 1957) is an American former boxer in both the cruiserweight and heavyweight divisions, nicknamed "Phoenix Steel". 
Karnilova made her Broadway debut in 1946 in Call Me Mister. She won the Tony Award for Best Featured Actress in a Musical for the original 1964 production of Fiddler on the Roof starring Zero Mostel and was nominated as Tony Award for Best Actress in a Musical for Zorba (1968). 
Other Broadway credits include Miss Liberty (1949), Two's Company (1952), Jerome Robbins' Ballet: U.S.A. (1958), Gypsy (as the original "Tessie Tura"; 1959),  Bravo Giovanni (1962), Gigi (1973), God's Favorite (1974), Bring Back Birdie (1981), and the 1981 revival of Fiddler. Her film credits include The Unsinkable Molly Brown (1964) and Married to the Mob (1988). 
She was married to actor George S. Irving from 1948 until her death from undisclosed causes in Manhattan at the age of 80 in 2001. She was survived by her husband, two children, three grandchildren, and extended family. Her widower, George S. Irving, died in 2016, aged 94. 
Gisilia sclerodes is a moth in the family Cosmopterigidae. It is found in South Africa, Namibia, Kenya, Nigeria, the Democratic Republic of Congo, Egypt, Sudan and the United Arab Emirates. 
Tactusa tranumi is a moth of the family Erebidae first described by Michael Fibiger in 2010. It is known from northern Vietnam. 
With the re-alignment of its role and equipment, the regiment changed its name to Royal Cavalry Corps on 22 September 1979, and in 1986 was again renamed Royal Armoured Corps. 
Armoured warfare training is undertaken at the Armour Training Centre at Sebatang Karah Camp in Port Dickson. Exchanges are made with friendly countries such as The United States, United Kingdom, Australia, France, India and Pakistan. 
The formation of the Ceremonial Mounted Squadron (Skuadron Istiadat Berkuda) added another milestone to the history of the Armoured Corps, the national tourism industry and the development of the national equestrian sports. The idea was mooted by then Prime Minister Dato' Seri Mahathir Mohamad. With the formation of this unit, it becomes the third uniformed organisation after the Royal Malaysian Police (PDRM) and Kuala Lumpur City Hall (DBKL). 
The Armoured Corps Museum is located in Sungala Camp, Jalan Sua Betong, Port Dickson, Negeri Sembilan. The late Sultan Mahmud Al-Muktafi Billah Shah Ibni Al-Marhum Al-Sultan Ismail Nasiruddin Shah, the Sultan of Terengganu, launched the museum on 4 September 1993. He was also then the Colonel-in-chief for the Royal Armoured Corps. 
The museum aims to store for reference historical documents and artefacts of the Royal Armoured Corps, which has its Corps Home at the 2nd Royal Armoured Regiment, Sunggala Camp, Port Dickson. 
Tony Temple (born September 13, 1985) is a former starting running back for the Missouri Tigers football team representing the University of Missouri. Temple played for the Tigers from 2004 to 2007. He entered the 2008 NFL Draft, but was not chosen and was signed after the draft as a free agent with the Cleveland Browns 
Temple attended Rockhurst High School in Kansas City, Missouri, and participated in both track and field and football for the Hawklets. Temple was on two Missouri 6A High School undefeated state championship football teams in 2000 and 2002. Temple finished his high school career in football with 6,295 rushing yards and 85 total touchdowns, good for a #8 ranking by Rivals and #2 by ESPN as a running back prospect in the 2004 collegiate recruiting class. 
After the 2007 season Temple applied to get the 2008 year of eligibility back by appeal to the NCAA. Temple played in one game for 2004 as a true freshman, but due to an injury, he missed the remainder of the year. The appeal was turned down initially by the Big 12, and before the NCAA could review it, Temple decided to withdraw the appeal and prepare for the NFL draft. 
Temple was signed with the Cleveland Browns, but then released. Temple is currently the director of operations at the Kansas City Fitness Magazine. Temple also is the owner of a construction company, based in Kansas City, Missouri. (Temple Construction Services, LLC). Temple also works for a local talent agency in Kansas City, Missouri, where he was featured in a national Adidas promo and with Hallmark. Temple is a client for Talent Unlimited, where he specializes in acting and modeling. 
Clerk is a 1989 Hindi movie. The film was written, produced, directed by and starred Manoj Kumar alongside an ensemble cast including Rekha, Anita Raj, Shashi Kapoor, Rajendra Kumar, Ashok Kumar, Prem Chopra and Sonu Walia as well as Pakistani actors Mohammed Ali and Zeba in their first and only Hindi film appearance. The film did not do well at the box office and was Manoj Kumar's last film directed by him that had him in the leading role. 
The music was composed by Jagdish Khanna, Uttam Singh and Uttam Ghosh. The music was released under T-Series. 
Philippe married three times. 1. Her first marriage was to Raoul II of Lusignan in ca 1239/40. Philippe was his third wife. They had no children, but she was the stepmother of Marie de Lusignan. 2. Her second marriage was to Raoul II, Lord of Coucy in ca. 1246. They had one child: 
3. Her third marriage was to Otto II, Count of Guelders between 1252 and 1254. They had four children: 
Tamara Sedmak was born in Baden in the canton of Aargau and spent her childhood in Obersiggenthal near Baden. In 1996, she graduated at the cantonal school of Baden with a Type B Matura. She then studied journalism, business economics and psychology at the University of Zurich. In 2001, she ended her studies graduating with a licenciate in philosophy. 
Tamara Sedmak speaks German, English, French, Italian and Croatian, and has also presented programs and events in these languages. According to her own data, she has also been actively practicing ballet since her youth, as well as tennis, skiing and swimming. 
Sedmak is married to German former athlete and sports presenter Norbert Dobeleit, with whom she has a son named Julius born in June 2011. The couple has separated since. In August 2016, she gave birth to her second child, a daughter named Jasmin, and from a relationship with a New York businessman. 
The church is built in Perpendicular style in red sandstone.  Its plan consists of a tower at the west end, a four-bay nave with a clerestory, north and south aisles, and a two-bay chancel.  The tower is embraced by the west ends of the aisles.  It is surmounted by a battlemented parapet and crocketed pinnacles.  There is no chancel arch, but the chancel roof is lower than that of the nave.  The nave and aisle roofs have parapets while the chancel is embattled. 
According to Stein (2007), by the 14th[a] century azebs garnisoned in strongholds were called kale (fortress) azebs. Azebs in fortresses had duties such as building bridges, working as sappers and doing the job of armorers, especially after conscription of devshirme armorers stopped. They usually comprised most of the garrison in smaller forts and palankas. 
In the Ottoman Empire the main role of Azaps were fighting as infantry archers on front lines before the cannons and janissaries, After azebs slowed down the initial enemy charge, they would withdraw to left and right, and let the Ottoman cannons and janissaries fire at them. 
Copper is one of the world's most important industrial minerals, and Africa is an important world producer.  While output is traditionally dominated by Zambia, South Africa and Katanga Province in the south of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, many African nations contribute to copper production, and many African nations have undeveloped ore resources. 
The Prost JS45 was the Formula One racing car with which the Prost team competed in the 1997 Formula One World Championship, and the first Prost-badged car following Alain Prost's acquisition of Ligier in February 1997. 
The acquisition of Ligier from Flavio Briatore by Prost, and its subsequent renaming after him, marked the end of the Ligier name in F1 after involvement in the sport since 1976. However, the car had been designed and built beforehand, and so retained its Ligier designation of JS45. Also retained were Mugen Honda engines and Gauloises sponsorship, though the team opted for Bridgestone tyres in the Japanese's company's first year of F1. 
Prost's lead driver was Olivier Panis, who had driven for Ligier since 1994, while the second seat was taken by Japanese rookie Shinji Nakano, largely due to pressure from engine suppliers Mugen. 
The inexperienced Nakano, meanwhile, proved solid if not spectacular, scoring two points for sixth places at Canada (after the race was stopped following Panis' crash) and Hungary. However, he did not retain his seat for 1998, as Panis stayed on alongside Trulli and the team took on Peugeot engines, swapping with Jordan. 
At the end of the season, Panis was tenth in the Drivers' Championship with 16 points, while Trulli was 16th with his three points from Germany and Nakano was 19th with his two (though all three were later promoted a place following Michael Schumacher's exclusion from the standings). With a total of 21 points, Prost placed sixth in the Constructors' Championship. 
The Fun of Watching Fireworks is the debut album by The American Analog Set. It was released on August 20, 1996 on Emperor Jones records. 
Windsor Park had a population of 1,683 at the 2018 New Zealand census, an increase of 69 people (4.3%) since the 2013 census, and an increase of 183 people (12.2%) since the 2006 census. There were 642 households. There were 747 males and 936 females, giving a sex ratio of 0.8 males per female. The median age was 43.3 years, with 258 people (15.3%) aged under 15 years, 315 (18.7%) aged 15 to 29, 675 (40.1%) aged 30 to 64, and 438 (26.0%) aged 65 or older. 
Although some people objected to giving their religion, 49.4% had no religion, 39.0% were Christian, and 6.4% had other religions. 
Of those at least 15 years old, 471 (33.1%) people had a bachelor or higher degree, and 168 (11.8%) people had no formal qualifications. The median income was $27,300. The employment status of those at least 15 was that 558 (39.2%) people were employed full-time, 174 (12.2%) were part-time, and 33 (2.3%) were unemployed. 
Rangitoto College is a coeducational secondary (years 9-13) school with a roll of 3233 students as at March 2021. Founded in 1956, it is now the largest secondary school in New Zealand. 
East Coast Bays Rugby Club is located in Windsor Park and is one of the largest rugby clubs in the southern hemisphere. It shares its clubrooms with East Coast Bays Cricket Club 
"Pandora's Kiss" / "Don't Give Up" is a double A-side single released by English singer Louise in September 2003. It was her last single to be released until 2019's "Stretch". The single was released to raise money for the Tickled Pink campaign for Breast Cancer Care. Listeners noted that the chorus of "Don't Give Up" strongly resembles Asda's commercial marketing jingle; Asda admitted that it had been written by the same composer.[citation needed] 
The double A-side reached number five on the UK Singles Chart and was re-released in 2019, being available on music download outlets and streaming to coincide with the release of Louise's fourth album, Heavy Love (2020). According to the Official Charts Company, "Pandora's Kiss" is Louise's 11th-highest-selling single in the UK. "Don't Give Up" was available only in Asda stores. The video for "Pandora's Kiss" was directed by Trudy Bellinger. 
The flaccid catshark (Apristurus exsanguis) is a catshark of the family Scyliorhinidae. It is endemic to the waters around New Zealand. 
The New Zealand Department of Conservation has classified the flaccid catshark as "Data deficient" under the New Zealand Threat Classification System. 
Brusseau's Dignity, Pleasures, Vulgarity: Philosophy and Animal Rights asks how animal studies reflect back to reveal human truths. 
The documentary Wealth Inequality Workshop unites utilitarianism, Rawls, Nozick, Bataille and Deleuze to explore theoretical dilemmas of wealth inequality. Brusseau argues that the philosophies of Bataille and Deleuze can be mobilized both to allow and limit wealth inequality.   
De Gebroeders Ko is a Dutch musical duo, consisting of the brothers Ton and Gerard Koopmans. Their name literally means "The Ko Brothers" and they are known for their Dutch spoofs of "Boten Anna" by Basshunter and "Dragostea din tei" by O-Zone. 
Songs of De Gebroeder Ko not only became famous in the Netherlands but also within the German Mallorca scenery. German versions recorded by Mickie Krause were hits in all German speaking countries. 
This article about a Dutch band or other musical ensemble is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Menavli is a village about three kilometres from Wai in the Satara district. The village's claim to fame is due to the palace (wada) built by Nana Fadnavis, 18th century Maratha statesman and the regent of Peshwa Madhavrao II. 
Bhavan Rao Trymbak Pant Pratinidhi of Aundh and Raghunath Ghanshyam Mantri (Satara) bestowed the village of Menavli to Nana Phadnavis in December 1768. 
Nana, being the Peshwas' record keeper transcribed and maintained their documents of accounts and administrative letters in the ancient "Modi" script. These documents, known as the famous "Menavli Daptar" were preserved in this Wada at Menavli.The Daptar documents are now preserved at Deccan College, Pune 
After Nana's death in 1800, the Peshwa Bajirao II, confiscated the Wada. The British General Arthur Wellesley (the future Duke of Wellington) returned the property to the Nana's wife Jeeubai on 25 March 1804. After her death, Sir Bartle Frere (governor of Bombay) handed over the property to Nana's descendants. 
An ancient tree, with a massive coniform trunk has a platform constructed around it is as old as the Wada itself. This tree featured in the Bollywood movie Swades. In the movie, the village elders hold a Panchayat on the stone platform around this tree. 
Several Bollywood movies have been shot, using the wada as an exotic location, notably, Yudh (Jackie Shroff/Tina Munim), Mrityudand (Madhuri Dixit), Goonj Uthi Shehnai, Jis Desh Mein Ganga Rehta Hain (Govinda), Gangaajal (Ajay Devgan), Sarja (Ajinkya Deo), Bajirao Mastani and Swades (Shahrukh Khan, Gayatri Joshi). The film crew of the movie Swades, once camped at the ghat to shoot some footage. The crew cleaned and painted the old stone walls of the ghat and the temples. 
The Dutch East India Company's fleet consisted of the warships Broeckerhaven, Slooterdijck, Wieringen, Perdam, Zeeburg, Koudekerke, Zalm and Bleiswijk. The Dutch had anchored at Liaoluo Bay off Kinmen Island with these eight vessels and fifty junks belonging to their Chinese pirate allies flying the VOC flag. Zheng, on the other hand, had around 150 junks consisting of imperial ships, merchant ships, and his own personal vessels. Fifty of these were large junks. 
Their huge ships are difficult to turn, and when they encounter shallow sandy areas, they cannot move. And the Dutch people are not good at fighting, so frequently they are defeated in war.
Jakob Julius David was born the son of a wealthy German-Jewish farmer in Habsburg Moravia. The family soon moved to Fulnek, where the father died. David attended high schools in Kremsier and Opava. Here he fell ill in 1873 severely from typhus, which severely limited his vision and hearing. Nevertheless, he began in 1877 in Vienna with a degree in Germanic and history and took an active interest in student life in the capital. 
Since he was denied due to his disability, the teaching profession, he worked as a tutor and then as a journalist. Jakob Julius David worked as an editor and journalist, including for the Wiener Mode, Die Zeit, the Mondaysrevue, the Wiener Allgemeine Zeitung, the Neue Wiener Journal and the Wiener Zeitung. He was also a freelance writer. 
The reptiles and frogs of the Eastern Highlands of Zimbabwe and Mozambique mark a biodiversity hotspot for herpetofauna. Diverse frog and reptile communities include endemic species. 
Stone has produced a number of notable independent games over the course of her career, including Medication Mediation, Sext Adventure, and Ritual of the Moon. Her work largely focuses on the intersection of game design, disability, and gender. She is also a member of the Different Games collective. 
Stone was born and raised in Toronto, Canada. She is a graduate of Etobicoke School of the Arts and holds both a BFA in Film Production and an MA in Communication and Culture from York University. She has a Ph.D in Film & Digital Media from the University of California, Santa Cruz and is an assistant professor at the Alberta University of the Arts in Calgary. 
Another major release by Stone is 2019's Ritual of the Moon. Over the course of 28 real-time days, Ritual of the Moon slowly unveils the narrative of a witch who has been exiled to the moon. The art style of the game is composed entirely of scanned and digitally manipulated images. Many reviews focused on the unique 28-day structure of the game, including a full 28-day series on RockPaperShotgun. 
Stone's most recent work is UnearthU, which was released in 2021. Seemingly a straightforward wellness app, UnearthU gradually reveals a complex narrative that critically interrogates mindfulness, wellness, and the Silicon Valley tech industry. 
In 2016, Rami began a solo career releasing the album Aspiration on September 7, which reached number 16. It features contributions from veteran metal musicians such as Syu, Yuhki and Fumiya of Galneryus, Katsuji and Kentaro of Gargoyle, and Saber Tiger bassist Hibiki. Her live band for its tour included Cyntia members Yui and Azu, and TSP drummer Hina. Rami's second album, Reloaded, was released on January 31, 2018, and peaked at number 31. 
A parranda is formed by three couplets paired with three verses. Its structure is similar to the beginning, ending, return, couplets and ending structure of a seguidilla. The melody is diatonic and syllabic. It has a ternary rhythm, and a tonal harmony and is played in major key. The three types of parranda are solo, trio, and campo. 
The dance is often accompanied by Murcian castanets or pitos (finger snapping). The instruments used for this variety of music are guitars, guitarros, violins, and bandurrias (similar to Spanish lutes). 
The parranda is usually danced by two people, like the seguidilla, but it is distinct from the seguidilla in its usage of extraordinary jumps and turns in the air. At the beginning of the dance, two rows are made, leaving the pairs in front. In its basic structure, it begins with some lateral steps and then the dancers cross with their partner and turn themselves around. However, there are many varieties of steps and turns that are characteristic to each town or community.[citation needed] 
Type XM4 tenders entered service in November 1911, as tenders to the second batch of 2-6-6-2 Superheated Mallet type steam locomotives which were delivered to the Central South African Railways in that year. These locomotives were designated Class MF on the South African Railways in 1912. 
In November 1911, the Central South African Railways (CSAR) placed a second batch of five 2-6-6-2 Mallet articulated compound steam locomotives in service, built by ALCO. These locomotives were designated Class MF on the South African Railways (SAR) in 1912. The Type XM4 tender entered service as tenders to these five engines. 
In the SAR years, tenders were numbered for the engines they were delivered with. In most cases, an oval number plate, bearing the engine number and often also the tender type, would be attached to the rear end of the tender. 
Only the second batch of five Class MF locomotives were delivered new with Type XM4 tenders. They were numbered in the range from 1629 to 1633, directly onto the SAR roster, marking the introduction of the SAR renumbering scheme under the Union programme. 
Since many tender types are interchangeable between different locomotive classes and types, a tender classification system was adopted by the SAR. The first letter of the tender type indicates the classes of engines to which it can be coupled. The "X_" tenders could be used with the locomotive classes as shown. 
The second letter indicates the tender's water capacity. The "_M" tenders had a capacity of 4,000 imperial gallons (18,200 litres; 4,800 US gallons). 
A number, when added after the letter code, usually indicates differences between similar tender types, such as function, wheelbase or coal bunker capacity. 
The son of two teachers, Jakob Hellman grew up in rural north Sweden, just south of the polar circle. In school, he was in the same class as Zemya Hamilton, later to be known as the lead singer of house music act Clubland. 
In a 2007 interview in a Jakob Hellman special on the Swedish public service music radio show Musikjournalen (broadcast on 15 January 2007 on SR P3), producer Dan Sundquist told the story of a rather strenuous recording experience, due to Hellman's unwillingness to compromise with his convictions on how the music ought to sound. Many of the participating musicians support his view stating that Hellman wanted the album to sound rawer and rockier. 
In July 2006, his childhood band Ampere reformed to play at the Kulturkraft festival in Vuollerim. "It is fun to play in a band again. [...] Compared to being on my own, playing under my own name, it feels very relaxed," Hellman commented. 
In the 2007 Musikjournalen Hellman radio special, Jakob Hellman spoke about feeling as if he were the album's "luxury wife", still partly living off its revenue. He said a new album felt "far away", and that he was focusing on writing one song at a time to be able to play live. 
In 1913, Hubert Lyautey, the military governor of the French Morocco invited Prost to work on development of major Moroccan cities: Fes, Marrakesh, Meknes, Rabat and Casablanca. Prost stayed in Morocco for a decade, and soon Casablanca was lauded as a success story of an application of the principles of urbanism. 
This is a list of notable employment websites. An employment website is a web site dealing specifically with employment or careers. 
Since 1991, she has worked as a sports journalist for Sport-Express, and is considered one of the best sports journalists in Russia. 
This biographical article relating to Soviet diving is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
 The bathtub hoax was a famous hoax perpetrated by the American journalist H. L. Mencken involving the publication of a fictitious history of the bathtub.   
On December 28, 1917, an article titled "A Neglected Anniversary" by H. L. Mencken was published in the New York Evening Mail. Mencken claimed that the actual anniversary of the first American bathtub, the alleged 75th, had gone unnoticed the previous week. This was supposedly in spite of the fact that the Public Health Service of Washington, D.C., had prepared for celebrations several months prior, which were ultimately quashed by the intervening enactment of Prohibition in that city. 
Mencken grew concerned of people taking his article seriously, comparing it in acceptance to the Norman conquest. 
The article was entirely false but was still being widely quoted as fact for years,[citation needed] even as recently as January 2008 when a  Kia TV ad referenced the story with no mention of its fictional nature. 
Fillmore's birthplace of Moravia, New York, has annual "Fillmore Days" where people race in modified bathtubs. After a 20-year hiatus the Fillmore Days were revived in 2019. 
Mondo is an administrative ward in the Chemba District of the Dodoma Region of Tanzania. According to the 2002 census, the ward has a total population of 9,476. 
 Monroe Community Hospital is a chronic-care center in Rochester  that is operated by Monroe County. They also have a Skilled Nursing Facility 
The nonprofit 566-bed hospital's roots can be traced to the 1933-built Monroe Community Home and Infirmary, which was a replacement for the 1820s-built Monroe County Almshouse. The Community Home structure "was designed by local architect Sigmund Firestone."  Firestone employed Thomas Boyde Jr (1905-1981), who later became "Rochester's first Black architect." Boyde's "decorative architectural elements added to" Firestone's design. 
Some of the 190-year-old facility's attending physicians are "affiliated with the University of Rochester's Strong Memorial Hospital." 
In 2017 a local newspaper headlined "Two lawsuits in a month against Monroe Community Hospital." They had publicly fired their director in 2013. 
This biography article about a member of the Christian Democratic Union of Germany (CDU) is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to professional wrestling in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
150,000 as of 10 September 1683, down from 170,000 at the start of the campaign, according to documents on the order of battle found in Kara Mustafa's tent. 
Viennese garrison: 11,000 soldiers + 5,000 volunteers 312 guns but only 141 operational (strength on 10 September 1683) 
Total: 90,000 but some left behind to guard bridges near Tulln and camps, plus 2,000 Imperial cavalry (not included above) left behind the Danube. 
The confederated troops signalled their arrival on the Kahlenberg above Vienna with bonfires. The forces in the city of Vienna responded by sending Jerzy Franciszek Kulczycki, a Polish nobleman, diplomat and trader fluent in Turkish, on a successful spy mission to penetrate the Turkish forces and notify the relief troops of when the joint attack was to be made. Before the battle a Mass was celebrated, said by Marco d'Aviano, the religious adviser of Emperor Leopold I. 
The Holy League troops and the Viennese took a large amount of loot from the Ottoman army, which Sobieski vividly described in a letter to his wife a few days after the battle: 
Ours are treasures unheard of . . . tents, sheep, cattle and no small number of camels . . . it is a victory as nobody ever knew before, the enemy now completely ruined, everything lost for them. They must run for their sheer lives . . . General Starhemberg hugged and kissed me and called me his saviour. 
Starhemberg immediately ordered the repair of Vienna's severely damaged fortifications to guard against a possible Ottoman counterstrike. However, this proved unnecessary. 
The Pope also upgraded the papal coat of arms by adding the Polish crowned White Eagle. After victory in the Battle of Vienna, the Polish king was also granted by the Pope the title of "Defender of the Faith" ("Defensor Fidei"). In honor of Sobieski, the Austrians erected a church atop the Kahlenberg hill north of Vienna. 
Austrian composer Johann Joseph Fux memorialized the battle in his Partita Turcaria, which bore the subtitle, "Musical portrait of the siege of Vienna by the Turks in 1683". 
The Swedish historical metal band Sabaton recounted this battle in the song "Winged Hussars" from their 2016 album, The Last Stand. 
One legend is that the croissant was invented in Vienna, either in 1683 or during the earlier siege in 1529, to celebrate the defeat of the Ottoman attack on the city, with the shape referring to the crescents on the Ottoman flags. This version of the origin of the croissant is supported by the fact that croissants in France are a variant of Viennoiserie, and by the French popular belief that Vienna-born Marie Antoinette introduced the pastry to France in 1770. 
Another legend from Vienna has the first bagel as being a gift to King John III Sobieski to commemorate his victory over the Ottomans. It was fashioned in the form of a stirrup to commemorate the victorious charge by the Polish cavalry. The veracity of this legend is uncertain, as there is a reference in 1610 to a bread with a similar-sounding name, which may or may not have been the bagel. 
In 2012, an English-language Polish and Italian historical drama film The Day of the Siege: September Eleven 1683 based on the Battle of Vienna and directed by Renzo Martinelli was released. 
The book analyzes religions from a perspective where they are viewed as literary products. Rejecting anti-religious positions such as that of Karl Marx, it examines the genre's stylistic devices, or "theopoetics". Among the subjects it covers are the theatre of ancient Greece, the anti-mythological stance of Plato, ancient Egyptian polytheism, the theologian Karl Barth, Heinrich Joseph Dominicus Denzinger's Enchiridion Symbolorum, the universal claims of Islam, and the Book of Job. 
Suhrkamp Verlag published the book in Germany on 26 October 2020. The English-language publishing rights have been acquired by Polity. 
He graduated from the Mississippi Agricultural and Mechanical College in 1892 and studied at the University of Chicago (Ph.M., 1900) and at Columbia University (Ph.D., 1902), where he was a member of the Dunning School. His dissertation, Reconstruction in Mississippi, though critical of Reconstruction, was regarded by W. E. B. Du Bois as the fairest of the works of the Dunning School. 
He edited Essays on Southern History and Politics (1914). He was Hyde lecturer in the French universities (1921) and Tagore lecturer in the University of Calcutta (1922). 
The music is composed by M. M. Keeravani for both the parts. The music released on Sony Music India. The audio and trailer launch of the biopic was held at JRC Convention Center, Hyderabad on 21 December 2018.  Veteran Telugu stalwarts Krishna, Krishnam Raju, Mohan Babu, K. Raghavendra Rao, N. T. Rama Rao Jr. and others attended the function along with complete Nandamuri family. 
Cape Burks is a prominent rock cape, the northwestern seaward extension of McDonald Heights, marking the east side of the entrance of Hull Bay on the coast of Marie Byrd Land.  The cape was sighted and mapped from the USS Glacier, January  31, 1962, and was named for Lieutenant Commander Ernest Burks, U.S. Navy, senior helicopter pilot on the Glacier and the first person to set  foot on the cape. 
Moss has conceived, organized and constructed large-scale balloon installations in North America, South America, Europe and Asia, including: the world's first piloted flying balloon sculpture, Balloon Manor (a large-scale haunted house made entirely from balloons) and the world's largest, non-round balloon sculpture (see "Soccer Players"). The latter earned Moss and fellow artist Royal Sorell a Guinness World Record and was featured on an episode of the Ripley's Believe It Or Not! TV series. 
Moss recently set a second world record at London's Brick 2014 event, erecting a 20-foot-tall balloon replica of a LEGO minifigure that has been recognized in Guinness World Records 2016. Moss is also the founder of one of the first 50, non-academic websites established on the internet: BalloonHQ.com, an online community and resource for amateur and professional balloon artists. He currently owns and operates Airigami, LLC, with his wife and business partner, Designer Kelly Cheatle. 
In 2005, Moss launched Airigami, LLC, through which he conceives and constructs creative content made entirely of balloons. Projects range from life-sized, individual sculptures to record-breaking, on-site installations for use at national and international museums (i.e., The Strong National Museum of Play, Virginia Museum of Natural History, Rochester Museum and Science Center), art galleries (i.e., Phelps Arts Center), trade shows and more. 
Larry Moss is a popular industry educator. He has taught balloon art in Europe, Asia, and America.  He is also the author of several books and has designed balloon kits which are popular among children and adults worldwide. 
"La Nuit" is a 1964 famous song by Belgian singer and composer of Italian ancestry Salvatore Adamo and one of his definitive songs besides "Tombe la neige" and "Inch'Allah". He simultaneously released an Italian language version as well under the title as ""La notte" and a Spanish version as "la noche". The French language "La Nuit" reached number 3 in the Belgian Singles  Chart in 1964. In Spain, the song was interpreted by Raphael. 
Le Grand Orchestre de Paul Mauriat recorded an instrumental version of the song, making it the opening track of his album Paul Mauriat Plays Standards.. 
Adamo rereleased the song in 1993 with a new orchestra arrangement as part of his compilation album 30 ans with rearrangements for his biggest hits. 
In 2008, Adamo performed it as a duo with Jeanne Cherhal and with Nolwenn Leroy in 2011. In 2013, he performed it as a duo with David Madi, a contestant and eventual winner of  The Voice Belgique in season 2. 
Osgood is a town in Center Township, Ripley County, in the U.S. state of Indiana. The population was 1,624 at the 2010 census. 
Osgood was platted in 1854 when the railroad was extended to that point. The town was named for A. L. Osgood, a railroad official. A post office called Osgood has been in operation since 1855. In the 1890s, Osgood was a sundown town, where African Americans were not allowed to reside. By then, Osgood was still much more closely connected to Cincinnati than Indianapolis in terms of trade. 
In 1999, the community received a $23 million bequest from the Gilmore and Golda Reynolds Foundation, which was established by two lifelong Osgood residents to assist the town government as well as local non-profit organizations. 
As of the census of 2010, there were 1,624 people, 638 households, and 417 families living in the town. The population density was 1,120.0 inhabitants per square mile (432.4/km2). There were 728 housing units at an average density of 502.1 per square mile (193.9/km2). The racial makeup of the town was 98.2% White, 0.1% African American, 0.2% Native American, 0.1% from other races, and 1.5% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.3% of the population. 
There were 638 households, of which 36.2% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 44.7% were married couples living together, 15.2% had a female householder with no husband present, 5.5% had a male householder with no wife present, and 34.6% were non-families. 31.2% of all households were made up of individuals, and 14% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.45 and the average family size was 3.06. 
The median age in the town was 36 years. 26.9% of residents were under the age of 18; 8.5% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 26% were from 25 to 44; 22.3% were from 45 to 64; and 16.4% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the town was 47.5% male and 52.5% female. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 1,669 people, 668 households, and 424 families living in the town. The population density was 1,285.0 people per square mile (495.7/km2). There were 731 housing units at an average density of 562.8 per square mile (217.1/km2). The racial makeup of the town was 98.98% White, 0.12% African American, 0.54% Native American, 0.12% Asian, 0.06% from other races, and 0.18% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race we